FORM 10-K
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
(Mark One)
☒ ANNUAL REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d)
OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the fiscal year ended December 31, 2021
OR
☐ TRANSITION REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d)
OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the transition period from ______ to
Commission File Number: 001-8610
AT&T INC.
Incorporated under the laws of the State of Delaware
I.R.S. Employer Identification Number 43-1301883
208 S. Akard St., Dallas, Texas, 75202
Telephone Number 210-821-4105
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act:
  Name of each exchange
Title of each class Trading Symbol(s) on which registered
Common Shares (Par Value $1.00 Per Share) T New York Stock Exchange
Depositary Shares, each representing a 1/1000th interest in a share of
5.000% Perpetual Preferred Stock, Series A T PRA New York Stock Exchange
Depositary Shares, each representing a 1/1000th interest in a share of
4.750% Perpetual Preferred Stock, Series C T PRC New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 2.650% Global Notes due December 17, 2021 T 21B New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 1.450% Global Notes due June 1, 2022 T 22B New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 2.500% Global Notes due March 15, 2023 T 23 New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 2.750% Global Notes due May 19, 2023 T 23C New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. Floating Rate Global Notes due September 5, 2023 T 23D New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 1.050% Global Notes due September 5, 2023 T 23E New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 1.300% Global Notes due September 5, 2023 T 23A New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 1.950% Global Notes due September 15, 2023 T 23F New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 2.400% Global Notes due March 15, 2024 T 24A New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 3.500% Global Notes due December 17, 2025 T 25 New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 0.250% Global Notes due March 4, 2026 T 26E New York Stock Exchange
  Name of each exchange
Title of each class Trading Symbol(s) on which registered
AT&T Inc. 1.800% Global Notes due September 5, 2026 T 26D New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 2.900% Global Notes due December 4, 2026 T 26A New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 1.600% Global Notes due May 19, 2028 T 28C New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 2.350% Global Notes due September 5, 2029 T 29D New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 4.375% Global Notes due September 14, 2029 T 29B New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 2.600% Global Notes due December 17, 2029 T 29A New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 0.800% Global Notes due March 4, 2030 T 30B New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 2.050% Global Notes due May 19, 2032 T 32A New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 3.550% Global Notes due December 17, 2032 T 32 New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 5.200% Global Notes due November 18, 2033 T 33 New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 3.375% Global Notes due March 15, 2034 T 34 New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 2.450% Global Notes due March 15, 2035 T 35 New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 3.150% Global Notes due September 4, 2036 T 36A New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 2.600% Global Notes due May 19, 2038 T 38C New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 1.800% Global Notes due September 14, 2039 T 39B New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 7.000% Global Notes due April 30, 2040 T 40 New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 4.250% Global Notes due June 1, 2043 T 43 New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 4.875% Global Notes due June 1, 2044 T 44 New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 4.000% Global Notes due June 1, 2049 T 49A New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 4.250% Global Notes due March 1, 2050 T 50 New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 3.750% Global Notes due September 1, 2050 T50A New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 5.350% Global Notes due November 1, 2066 TBB New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 5.625% Global Notes due August 1, 2067 TBC New York Stock Exchange
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(g) of the Act: None.
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer, as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act.
Yes ☒ No ☐
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is not required to file reports pursuant to Section 13 or Section 15(d) of the Act. Yes ☐ No
☒
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant (1) has filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities
Exchange Act of 1934 during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to file such
reports), and (2) has been subject to such filing requirements for the past 90 days. Yes ☒ No ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has submitted electronically every Interactive Data File required to be submitted
pursuant to Rule 405 of Regulation S-T during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required
to submit such files). Yes ☒ No ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a large accelerated filer, an accelerated filer, a non-accelerated filer, a smaller
reporting company, or an emerging growth company. See definition of “large accelerated filer,” “accelerated filer,” “smaller
reporting company,” and “emerging growth company” in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act.
Large Accelerated Filer ☒ Accelerated Filer ☐
Non-accelerated filer ☐ Smaller reporting company ☐
Emerging growth company ☐
If an emerging growth company, indicate by check mark if the registrant has elected not to use the extended transition period for
complying with any new or revised financial accounting standards provided pursuant to Section 13(a) of the Exchange Act. ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has filed a report on and attestation to its management's assessment of the
effectiveness of its internal control over financial reporting under Section 404(b) of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act (15 U.S.C. 7262(b)) by
the registered public accounting firm that prepared or issued its audit report. ☒
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a shell company (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act).
Yes ☐ No ☒
Based on the closing price of $28.78 per share on June 30, 2021, the aggregate market value of our voting and non-voting common
stock held by non-affiliates was $205 billion.
At February 11, 2022, common shares outstanding were 7,142,892,741.
DOCUMENTS INCORPORATED BY REFERENCE
(1)Portions of AT&T Inc.’s Notice of 2021 Annual Meeting and Proxy Statement dated on or about April 1, 2022 to be filed
within the period permitted under General Instruction G(3) (Parts III and IV).
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
TABLE OF  CONTENTS
Item Page
PART I
1. Business 1
1A. Risk Factors 13
2. Properties 25
3. Legal Proceedings 25
4. Mine Safety Disclosures 25
Information about our Executive Officers 26
PART II
5.Market for Registrant’s Common Equity, Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer Purchases of Equity
Securities 27
6. Item 6. [Reserved] 29
7. Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations 29
7A. Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures about Market Risk 52
8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data 59
9. Changes in and Disagreements with Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure 124
9A. Controls and Procedures 124
9B. Other Information 124
PART III
10. Directors, Executive Officers and Corporate Governance 125
11. Executive Compensation 125
12. Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder Matters 126
13. Certain Relationships and Related Transactions, and Director Independence 127
14. Principal Accountant Fees and Services 127
PART IV
15. Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedules 127
16. Form 10-K Summary 130
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
PART I
ITEM 1. BUSINESS
GENERAL
AT&T Inc. (“AT&T,” “we” or the “Company”) is a holding company incorporated under the laws of the State of Delaware in 1983
and has its principal executive offices at 208 S. Akard St., Dallas, Texas, 75202 (telephone number 210-821-4105). We maintain an
internet website at www.att.com. (This website address is for information only and is not intended to be an active link or to
incorporate any website information into this document.) We file electronically with the Securities and Exchange Commission
(SEC) required reports on Form 8-K, Form 10-Q and Form 10-K; proxy materials; registration statements on Forms S-3 and S-8, as
necessary; and other forms or reports as required. The SEC maintains a website (www.sec.gov) that contains reports, proxy and
information statements, and other information regarding issuers that file electronically with the SEC. We make available, free of
charge, on our website our annual report on Form 10-K, our quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, current reports on Form 8-K and all
amendments to those reports as soon as reasonably practicable after such reports are electronically filed with, or furnished to, the
SEC. We also make available on that website, and in print, if any stockholder or other person so requests, our “Code of Ethics”
applicable to all employees and Directors, our “Corporate Governance Guidelines,” and the charters for all committees of our
Board of Directors, including Audit, Human Resources and Corporate Governance and Nominating. Any changes to our Code of
Ethics or waiver of our Code of Ethics for senior financial officers, executive officers or Directors will be posted on that website.
A reference to a “Note” refers to the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements in Item 8.
History
AT&T, formerly known as SBC Communications Inc. (SBC), was formed as one of several regional holding companies created to
hold AT&T Corp.’s (ATTC) local telephone companies. On January 1, 1984, we were spun-off from ATTC pursuant to an anti-trust
consent decree, becoming an independent publicly traded telecommunications services provider. At formation, we primarily
operated in five southwestern states.
Following our formation, we have expanded our communications footprint and operations and invested in entertainment
businesses, most significantly:
•Our subsidiaries merged with Pacific Telesis Group in 1997, Southern New England Telecommunications Corporation in
1998 and Ameritech Corporation in 1999, thereby expanding our wireline operations as the incumbent local exchange
carrier (ILEC) into a total of 13 states.
•In 2005, we merged one of our subsidiaries with ATTC, creating one of the world’s leading telecommunications providers.
In connection with the merger, we changed the name of our company from “SBC Communications Inc.” to “AT&T Inc.”
•In 2006, we merged one of our subsidiaries with BellSouth Corporation (BellSouth) making us the ILEC in an additional
nine states. With the BellSouth acquisition, we also acquired BellSouth’s 40 percent economic interest in AT&T Mobility
LLC (AT&T Mobility), formerly Cingular Wireless LLC, resulting in 100 percent ownership of AT&T Mobility.
•In 2014, we completed the acquisition of wireless provider Leap Wireless International, Inc. and sold our ILEC operations
in Connecticut, which we had previously acquired in 1998.
•In 2015, we acquired wireless properties in Mexico, and acquired DIRECTV, a leading provider of digital television
entertainment services in both the United States and Latin America. In 2018, the Latin American operations of DIRECTV
was renamed Vrio.
•In June 2018, we acquired Time Warner Inc. (Time Warner), a leader in media and entertainment that operated the Turner,
Home Box Office (HBO) and Warner Bros. divisions. We also acquired Otter Media Holdings (substantially disposed of in
2021) and advertising platform AppNexus in August 2018 (agreement to sell signed in December 2021). In May 2021, we
entered into an agreement to combine our WarnerMedia segment, subject to certain exceptions, with a subsidiary of
Discovery, Inc. (Discovery). The transaction is expected to close in the second quarter of 2022, subject to approval by
Discovery shareholders and customary closing conditions, including receipt of regulatory approvals.
•In October 2020, we sold our wireless and wireline operations in Puerto Rico and the U.S. Virgin Islands.
•In July 2021, we closed our transaction with TPG Capital (TPG) to form a new company named DIRECTV Entertainment
Holdings, LLC (DIRECTV). With the close of the transaction, we separated our Video business, comprised of our U.S.
video operations, and began accounting for our investment in DIRECTV under the equity method.
1
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
•In November 2021, we sold our Vrio business unit, which provided video services primarily to residential customers using
satellite technology in Latin America and the Caribbean.
General
We are a leading provider of telecommunications, media and technology services globally. The services and products that we offer
vary by market and utilize various technology platforms in a range of geographies. Our reportable segments are organized as
follows:
The Communications segment provides services to businesses and consumers located in the U.S. and businesses globally. Our
business strategies reflect bundled product offerings that cut across product lines and utilize shared assets. This segment contains
the following business units:
•Mobility provides nationwide wireless service and equipment.
•Business Wireline provides advanced IP-based services, as well as traditional voice and data services to business customers.
•Consumer Wireline provides internet, including broadband fiber, and legacy telephony voice communication services to
residential customers.
The WarnerMedia segment develops, produces and distributes feature films, television, gaming and other content in various
physical and digital formats globally. WarnerMedia content is distributed through basic networks, Direct-to-Consumer (DTC) or
theatrical, TV content and games licensing. Segment results also include Xandr advertising and Otter Media Holdings (Otter
Media). We disposed of substantially all Otter Media assets in the third quarter of 2021.
On May 17, 2021, we entered into an agreement to combine our WarnerMedia segment, subject to certain exceptions, with a
subsidiary of Discovery, Inc. (Discovery). On December 21, 2021, we entered into an agreement to sell the marketplace component
of Xandr to Microsoft Corporation (Microsoft). (See Note 6)
The Latin America segment provides wireless services and equipment in Mexico, and prior to the November 2021 disposition of
Vrio, video services in Latin America and the Caribbean.
Corporate and Other reconciles our segment results to consolidated operating income and income before income taxes, and
includes:
•Corporate, which consists of: (1) businesses no longer integral to our operations or which we no longer actively market, (2)
corporate support functions, (3) impacts of corporate-wide decisions for which the individual operating segments are not being
evaluated, and (4) the reclassification of the amortization of prior service credits, which we continue to report with segment
operating expenses, to consolidated “Other income (expense) – net.” Costs previously allocated to the Video business that were
retained after the transaction, net of reimbursements from DIRECTV under transition service agreements, are reported in
Corporate following the transaction through 2022, to maintain comparability of our operating segment results, and while
operational plans and continued cost reduction initiatives are implemented.
•Video, which consists of our former U.S. video operations that were contributed to DIRECTV on July 31, 2021 and also
includes our share of DIRECTV’s earnings as equity in net income of affiliates (see Note 10).
•Acquisition-related items, which consists of items associated with the merger and integration of acquired or divested
businesses, including amortization of intangible assets.
•Certain significant items, which includes (1) employee separation charges associated with voluntary and/or strategic offers, (2)
asset impairments and abandonments, and (3) other items for which the segments are not being evaluated.
•Eliminations and consolidations, which (1) removes transactions involving dealings between our segments, including channel
distribution between WarnerMedia and Video prior to its separation, and (2) includes adjustments for our reporting of the
advertising business.
2
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Areas of Focus
The importance of world-class connectivity and content come together in our three market focus areas: 5G, fiber and HBO Max.
Fiber underpins the connectivity we deliver, both wired and wireless. Building on that fiber foundation is our solid spectrum
portfolio, strengthened through recent Federal Communications Commission (FCC) auction acquisitions and 5G deployment. We
believe our hybrid fixed and mobile approach will differentiate our services and provide us with additional growth opportunities in
the future as bandwidth demands continue to grow, with user-generated content growing at an ever-increasing pace. With HBO
Max, we’ve developed a next-generation entertainment distribution platform built for growth in direct-to-consumer subscription
and advertising-based relationships. We will continue to demonstrate our commitment to ensure management attention is sharply
focused on growth areas and operational efficiencies.
Communications
Our integrated telecommunications network utilizes different technological platforms to provide instant connectivity at the higher
speeds made possible by our fiber network expansion and wireless network enhancements. Streaming, augmented reality, “smart”
technologies and user generated content is expected to drive greater demand for broadband and capitalize on our fiber and 5G
deployments. During 2022, we will continue to develop and provide high-value, integrated mobile and broadband solutions.
Wireless Service We are experiencing rapid growth in data usage as consumers are demanding seamless access across their wireless
and wired devices, and businesses and municipalities are connecting more and more equipment and facilities to the internet. The
deployment of 5G, which allows for faster connectivity, lower latency and greater bandwidth requires modifications of existing cell
sites to add equipment supporting new frequencies, like the C-Band and the newly auctioned 3.45 GHz band. Our 5G service went
nationwide in July 2020, and with that availability, the introduction of 5G handsets and devices has contributed to a renewed
interest in equipment upgrades. The increased speeds and network operating efficiency expected with 5G technology should enable
massive deployment of devices connected to the internet as well as faster delivery of data services. In January 2022, we began to
deploy our C-band spectrum, subject to certain voluntary limitations.
In North America, our network covers over 434 million people with 4G LTE and over 250 million with 5G technology. In the
United States, our network covers all major metropolitan areas and more than 330 million people with our LTE technology and
more than 250 million people with our 5G technology. Our 3G network provides services to customers using older handsets and
connected devices. We will discontinue services on our 3G network on February 22, 2022 and expect to redeploy that spectrum in
our transition to 5G. As of December 31, 2021, about 1 percent of our postpaid subscribers were using 3G handsets, and we expect
them to transition to newer technologies. We do not expect this transition to have a material impact on our consolidated operating
results.
As the wireless industry has matured, future wireless growth will increasingly depend on our ability to offer innovative data
services on a wireless network that has sufficient spectrum and capacity to support these innovations. We continue to invest
significant capital in expanding our network capacity, as well as obtaining additional spectrum that meets our long-term needs. We
participate in FCC spectrum auctions and have been redeploying spectrum previously used for more basic services to support more
advanced mobile internet services.
Broadband Technology In 2020, we identified fiber as a core priority for our business, working to expand our footprint and
accelerating our historical rate of customer growth. At December 31, 2021, we had nearly 6 million fiber broadband customers,
adding more than 1 million during the year. The expansion builds on our recent years’ investment to convert to a software-based
network, managing the migration of wireline customers to services using our fiber infrastructure to provide broadband technology.
Software-based technologies align with our global leadership in software defined network (SDN) and network function
virtualization (NFV). This network approach delivers a demonstrable cost advantage in the deployment of next-generation
technology over the traditional, hardware-intensive network approach. Our virtualized network is able to support next-generation
applications like 5G and broadband-based services quickly and efficiently.
3
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Media
We produce and distribute high-quality video content to take advantage of growing global demand. Our media businesses use their
strong brands, distinctive intellectual property and global scale to produce and distribute quality content. As the television industry
continues to evolve from a distribution system using satellite and cable offerings to internet streaming video services, we are well-
positioned to address and capitalize on these changes, but we face financial risks and new sources of competition associated with
these developments. In 2022, we plan to continue providing more personalized services offered directly to consumers through our
own distribution and distribution partner channels, including expanding our streaming platform, HBO Max, in certain international
territories. AT&T customers in the U.S. that are on certain mobile and broadband plans can bundle with HBO Max included at no
additional charge.
Latin America
We believe that the wireless model in the U.S., with accelerating demand for mobile internet service and the associated economic
benefits, will be repeated around the world as companies invest in high-speed mobile networks. We acquired Mexican wireless
operations in 2015 to establish a seamless, cross-border North American wireless network which now covers an area with over 434
million people and businesses in the United States and Mexico. With the increased capacity from our LTE network, we also expect
additional wholesale revenue in the coming years. Our 4G LTE network in Mexico now covers approximately 104 million people
and businesses.
BUSINESS OPERATIONS
OPERATING SEGMENTS
Our segments are strategic business units that offer different products and services over various technology platforms and/or in
different geographies that are managed accordingly. We analyze our operating segments based on segment contribution, which
consists of operating income, excluding acquisition-related costs and other significant items, and equity in net income (loss) of
affiliates for investments managed within each operating segment. We have three reportable segments: (1) Communications, (2)
WarnerMedia and (3) Latin America.
Additional information about our segments, including financial information, is included under the heading “Segment Results” in
Item 7. and in Note 4 of Item 8.
COMMUNICATIONS
Our Communications segment provides wireless and wireline telecom and broadband services to consumers located in the U.S. and
businesses globally. Our Communications services and products are marketed under the AT&T, Cricket, AT&T PREPAID and
AT&T Fiber brand names. The Communications segment provided approximately 74% of 2021 segment operating revenues and
81% of our 2021 total segment contribution. This segment contains the Mobility, Business Wireline and Consumer Wireline
business units.
Mobility – Our Mobility business unit provides nationwide wireless services to consumers and wholesale and resale wireless
subscribers located in the United States by utilizing our network to provide voice and data services, including high-speed internet
over wireless devices. We classify our subscribers as either postpaid, prepaid, connected device or reseller. At December 31, 2021,
we served 202 million Mobility subscribers, including 82 million postpaid (67 million phone), 19 million prepaid, 6 million reseller
and 95 million connected devices. Our Mobility business unit revenue includes the following categories: service and equipment.
Wireless Services
We offer a comprehensive range of high-quality nationwide wireless voice and data communications services in a variety of pricing
plans to meet the communications needs of targeted customer categories. Through our FirstNet services, we also provide a
nationwide wireless broadband network dedicated to public safety.
Consumers continue to require increasing availability of data-centric services and a network to connect and control those devices.
An increasing number of our subscribers are using more advanced integrated and data-centric devices, including embedded
computing systems and/or software, commonly called the Internet of Things (IoT). We offer plans that include unlimited features
allowing for the sharing of voice, text and data across multiple devices, which attracts subscribers from other providers and helps
minimize subscriber churn. Customers in our “connected device” category (e.g., users of monitoring devices and automobile
systems) generally purchase those devices from third-party suppliers that buy data access supported by our network. We continue to
upgrade our network and coordinate with equipment manufacturers and application developers to further capitalize on the
continued growing demand for wireless data services.SM
4
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
We also offer nationwide wireless voice and data communications to certain customers who prefer to pay in advance. These
services are offered under the Cricket and AT&T PREPAID brands and are typically monthly prepaid services.
Equipment
We sell a wide variety of handsets, wireless data cards and wireless computing devices manufactured by various suppliers for use
with our voice and data services. We also sell accessories, such as carrying cases and hands-free devices. We sell through our own
company-owned stores, agents and third-party retail stores. We provide our customers the ability to purchase handsets on an
installment basis and the opportunity to bring their own device. Subscribers have been bringing their own devices or retaining their
handsets for longer periods, which could continue to impact upgrade activity. Like other wireless service providers, we also provide
a limited number of postpaid contract subscribers substantial equipment subsidies to initiate, renew or upgrade service.
Business Wireline – Our Business Wireline business unit provides services to business customers, including multinational
corporations, small and mid-sized businesses, governmental and wholesale customers. Our Business Wireline business unit revenue
includes the following categories: services and equipment.
Business Services
Business services include data, voice, security, cloud solutions, outsourcing, and managed and professional services. Our more
advanced business products allow our customers to create and manage their own internal networks and to access external data
networks, and include Virtual Private Networks (VPN), AT&T Dedicated Internet (ADI), and Ethernet and broadband services. We
provide collaboration services that utilize our IP infrastructure and allow our customers to utilize the most advanced technology to
improve their productivity. We also provide state-of-the-art security solutions like threat management, intrusion detection and other
business security applications.
We continue to reconfigure our wireline network to take advantage of the latest technologies and services. We have developed
services that rely on our SDN and NFV to enhance business customers’ digital agility in a rapidly evolving environment.
Equipment
Equipment revenues include customer premises equipment.
Consumer Wireline – Our Consumer Wireline business unit provides internet, including broadband fiber, and legacy telephony
voice communication to customers in the United States by utilizing our IP-based and copper wired network. Our Consumer
Wireline business unit revenue includes the following categories: broadband, legacy voice and data services and other service and
equipment.
Broadband
We offer broadband and internet services to approximately 16 million customer locations, with 6 million fiber broadband
connections at December 31, 2021. With changes in video viewing preferences and the recent work and learn from home trends, we
are experiencing increasing demand for high-speed broadband services. Our investment in expanding our industry-leading fiber
network positions us to be a leader in wired connectivity.
We believe that our flexible platform with a broadband and wireless connection is the most efficient way to transport direct-to-
consumer video experiences both at home and on mobile devices. Through this integrated approach, we can optimize the use of
storage in the home as well as in the cloud, while also providing a seamless service for consumers across screens and locations. Our
WarnerMedia streaming platform, HBO Max, provides an attractive offering of video options and is driving our direct-to-consumer
strategy.
Legacy Voice and Data Services
Revenues from our traditional voice services continue to decline as customers switch to wireless or VoIP services provided by us,
cable companies or other internet-based providers. We have responded by offering packages of combined voice and data services,
including broadband and video, and intend to continue this strategy during 2022.
Other Services and Equipment
Other service revenues include AT&T U-verse voice services (which use VoIP technology), customer fees and equipment.
Additional information on our Communications segment is contained in the “Overview” section of Item 7.
5
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
WARNERMEDIA
Our WarnerMedia segment is comprised of a global media and entertainment company that develops, produces and acquires feature
films, television, gaming and other content for monetization in various media outlets including theatrical, its own and third-party
basic and premium pay television, free-to-air television, direct-to-consumer services and physical / digital retail. WarnerMedia is
organized as an integrated content organization that operates as a single segment. Content creation, distribution, and programming
are centrally managed to ensure the highest quality content is available to consumers on the optimal platform or format on a
worldwide basis. The WarnerMedia segment provided approximately 23% of 2021 segment operating revenues and 21% of our
2021 total segment contribution. WarnerMedia revenues include the following categories: subscription, content and other and
advertising.
On May 17, 2021, we entered into an agreement to combine our WarnerMedia segment, subject to certain exceptions, with a
subsidiary of Discovery. The transaction is expected to close in the second quarter of 2022, subject to approval by Discovery
shareholders and customary closing conditions, including receipt of regulatory approvals. No vote is required by AT&T
shareholders.
On December 21, 2021, we entered into an agreement to sell the marketplace component of Xandr, primarily representing the
AppNexus business, to Microsoft. The transaction is expected to close in 2022, subject to customary closing conditions.
Subscription
Subscription revenue consists principally of subscriber-based revenue from HBO networks (both traditional linear and legacy
streaming on-demand offerings) and the HBO Max streaming platform, as well as its WarnerMedia basic networks. HBO’s
networks (including Cinemax) are available in the United States and internationally to subscribers through traditional and digital
distributors on a premium pay basis and, in certain territories, in the basic television tier, as well as directly to consumers. The HBO
Max platform is made available on an over-the-top subscription basis through the internet directly to consumers and through third-
party distribution partners. HBO Max launched in the United States in May 2020 with an advertising-free service, in Latin America
and the Caribbean in June 2021 and in Sweden, Norway, Denmark, Finland, Spain and Andorra in October 2021, with further
international expansion planned for 2022. The WarnerMedia basic television networks are primarily delivered by traditional
television distributors, such as cable, satellite, and telecommunications service providers, as well as digital distributors, and are
available to subscribers of the distributors for viewing live and on demand through the distributors’ services and companion
network apps. WarnerMedia’s domestic license agreements with distributors are multi-year arrangements that typically provide for
packaging and marketing support. Revenues depend on the specific terms of the applicable agreement, which may include
subscriber thresholds, volume discounts and other performance-based discounts.
As of December 31, 2021, we had nearly 74 million HBO Max and HBO subscribers worldwide, including nearly 47 million
domestic subscribers. Global HBO Max and HBO subscribers consist of domestic and international HBO Max and HBO
subscribers, and exclude free trials, basic and Cinemax subscribers. Domestic HBO Max and HBO subscribers consist of U.S.
accounts with access to HBO Max (including wholesale subscribers and subscribers receiving access through bundled services with
affiliates that may not have signed in) and HBO accounts, and exclude free trials and Cinemax subscribers.
Content and Other
Content revenue consists principally of licensing feature films for initial theatrical exhibition, and films and television programs for
traditional television broadcast and distribution via digital platforms, including via free-to-air, basic and premium pay-TV;
television syndication; and streaming services. Content revenue also includes home entertainment sales and rentals of film and
television products (physical and digital, including premium video-on-demand, transactional video-on-demand and electronic sell-
through), publishing and distribution of interactive games entertainment (physical and digital) across all platforms, comic book and
other book publishing, and consumer products licensing.
The content produced by WarnerMedia is used across its various branded programming services and distribution platforms,
including its traditional linear networks and the HBO Max platform. The television and film programming content produced is also
licensed to third parties for use as part of their various video services and platforms. WarnerMedia also acquires television and film
programming content from third parties to include as part of its branded services and platforms. Decisions relating to content
development and production are dependent upon finding optimal audiences and distribution outlets. In response to the general
disruptions to consumer behavior and entertainment options caused by the COVID-19 pandemic, we have adapted by trying
variations on traditional theatrical distribution models, such as “day and date” release windowing for certain films for on-demand
and theatrical availability and the shortening of the traditional theatrical window for others, and exploring other hybrid models. As
consumers demand more and different optionality over how and when to consume their favorite content, traditional distribution
models for our business can be expected to continue to adapt and evolve responsively.
6
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Advertising
Advertising revenue consists primarily of advertising arrangements for its basic pay-TV networks and related properties, and
includes the advertising-supported tier of HBO Max, which launched in the United States in June 2021. In the United States and
internationally, advertising revenues generally depend on the size and demographics of a network’s audience delivered to an
advertiser, the number of units of time sold and the price per unit. The price per unit of advertising is determined considering
factors such as the type of program or network, the level of targeting and/or the time of day the advertising is to be run. Certain
advertising inventory is sold in the “upfront” market in advance each year and other inventory is sold in the “scatter” market closer
to the time that a program airs. Outside the U.S., advertising is generally sold at a fixed rate for the unit of time sold, determined by
the time of day and network.
WarnerMedia’s digital properties consist of owned assets and those managed and/or operated for sports leagues where our basic
networks hold the related programming rights. Digital properties managed or operated for sports leagues include NBA.com, NBA
Mobile and NCAA.com.
Additional information on our WarnerMedia segment is contained in the “Overview” section of Item 7.
LATIN AMERICA
Our Latin America segment provides wireless services in Mexico, and prior to the November 2021 sale of Vrio, video services in
Latin America. The Latin America segment provided approximately 3% of 2021 segment operating revenues. Our Latin America
services and products are marketed under the AT&T and Unefon brand names. This segment contains the Mexico business unit.
Mexico – We utilize our regional and national wireless networks in Mexico to provide consumer and business customers with
wireless data and voice communication services. We divide our revenue into the following categories: service and equipment.
We provide postpaid and prepaid wireless services in Mexico to approximately 20 million subscribers under the AT&T and Unefon
brands. Postpaid services allow for (1) no annual service contract for subscribers who bring their own device or purchase a device
on installment (the device must be paid in full if the customer chooses to drop their service from AT&T) and (2) service contracts
for periods up to 36 months for subscribers who purchase their equipment under the traditional device subsidy model. Plans offer
no roaming charges in the United States or Canada, unlimited minutes and messages to the extended AT&T community and
unlimited data access to social networking. We also offer prepaid services to customers who prefer to pay in advance.
We sell a wide variety of handsets, including smartphones manufactured by various suppliers for use with our voice and data
services. We sell through our own company-owned stores, agents and third-party retail stores.
Additional information on our Latin America segment is contained in the “Overview” section of Item 7.
7
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
MAJOR CLASSES OF SERVICE
The following table sets forth the percentage of total consolidated reported operating revenues by any class of service that
accounted for 10% or more of our consolidated total operating revenues in any of the last three fiscal years:
Percentage of Total
Consolidated Operating Revenues
2021 2020 2019
Communications Segment
Wireless service 34  % 32  % 30  %
Business service 14 14 14 
Equipment 13 10 9 
Latin America Segment
Video Services 2 2 2 
Wireless service 1 1 1 
Equipment 1 1 1 
Corporate and Other
Video services 9 16 17 
Excludes advertising revenues included as Wireless service in our Mobility business unit of $330, $291 and $292 in 2021, 2020 and 2019,
respectively .
U.S. video operations were separated in July 2021 and Vrio was sold in November 2021. See Note 6
Excludes advertising revenues included as Video in our sold U.S. video operations of $909, $1,718 and $1,672 in 2021, 2020 and 2019,
respectively .
Additional information on our geographical distribution of revenues is contained in Note 4 of Item 8.
GOVERNMENT REGULATION
Wireless communications providers in the United States must be licensed by the FCC to provide communications services at
specified spectrum frequencies within defined geographic areas and must comply with the rules and policies governing the use of
the spectrum as adopted by the FCC. The FCC’s rules have a direct impact on whether the wireless industry has sufficient spectrum
available to support the high-quality, innovative services our customers demand. Wireless licenses are issued for a fixed time
period, typically ten years, and we must seek renewal of these licenses. While the FCC has generally renewed licenses given to
operating companies such as us, the FCC has authority to both revoke a license for cause and to deny a license renewal if a renewal
is not in the public interest. Additionally, while wireless communications providers’ prices and service offerings are generally not
subject to regulation, the federal government and various states periodically consider new regulations and legislation relating to
various aspects of wireless services.
The Communications Act of 1934 and other related acts give the FCC broad authority to regulate the U.S. operations of our satellite
services, which are licensed by the FCC, and some of WarnerMedia’s businesses are also subject to obligations under the
Communications Act and related FCC regulations. We continue to support regulatory and legislative measures and efforts at both
the federal and state levels to minimize and/or moderate regulatory burdens that are no longer appropriate in a competitive
communications market and that inhibit our ability to compete more effectively and offer services wanted and needed by our
customers, including initiatives to transition services from traditional networks to all IP-based networks. At the same time, we also
seek to ensure that legacy regulations are not further extended to broadband or wireless services, which are subject to vigorous
competition.1
2
2,3
1
2
3
8
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Our ILEC subsidiaries are subject to regulation by state governments, which have the power to regulate intrastate rates and
services, including local, long-distance and network access services, provided such state regulation is consistent with federal law.
Some states have eliminated or reduced regulations on our retail offerings. In addition, many states have adopted legislation that
enables us to provide IP-based video service through a single statewide or state-approved franchise to offer a competitive video
product. These subsidiaries are also subject to the jurisdiction of the FCC with respect to intercarrier compensation,
interconnection, and interstate and international rates and services, including interstate access charges. Access charges are a form of
intercarrier compensation designed to reimburse our wireline subsidiaries for the use of their networks by other carriers.
Our subsidiaries operating outside the United States are subject to the jurisdiction of national and supranational regulatory
authorities in the market where service is provided.
The following discussion highlights significant regulatory issues directly affecting our operations:
Communications Segment
Wireless
The industry-wide deployment of 5G technology, which is needed to meet exploding demand for wireless data, involves
modifications of existing cell sites to add equipment supporting new frequencies, like the C-Band and the newly auctioned 3.45
GHz band, increasing the importance of local permitting processes that allow for approving those modifications on reasonable
timelines and terms. In June and November 2020, the FCC issued a Declaratory Ruling clarifying the limits on state and local
authority to deny applications to modify existing structures to accommodate wireless facilities. Those clarifications facilitate
quicker deployment of next-generation wireless equipment and services. The FCC Order was appealed to the Ninth Circuit Court of
Appeals, where it remains pending, following multiple requests by the FCC to hold the appeal in abeyance until the Senate
confirms a fifth FCC Commissioner. In addition, to date, 31 states and Puerto Rico have adopted legislation to facilitate small cell
deployment.
In March 2020, the FCC released its order setting rules for certain spectrum bands (C-band) for 5G operations. In that order, the
FCC concluded that C-band 5G services that met the agency’s technical limits on power and emissions would not cause harmful
interference with aircraft operations. In reliance on that order, AT&T bid a total of $23,406 and was awarded 1,621 C-band licenses,
including 40 MHz nationwide available for deployment in December 2021, with the remainder available for deployment in
December 2023. In late 2021, the Federal Aviation Administration (FAA) questioned whether the C-band launch could impact radio
altimeter equipment on airplanes, which operate on spectrum bands over 400 MHz away from the spectrum AT&T is launching in
2022. In response, to allow the FAA more time to evaluate, AT&T and Verizon delayed their planned December 2021 5G C-band
launch by six weeks and voluntarily committed to a series of temporary, precautionary measures, in addition to deferring turning on
a limited number of towers around certain airports. On January 19, 2022, we launched 5G C-band services, subject to these
voluntary temporary measures.
Internet
In February 2015, the FCC released an order classifying both fixed and mobile consumer broadband internet access services as
telecommunications services, subject to Title II of the Communications Act. The Order, which represented a departure from
longstanding bipartisan precedent, significantly expanded the FCC’s authority to regulate broadband internet access services, as
well as internet interconnection arrangements. In December 2017, the FCC reversed its 2015 decision by reclassifying fixed and
mobile consumer broadband services as information services and repealing most of the rules that were adopted in 2015. In lieu of
broad conduct prohibitions, the order requires internet service providers to disclose information about their network practices and
terms of service, including whether they block or throttle internet traffic or offer paid prioritization. On October 1, 2019, the D.C.
Circuit issued a unanimous opinion upholding the FCC’s reclassification of broadband as an information service, and its reliance on
transparency requirements and competitive marketplace dynamics to safeguard net neutrality. Because no party sought Supreme
Court review of the D.C. Circuit’s decision to uphold the FCC’s classification of broadband as an information service, that decision
is final. While the court vacated the FCC’s express preemption of any state regulation of net neutrality, it stressed that its ruling did
not prevent the FCC or ISPs from relying on conflict preemption to invalidate particular state laws that are inconsistent with the
FCC’s regulatory objectives and framework. The court also remanded the matter to the FCC for further consideration of the impact
of reclassifying broadband services as information services on public safety, the Lifeline program, and pole attachment regulation.
In October 2020, the FCC adopted an order concluding that those issues did not justify reversing its decision to reclassify
broadband services as information services. An appeal of the FCC’s remand decision is pending.
9
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Following the FCC’s 2017 decision to reclassify broadband internet access services as information services, a number of states
adopted legislation to reimpose the very rules the FCC repealed. In some cases, state legislation imposes requirements that go
beyond the FCC’s February 2015 order. Additionally, some state governors have issued executive orders that effectively reimpose
the repealed requirements. Suits have been filed concerning laws in California and Vermont. Both lawsuits were stayed pursuant to
agreements by those states not to enforce their laws pending final resolution of all appeals of the FCC’s December 2017 order.
Because that order is now final, the California suit returned to active status, but the Vermont litigation remained stayed pending
resolution of a request in the California suit to enjoin enforcement of the California legislation pending resolution of the California
litigation. In January 2021, a U.S. District Court in California denied that request and as a consequence, the California statute now
is in effect. The trade associations challenging the statute have appealed the denial of their request for preliminary injunction to the
Ninth Circuit, which reached a decision denying that appeal on January 28, 2022. On February 11, 2022, the trade association filed
a petition for rehearing with the Ninth Circuit. As a consequence, the agreement of Vermont and the other parties to the Vermont
lawsuit to stay that litigation will continue until the Ninth Circuit appeal is resolved or April 15, 2022, whichever is earlier. We
expect that going forward additional states may seek to impose net neutrality requirements. We will continue to support
congressional action to codify a set of standard consumer rules for the internet.
On November 15, 2021, President Biden signed the Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act (IIJA) into law. The legislation
appropriates $65,000 to support broadband deployment and adoption. The National Telecommunications and Information Agency
(NTIA) is responsible for distributing more than $48,000 of this funding, including $42,500 in state grants for broadband
deployment projects in unserved and underserved areas. NTIA will establish rules for this program in the first half of 2022. The
IIJA also appropriated $14,200 for establishment of the Affordable Connectivity Program (ACP), an FCC-administered monthly,
low-income broadband benefit program, replacing the Emergency Broadband Benefit program (established in December 2020 by
the Consolidated Appropriations Act 2021). Qualifying customers can receive up to thirty dollars per month (or seventy-five dollars
per month for those on Tribal lands) to assist with their internet bill. AT&T is a participating provider in the ACP program and will
consider participating in the deployment program where appropriate. The IIJA includes various provisions that will result in FCC
proceedings regarding ACP program administration and consumer protection, reform of the existing universal support program, and
broadband labeling and equal access.
Privacy-related legislation continues to be adopted or considered in a number of jurisdictions. Legislative, regulatory and litigation
actions could result in significant penalties, increased costs of compliance, further regulation or claims against broadband internet
access service providers and others, and increased uncertainty in the value and availability of data.
WarnerMedia Segment
WarnerMedia creates, owns and distributes intellectual property, including copyrights, trademarks and licenses of intellectual
property. To protect its intellectual property, WarnerMedia relies on a combination of laws and license agreements. Outside the
U.S., laws and regulations relating to intellectual property protection and the effective enforcement of these laws and regulations
vary greatly from country to country. The European Union is pursuing legislative and regulatory initiatives which could impact
WarnerMedia’s activities in the EU. Piracy, particularly of digital content, continues to threaten revenues from WarnerMedia’s
products and services, as well as revenues from our pay TV business, and we work to limit that threat through a combination of
approaches, including technological and legislative solutions. Outside the U.S., various laws and regulations, as well as trade
agreements with the U.S., also apply to the distribution or licensing of feature films for exhibition in theaters and on broadcast and
cable networks. For example, in certain countries, including China, laws and regulations limit the number of foreign films exhibited
in such countries in a calendar year.
Additional information relating to regulation of our subsidiaries is contained under the headings “Operating Environment
Overview” and “Regulatory Developments” of Item 7.
10
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
IMPORTANCE, DURATION AND EFFECT OF LICENSES
Certain of our subsidiaries own or have licenses to various patents, copyrights, trademarks and other intellectual property necessary
to conduct business. Many of our subsidiaries also hold government-issued licenses or franchises to provide wireline, satellite or
wireless services. Additional information relating to regulation affecting those rights is contained under the heading “Operating
Environment Overview,” of Item 7. We actively pursue patents, trademarks and service marks to protect our intellectual property
within the United States and abroad. We maintain a significant global portfolio of patents, trademarks and service mark
registrations. We have also entered into agreements that permit other companies, in exchange for fees and rights, and subject to
appropriate safeguards and restrictions, to utilize certain of our patents, trademarks and service marks. As we transition our network
from a switch-based network to an IP, software-based network, we have increasingly entered into licensing agreements with
software developers.
We periodically receive offers from third parties to obtain licenses for patents and other intellectual rights in exchange for royalties
or other payments. We also receive notices asserting that our products or services sold to customers or software-based network
functions infringe on their patents and other intellectual property rights. These claims, whether against us directly, such as network
functions or against third-party suppliers of products or services that we, in turn, sell to our customers, such as wireless handsets,
could require us to pay damages, royalties, stop offering the relevant products or services and/or cease network functions or other
activities. While the outcome of any litigation is uncertain, we do not believe that the resolution of any of these infringement claims
or the expiration or non-renewal of any of our intellectual property rights would have a material adverse effect on our results of
operations.
MAJOR CUSTOMERS
No customer accounted for 10% or more of our consolidated revenues in 2021, 2020 or 2019.
COMPETITION
Competition continues to increase for communications, media entertainment and digital services from traditional and nontraditional
competitors. Technological advances have expanded the types and uses of services and products available. In addition, lack of or a
reduced level of regulation of comparable legacy services has lowered costs for alternative communications service providers. As a
result, we face continuing competition as well as some new opportunities in significant portions of our business.
Wireless We face substantial competition in our wireless businesses. Under current FCC rules, multiple licensees, who provide
wireless services on the cellular, PCS, Advanced Wireless Services, 700 MHz and other spectrum bands, may operate in each of our
U.S. service areas. Our competitors include two national wireless providers; a larger number of regional providers and resellers of
those services; and certain cable companies. In addition, we face competition from providers who offer voice, text messaging and
other services as applications on data networks. We are one of four facilities-based providers in Mexico (retail and wholesale), with
the most significant market share controlled by América Móvil. We may experience significant competition from companies that
provide similar services using other communications technologies and services. While some of these technologies and services are
now operational, others are being developed or may be developed. We compete for customers based principally on service/device
offerings, price, network quality, coverage area and customer service.
Broadband The desire for high-speed data on demand, including video, is continuing to lead customers to terminate their
traditional wired or linear services and use our fiber services or competitors’ wireless, satellite and internet-based services. In most
U.S. markets, we compete for customers with large cable companies for high-speed internet and voice services, wireless broadband
providers, and other smaller telecommunications companies for both long-distance and local services.
Legacy Voice and Data We continue to lose legacy voice and data subscribers due to competitors (e.g., wireless, cable and VoIP
providers) who can provide comparable services at lower prices because they are not subject to traditional telephone industry
regulation (or the extent of regulation they are subject to is in dispute), utilize different technologies or promote a different business
model (such as advertising-based). In response to these competitive pressures, for a number of years we have used a bundling
strategy that rewards customers who consolidate their services with us. We continue to focus on bundling services and will continue
to develop innovative and integrated services that capitalize on our wireless and IP-based network.
11
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Additionally, we provide local and interstate telephone and switched services to other service providers, primarily large internet
service providers using the largest class of nationwide internet networks (internet backbone), wireless carriers, other telephone
companies, cable companies and systems integrators. These services are subject to additional competitive pressures from the
development of new technologies, the introduction of innovative offerings and increasing satellite, wireless, fiber-optic and cable
transmission capacity for services. We face a number of international competitors, including Orange Business Services, BT,
Singapore Telecommunications Limited and Verizon Communications Inc., as well as competition from a number of large systems
integrators.
Media Our WarnerMedia businesses face shifts in consumer viewing patterns, increased competition from streaming services and
the expansion by other companies, in particular, technology companies. In May 2020, we launched HBO Max, our platform for
premium content and video offered directly to consumers, as well as through our traditional distributors.
WarnerMedia competes with other studios and television production groups and independents to produce and sell programming.
Many television networks and online platforms have affiliated production companies from which they are increasingly obtaining
their programming, which has reduced their demand for programming from non-affiliated production companies. WarnerMedia
also faces competition from other television networks, online platforms, and premium pay television services for distribution and
marketing of its television networks and premium pay and basic tier television services by affiliates.
Our WarnerMedia businesses compete with other production companies and studios for the services of producers, directors, writers,
actors and others and for the acquisition of literary properties. In recent years, technology companies also have begun to produce
programming and compete with WarnerMedia for talent and property rights.
Advertising The increased amount of consumer time spent online and on mobile activities has resulted in the shift of advertising
budgets away from traditional television to digital advertising. WarnerMedia’s advertising-supported television networks and
digital properties compete with streaming services, other networks and digital properties, print, radio and other media. Our
programmatic advertising business faces competition from a variety of technology companies. Similar to all participants in the
advertising technology sector, we contend with the dominance of Google, as well as the influence of Facebook, whose practices
may result in the decreased ability and willingness of advertisers and programmers to adopt programmatic solutions offered by
alternative suppliers. In December 2021, we entered into an agreement to sell the marketplace component of Xandr (see Note 6).
RESEARCH AND DEVELOPMENT
AT&T scientists and engineers conduct research in a variety of areas, including IP networking, advanced network design and
architecture, network and cyber security, network operations support systems, video platform development and data analytics. The
majority of the development activities are performed to create new services and to invent tools and systems to manage secure and
reliable networks for us and our customers. Research and development expenses were $1,522 in 2021, $1,210 in 2020, and $1,276
in 2019.
HUMAN CAPITAL
Number of Employees As of January 31, 2022, we employed approximately 203,000 persons.
Employee Development We believe our success depends on our employees’ success and that all employees must have the skills
they need to thrive. We offer training and elective courses that give employees the opportunity to enhance their skills. We also
intend to help cultivate the next generation of talent that will lead our company into the future by providing employees with
educational opportunities through our award-winning internal training organization, AT&T University.
12
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Labor Contracts Approximately 37% of our employees are represented by the Communications Workers of America (CWA), the
International Brotherhood of Electrical Workers (IBEW) or other unions. After expiration of the collective bargaining agreements,
work stoppages or labor disruptions may occur in the absence of new contracts or other agreements being reached. The main
contracts included the following: A contract covering approximately 12,000 Mobility employees in 36 states and the District of
Columbia is set to expire in February 2022. A contract covering approximately 6,000 wireline employees in five Midwest states
that was set to expire in April 2022 was extended for a four-year period until April 2026. A contract covering approximately 3,000
MW IBEW employees is set to expire in June 2022. A contract covering approximately 2,000 AT&T Corp. employees nationwide
that was set to expire in April 2022 was extended for a four-year period until April 2026. A contract covering approximately 170
Teamsters Alascom employees in Alaska is set to expire in February 2022.
Compensation and Benefits In addition to salaries, we provide a variety of benefit programs to help meet the needs of our
employees. These programs cover active and former employees and may vary by subsidiary and region. These programs include
401(k) plans, pension benefits, and health and welfare benefits, among many others. In addition to our active employee base, at
December 31, 2021, we had approximately 512,000 retirees and dependents who were eligible to receive retiree benefits.
We review our benefit plans to maintain competitive packages that reflect the needs of our workforce. We also adapt our
compensation model to provide fair and inclusive pay practices across our business. We are committed to pay equity for employees
who hold the same jobs, work in the same geographic area, and have the same levels of experience and performance.
Employee Safety We provide our employees access to flexible and convenient health and welfare programs and workplace
accommodations. In response to the COVID-19 pandemic, we consulted with medical professionals to institute policies that best
protected our employees and their families, including a policy that requires the vast majority of our employees to be vaccinated. We
have prioritized self-care and emphasized a focus on wellness, providing personal protective equipment, flexible scheduling or
time-off options and implementing technologies to enhance the necessary remote-work environment. As we look to life and
operations beyond the pandemic, we are revising our business models to support flexible office space and at-home productivity for
many employees on a permanent basis.
Diversity, Equity and Inclusion We believe that championing diversity and fostering inclusion do more than just make us a better
company, they contribute to a world where people are empowered to be their very best. That is why one of our core values is to
stand for equality and why our mission is to inspire human progress through the power of communication and entertainment. This
focus on building a more diverse and inclusive workforce is underpinned by the unwavering commitment to ensure that employees
from any and every segment of society are treated with fairness and provided equal opportunities to advance in the company.
To have a diverse and inclusive workforce, we have put an emphasis on attracting and hiring talented people who represent a mix
of backgrounds, identities and experiences. Across the AT&T family of companies, we have employee groups that reflect our
diverse workforce. These groups are not only organized around women, people of color, LGBTQ+ individuals, people with
disabilities and veterans, but also around professionals who are experienced or interested in cybersecurity, engineering, innovation,
environmental issues, project management and media and entertainment technology. When everyone’s unique story is celebrated,
we are able to connect, create and innovate in real and meaningful ways. It is important that our employees feel valued, have a
sense of belonging and are fully engaged in our success.
ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS
In addition to the other information set forth in this document, including the matters contained under the caption “Cautionary
Language Concerning Forward-Looking Statements,” you should carefully read the matters described below. We believe that each
of these matters could materially affect our business. We recognize that most of these factors are beyond our ability to control and
therefore we cannot predict an outcome.
13
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Macro-economic Factors:
Adverse changes in the U.S. securities markets, interest rates and medical costs could materially increase our benefit plan
costs and future funding requirements.
Our costs to provide current benefits and funding for future benefits are subject to increases, primarily due to continuing increases
in medical and prescription drug costs, and can be affected by lower returns on assets held by our pension and other benefit plans,
which are reflected in our financial statements for that year. In calculating the recognized benefit costs, we have made certain
assumptions regarding future investment returns, interest rates and medical costs. These assumptions could change significantly
over time and could be materially different than originally projected. Lower than assumed investment returns, a decline in interest
rates with a corresponding increase in our benefit obligations, and higher than assumed medical and prescription drug costs will
increase expenses.
The Financial Accounting Standards Board requires companies to recognize the funded status of defined benefit pension and
postretirement plans as an asset or liability in their statement of financial position and to recognize changes in that funded status in
the year in which the changes occur. We have elected to reflect the annual adjustments to the funded status in our consolidated
statement of income. Therefore, an increase in our costs or adverse market conditions will have a negative effect on our operating
results.
Significant adverse changes in capital markets could result in the deterioration of our defined benefit plans’ funded status and result
in increased contribution requirements for such plans, which could be material.
Inflationary pressures on costs, such as inputs for devices we sell and network components, labor and distribution costs may
impact our network construction, our financial condition or results of operations.
As a provider of telecommunications and technology services, we sell handsets, wireless data cards, wireless computing devices
and customer premises equipment manufactured by various suppliers for use with our voice and data services and depend on
suppliers to provide us, directly or through other suppliers, with items such as network equipment, customer premises equipment,
and wireless-related equipment such as mobile hotspots, handsets, wirelessly enabled computers, wireless data cards and other
connected devices for our customers. In 2021 and the early part of 2022, the costs of these inputs and the costs of labor necessary to
develop and maintain our networks and our products and services have rapidly increased. In addition, many of these inputs are
subject to price fluctuations from a number of factors, including, but not limited to, market conditions, demand for raw materials
used in the production of these devices and network components, weather, climate change, energy costs, currency fluctuations,
supplier capacities, governmental actions, import and export requirements (including tariffs), and other factors beyond our control.
Although we are unable to predict the impact on our ability to source materials in the future, we expect these supply pressures to
continue into 2022. We also expect the pressures of input cost inflation to continue into 2022.
Our attempts to offset these cost pressures, such as through increases in the selling prices of some of our products and services, may
not be successful. Higher product prices may result in reductions in sales volume. Consumers may be less willing to pay a price
differential for our products and may increasingly purchase lower-priced offerings, or may forego some purchases altogether,
during an economic downturn. To the extent that price increases are not sufficient to offset these increased costs adequately or in a
timely manner, and/or if they result in significant decreases in sales volume, our business, financial condition or operating results
may be adversely affected. Furthermore, we may not be able to offset any cost increases through productivity and cost-saving
initiatives.
Adverse changes in global financial markets could limit our ability and our larger customers’ ability to access capital or
increase the cost of capital needed to fund business operations.
During 2021, uncertainty surrounding global growth rates and the impact of the COVID-19 pandemic continued to produce
volatility in the credit, currency and equity markets. Volatility may affect companies’ access to the credit markets, leading to higher
borrowing costs, or, in some cases, the inability to fund ongoing operations. In addition, we contract with large financial institutions
to support our own treasury operations, including contracts to hedge our exposure on interest rates and foreign exchange and the
funding of credit lines and other short-term debt obligations, including commercial paper. These financial institutions face stricter
capital-related and other regulations in the United States and Europe, as well as ongoing legal and financial issues concerning their
loan portfolios, which may hamper their ability to provide credit or raise the cost of providing such credit.
14
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
The U.K. Financial Conduct Authority, which regulates LIBOR, has announced that it intends to phase out LIBOR in 2023.
Although our securities may provide for alternative methods of calculating the interest rate payable on such indebtedness,
uncertainty as to the extent and manner of future changes may adversely affect the current trading market for LIBOR-based
securities and the value of variable rate indebtedness in general. A company’s cost of borrowing is also affected by evaluations
given by various credit rating agencies and these agencies have been applying tighter credit standards when evaluating debt levels
and future growth prospects. While we have been successful in continuing to access the credit and fixed income markets when
needed, adverse changes in the financial markets could render us either unable to access these markets or able to access these
markets only at higher interest costs and with restrictive financial or other conditions, severely affecting our business operations.
Additionally, downgrades of our credit rating by the major credit rating agencies could increase our cost of borrowing and also
impact the collateral we would be required to post under certain agreements we have entered into with our derivative
counterparties, which could negatively impact our liquidity. Further, valuation changes in our derivative portfolio due to interest
rates and foreign exchange rates could require us to post collateral and thus may negatively impact our liquidity.
Our international operations have increased our exposure to political instability, to changes in the international economy
and to the level of regulation on our business and these risks could offset our expected growth opportunities.
We have international operations, including in Mexico, and worldwide through WarnerMedia’s content distribution. We need to
comply with a wide variety of complex local laws, regulations and treaties. We are exposed to restrictions on cash repatriation,
foreign exchange controls, fluctuations in currency values, changes in relationships between U.S. and foreign governments, trade
restrictions including potential tariffs, differences in intellectual property protection laws, and other regulations that may affect
materially our earnings. Our Mexico operations, in particular, rely on a continuation of a regulatory regime that fosters competition.
While our foreign operations represent significant opportunities to sell our services, a number of foreign countries where we
operate have experienced unstable growth patterns, increased inflation, currency devaluation, foreign exchange controls, instability
in the banking sector and high unemployment. Should these conditions persist, our ability to offer service in one or more countries
could be adversely affected and customers in these countries may be unable to purchase the services we offer or pay for services
already provided.
In addition, operating in foreign countries also typically involves participating with local businesses, either to comply with local
laws or, for example, to enhance product marketing, deploy networks or execute on other capital projects. Involvement with foreign
firms exposes us to the risk of being unable to control the actions of those firms and therefore exposes us to risks associated with
our obligation to comply with the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act (FCPA). Violations of the FCPA could have a material adverse
effect on our operating results.
Industry-wide Factors:
Our business is subject to risks arising from the outbreak of the COVID-19 virus.
The COVID-19 pandemic and resulting mitigation measures have caused, and may continue to cause, a negative effect on our
operating results. At the onset in 2020, mitigation measures caused sports leagues to modify their seasons and suspend certain
operations, which adversely affected our advertising revenues and, resulted in contract disputes concerning carriage rights that
caused us to incur expenses relating to certain of these sporting events notwithstanding their cancellation. The closure or avoidance
of theaters, and the interruptions in movie production and other programming caused by COVID-19 are expected to continue to
impact the timing of revenues and may cause a loss of revenue to our WarnerMedia business over the long term. The COVID-19
pandemic also drove higher costs for our WarnerMedia business in 2021 based on the hybrid distribution model for releasing films
in 2021 and costs associated with safety measures put in place to help provide a safe environment for content production. If the
mitigation measures or the associated effects are prolonged, we expect business customers in industries most significantly impacted
will continue to reduce or terminate services, having a negative effect on the performance of our Business Wireline business unit.
Further, concerns over the COVID-19 pandemic could again result in the closure of many of our retail stores, temporarily or
permanently, and deter customers from accessing our stores even as the pandemic subsides. These pandemic concerns may also
result in continued impact to our customers’ ability to pay for our products and services. We may also continue to see significant
impact on roaming revenues due to a downturn in international travel. The COVID-19 pandemic has caused and could further cause
reduced staffing levels at our call centers and field operations, resulting in delays in service. Further reductions in staffing levels
could additionally limit our ability to provide services, adversely impacting our competitive position. We may also incur
significantly higher expenses attributable to infrastructure investments required to meet higher network utilization from more
customers consuming bandwidth from changes in work from home trends; extended cancellation periods; and increased labor costs
if the COVID-19 pandemic continues for an extended period.
15
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
The COVID-19 pandemic and mitigation measures have caused, and may continue to cause, adverse impacts on global economic
conditions and consumer confidence, spending and consumer behavior, which could affect demand for our products and services.
The extent to which the COVID-19 pandemic impacts our business, results of operations, cash flows and financial condition will
depend on future developments that are highly uncertain and cannot be predicted, including new information that may emerge
concerning other strains of the virus and the actions to contain its impact. Due to the speed with which the situation continues to
develop and change, we are not able at this time to estimate the additional impact of COVID-19 on our financial or operational
results, but the impact could be material.
Changes to federal, state and foreign government regulations and decisions in regulatory proceedings, as well as private
litigation, could further increase our operating costs and/or alter customer perceptions of our operations, which could
materially adversely affect us.
Our subsidiaries providing wired services are subject to significant federal and state regulation while many of our competitors are
not. In addition, our subsidiaries and affiliates operating outside the United States are also subject to the jurisdiction of national and
supranational regulatory authorities in the market where service is provided. Our wireless and various video subsidiaries are
regulated to varying degrees by the FCC and in some instances, by state and local agencies. Adverse regulations and rulings by the
FCC relating to broadband and wireless deployment could impede our ability to manage our networks and recover costs and lessen
incentives to invest in our networks. The continuing growth of IP-based services, especially when accessed by wireless devices, has
created or potentially could create conflicting regulation between the FCC and various state and local authorities, which may
involve lengthy litigation to resolve and may result in outcomes unfavorable to us. In addition, in response to the FAA questioning
whether our 5G C-band launch could impact radio altimeter equipment on airplanes, we voluntarily committed to a series of
temporary, precautionary measures, in addition to deferring turning on a limited number of towers around certain airports to allow
the FAA more time to evaluate. The FAA’s continued evaluation may impact our planned 5G C-band launch in certain areas. In
addition, increased public focus on a variety of issues related to our operations, such as privacy issues, government requests or
orders for customer data, and concerns about global climate changes, have led to proposals or new legislation at state, federal and
foreign government levels to change or increase regulation on our operations. Enactment of new privacy laws and regulations
could, among other things, adversely affect our ability to collect and offer targeted advertisements or result in additional costs of
compliance or litigation. Should customers decide that our competitors offer a more customer-friendly environment, our
competitive position, results of operations or financial condition could be materially adversely affected.
Effects of climate change may impose risk of damage to our infrastructure, our ability to provide services, and may cause
changes in federal, state and foreign government regulation, all of which may result in potential adverse impact to our
financial results.
Extreme weather events precipitated by long-term climate change have the potential to directly damage network facilities or disrupt
our ability to build and maintain portions of our network and could potentially disrupt suppliers’ ability to provide products and
services required to provide reliable network coverage. Any such disruption could delay network deployment plans, interrupt
service for our customers, increase our costs and have a negative effect on our operating results. The potential physical effects of
climate change, such as increased frequency and severity of storms, floods, fires, freezing conditions, sea-level rise, and other
climate-related events, could adversely affect our operations, infrastructure, and financial results. Operational impacts resulting
from the potential physical effects of climate change, such as damage to our network infrastructure, could result in increased costs
and loss of revenue. We could incur significant costs to improve the climate resiliency of our infrastructure and otherwise prepare
for, respond to, and mitigate such physical effects of climate change. We are not able to accurately predict the materiality of any
potential losses or costs associated with the physical effects of climate change.
Further, customers, consumers, investors and other stakeholders are increasingly focusing on environmental issues, including
climate change, water use, deforestation, plastic waste, and other sustainability concerns. Concern over climate change or other
environmental, social and governance (ESG) matters may result in new or increased legal and regulatory requirements to reduce or
mitigate impacts to the environment and reduce the impact of our business on climate change. Further, climate change regulations
may require us to alter our proposed business plans or increase our operating costs due to increased regulation or environmental
considerations, and could adversely affect our business and reputation.
16
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Continuing growth in and the converging nature of wireless and broadband services will require us to deploy significant
amounts of capital and require ongoing access to spectrum in order to provide attractive services to customers.
Wireless and broadband services are undergoing rapid and significant technological changes and a dramatic increase in usage, in
particular, the demand for faster and seamless usage of data, including video, across mobile and fixed devices. The COVID-19
pandemic has accelerated these changes and also resulted in higher network utilization, as more customers consume bandwidth
from changes in work from home trends. We must continually invest in our networks in order to improve our wireless and
broadband services to meet this increasing demand and changes in customer expectations, while remaining competitive.
Improvements in these services depend on many factors, including continued access to and deployment of adequate spectrum and
the capital needed to expand our wireline network to support transport of these services. In order to stem broadband subscriber
losses to cable competitors in our non-fiber wireline areas, we have been expanding our all-fiber wireline network. We must
maintain and expand our network capacity and coverage for transport of data, including video, and voice between cell and fixed
landline sites. To this end, we participate in spectrum auctions and continue to deploy software and other technology advancements
in order to efficiently invest in our network.
Network service enhancements and product launches may not occur as scheduled or at the cost expected due to many factors,
including delays in determining equipment and wireless handset operating standards, supplier delays, software issues, increases in
network and handset component costs, regulatory permitting delays for tower sites or enhancements, or labor-related delays.
Deployment of new technology also may adversely affect the performance of the network for existing services. If we cannot
acquire needed spectrum or deploy the services customers desire on a timely basis with acceptable quality and at reasonable costs,
then our ability to attract and retain customers, and, therefore, maintain and improve our operating margins, could be materially
adversely affected.
Increasing competition for wireless customers could materially adversely affect our operating results.
We have multiple wireless competitors in each of our service areas and compete for customers based principally on service/device
offerings, price, network quality, coverage area and customer service. In addition, we are facing growing competition from
providers offering services using advanced wireless technologies and IP-based networks. We expect market saturation to continue
to cause the wireless industry’s customer growth rate to moderate in comparison with historical growth rates, leading to increased
competition for customers. Our share of industry sales could be reduced due to aggressive pricing strategies pursued by
competitors. We also expect that our customers’ growing demand for high-speed video and data services will place constraints on
our network capacity. These competition and capacity constraints will continue to put pressure on pricing and margins as
companies compete for potential customers. Our ability to respond will depend, among other things, on continued improvement in
network quality and customer service and our ability to price our products and services competitively as well as effective marketing
of attractive products and services. These efforts will involve significant expenses and require strategic management decisions on,
and timely implementation of, equipment choices, network deployment and service offerings.
Intellectual property rights may be adversely affected by piracy or be inadequate to take advantage of business
opportunities, such as new distribution platforms, which may materially adversely affect our operations.
Increased piracy of video content, products and other intellectual property, particularly in our foreign WarnerMedia operations, will
decrease revenues. Technological developments have made it easier to reproduce and distribute high-quality unauthorized copies of
content. Piracy is particularly prevalent in countries that lack effective copyright and other legal protections or enforcement
measures and thieves can attract users throughout the world. Effective intellectual property protection may not be available in every
country where we operate. We may need to spend significant amounts of money to protect our rights. We are also increasingly
negotiating broader licensing agreements to expand our ability to use new methods to distribute content to customers. Any
impairment of our intellectual property rights, including due to changes in U.S. or foreign intellectual property laws or the absence
of effective legal protections or enforcement measures, or our inability to negotiate broader distribution rights, could materially
adversely impact our operations.
17
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Incidents leading to damage to our reputation, and any resulting lawsuits, claims or other legal proceedings, could have a
material adverse effect on our business.
We believe that our brand image, awareness and reputation strengthen our relationship with consumers and contribute significantly
to the success of our business. We strive to create a culture in which our colleagues act with integrity and respect and feel
comfortable speaking up to report instances of misconduct or other concerns. Our ability to attract and retain employees is highly
dependent upon our commitment to a diverse and inclusive workplace, ethical business practices and other qualities. Acts of
misconduct by any employee, and particularly by senior management, could erode trust and confidence and damage our reputation.
Negative public opinion could result from actual or alleged conduct by us or those currently or formerly associated with us, and
from any number of activities or circumstances, including operations, employment-related offenses (such as sexual harassment and
discrimination), regulatory compliance and actions taken by regulators or others in response to such conduct. We have in the past
been, and may in the future be, named as a defendant in lawsuits, claims and other legal proceedings that arise in the ordinary
course of our business based on alleged acts of misconduct by employees. These actions seek, among other things, compensation
for alleged personal injury (including claims for loss of life), workers’ compensation, employment discrimination, sexual
harassment, workplace misconduct, wage and hour claims and other employment-related damages, compensation for breach of
contract, statutory or regulatory claims, negligence or gross negligence, punitive damages, consequential damages, and civil
penalties or other losses or injunctive or declaratory relief. The outcome of any allegations, lawsuits, claims or legal proceedings is
inherently uncertain and could result in significant costs, damage to our brands or reputation and diversion of management’s
attention from our business. Additionally, our news organization makes editorial judgments around what is covered and how it is
covered in the normal course of business. Although we have disciplined practices that are used to make such editorial judgments, it
is possible that our news coverage alienates some consumers, adversely impacts our reputation and therefore impacts demand for
our other products and services. Any damage to our reputation or payments of significant amounts, even if reserved, could
materially and adversely affect our business, reputation, financial condition, results of operations and cash flows.
Company-Specific Financial Factors:
Adoption of new software-based technologies may involve quality and supply chain issues and could increase capital costs.
The communications and digital entertainment industry has experienced rapid changes in the past several years. An increasing
number of our customers are using mobile devices as the primary means of viewing video and an increasing number of
nontraditional video providers are developing content and technologies to satisfy the desire for video entertainment demand. In
addition, businesses and government bodies are broadly shifting to wireless-based services for homes and infrastructure to improve
services to their respective customers and constituencies. We have spent, and continue to spend, significant capital to shift our
wired network to software-based technology to manage this demand and are expanding 5G wireless technology to address these
consumer demands. We are entering into a significant number of software licensing agreements and working with software
developers to provide network functions in lieu of installing switches or other physical network equipment in order to respond to
rapid developments in video and wireless demand. While software-based functionality can be changed much more quickly than, for
example, physical switches, the rapid pace of development means that we may increasingly need to rely on single-source and
software solutions that have not previously been deployed in production environments. Should this software not function as
intended or our license agreements provide inadequate protection from intellectual property infringement claims, we could be
forced to either substitute (if available) or else spend time to develop alternative technologies at a much higher cost and incur harm
to our reputation for reliability, and, as a result, our ability to remain competitive could be materially adversely affected.
18
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
We depend on various suppliers to provide equipment to operate our business and satisfy customer demand and
interruption or delay in supply can adversely impact our operating results.
We depend on suppliers to provide us, directly or through other suppliers, with items such as network equipment, customer
premises equipment, and wireless-related equipment such as mobile hotspots, handsets, wirelessly enabled computers, wireless data
cards and other connected devices for our customers. These suppliers could fail to provide equipment on a timely basis, or fail to
meet our performance expectations, for a number of reasons, including difficulties in obtaining export licenses for certain
technologies, inability to secure component parts, general business disruption, natural disasters, safety issues, economic and
political instability and public health emergencies such as the COVID-19 pandemic. The COVID-19 pandemic has caused, and may
again cause, delays in the development, manufacturing (including the sourcing of key components) and shipment of products. In
certain limited circumstances, suppliers have been unable to supply products in a timely fashion. In such limited circumstances, we
have been unable to provide products and services precisely as and when requested by our customers. It is possible that, in some
circumstances, we could be forced to switch to a different key supplier. Because of the cost and time lag that can be associated with
transitioning from one supplier to another, our business could be substantially disrupted if we were required to, or chose to, replace
the products of one or more key suppliers with products from another source, especially if the replacement became necessary on
short notice. Any such disruption could increase our costs, decrease our operating efficiencies and have a negative effect on our
operating results.
Increasing costs to provide services and failure to renew agreements on favorable terms or at all, could adversely affect
operating margins.
Our operating costs, including customer acquisition and retention costs, could continue to put pressure on margins and customer
retention levels.
A number of our competitors offering comparable legacy services that rely on alternative technologies and business models are
typically subject to less (or no) regulation, and therefore are able to operate with lower costs. These competitors generally can focus
on discrete customer segments since they do not have regulatory obligations to provide universal service. Also, these competitors
have cost advantages compared to us, due in part to operating on newer, more technically advanced and lower-cost networks with a
nonunionized workforce, lower employee benefits and fewer retirees. We are transitioning services from our old copper-based
network and seeking regulatory approvals, where needed, at both the state and federal levels. If we do not obtain regulatory
approvals for our network transition or obtain approvals with onerous conditions, we could experience significant cost and
competitive disadvantages.
Our WarnerMedia operations, which create and license content to other providers, may experience increasing difficulties securing
favorable terms, including those related to pricing, positioning and packaging, during contract negotiations, which may lead to
blackouts of WarnerMedia programming, and WarnerMedia may face greater difficulty in achieving placement of its networks and
premium pay television services in offerings by third parties.
We may not realize or sustain the expected benefits from our business transformation initiatives, and these efforts could
have a materially adverse effect on our business, operations, financial condition, results of operations and competitive
position.
We have been and will be undertaking certain transformation initiatives, which are designed to reduce costs, streamline and
modernize distribution and customer service, remove redundancies and simplify and improve processes and support functions. Our
focus is on supporting added customer value with an improved customer experience. We intend for these efficiencies to enable
increased investments in our strategic areas of focus, which consist of improving broadband connectivity (for example, fiber and
5G), developing software-based entertainment (such as HBO Max) and utilizing WarnerMedia’s storytelling legacy to engage
consumers and gain insights across multiple distribution points. We also expect these initiatives to drive efficiencies and improved
margins. If we do not successfully manage and execute these initiatives, or if they are inadequate or ineffective, we may fail to meet
our financial goals and achieve anticipated benefits, improvements may be delayed, not sustained or not realized, and our business,
operations and competitive position could be adversely affected.
19
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
If our efforts to attract and retain subscribers to our HBO Max platform and to develop compelling choices are not
successful, our business will be adversely affected.
HBO Max’s future success is subject to inherent uncertainty. Our ability to continue to attract subscribers to the HBO Max platform
will depend in part on our ability to consistently provide subscribers with compelling content choices, as well as a quality
experience for selecting and viewing those content choices. Furthermore, the relative service levels, content offerings, promotions,
and pricing and related features of competitors to HBO Max may adversely impact our ability to attract and retain subscribers. If
consumers do not perceive our offerings to be of value, including if we introduce new or adjust existing features, adjust pricing or
offerings, terminate or modify promotional or trial period offerings, experience technical issues, or change the mix of content in a
manner that is not favorably received by them, we may not be able to attract and retain subscribers. In addition, many subscribers to
these types of offerings originate from word-of-mouth advertising from then existing subscribers. If our efforts to satisfy
subscribers are not successful, including because we terminate or modify promotional or trial-period offerings or because of
technical issues with the platform, we may not be able to attract or retain subscribers, and as a result, our ability to maintain and/or
grow our business will be adversely affected.
If subscribers cancel or decide to not continue subscriptions for any reason, including a perception that they do not use it
sufficiently, the need to cut household expenses, unsatisfactory availability of content, promotions or trial-period offers expire or
are modified, competitive services or promotions provide a better value or experience, and customer service or technical issues are
not satisfactorily resolved, our business will be adversely affected. We must continually add new subscribers both to replace
canceled subscribers and to grow our business. If we do not grow as expected, given, in particular, that a significant portion of our
content costs are committed and contracted over several years based on minimum subscriber delivery levels, we may not be able to
adjust our expenditures or increase our (per subscriber) revenues commensurate with the lowered growth rate such that our
margins, liquidity and results of operations may be adversely impacted. If we are unable to successfully compete with competitors
in retaining and attracting new subscribers, our business will be adversely affected. Further, if excessive numbers of subscribers do
cancel, we may be required to incur significantly higher marketing expenditures or offer significantly more generous promotions to
replace these subscribers with new subscribers.
Unfavorable litigation or governmental investigation results could require us to pay significant amounts or lead to onerous
operating procedures.
We are subject to a number of lawsuits both in the United States and in foreign countries, including, at any particular time, claims
relating to antitrust; patent infringement; wage and hour; personal injury; customer privacy violations; regulatory proceedings; and
selling and collection practices. We also spend substantial resources complying with various government standards, which may
entail related investigations and litigation. In the wireless area, we also face current and potential litigation relating to alleged
adverse health effects on customers or employees who use such technologies including, for example, wireless devices. We may
incur significant expenses defending such suits or government charges and may be required to pay amounts or otherwise change
our operations in ways that could materially adversely affect our operations or financial results.
Cyberattacks, equipment failures, natural disasters and terrorist acts may materially adversely affect our operations.
Cyberattacks, major equipment failures or natural disasters, such as flooding, hurricanes and forest fires, whether caused by
discrete severe weather events and/or precipitated by long-term climate change and earthquakes, software problems, data and
privacy breaches, terrorist acts or other breaches of network or IT security that affect our networks, including software and
switches, microwave links, third-party-owned local and long-distance networks on which we rely, our cell sites or other equipment,
our satellites, our customer account support and information systems, or employee and business records could have a material
adverse effect on our operations. Our wired network in particular is becoming increasingly reliant on software as it evolves to
handle increasing demands for video transmission. While we have been subject to security incidents or cyberattacks, these did not
result in a material adverse effect on our operations. However, as such attacks continue to increase in scope and frequency, we may
be unable to prevent a significant attack in the future. Our inability to deploy or operate our networks or customer support systems
or protect sensitive personal information of customers or employees or valuable technical and marketing information could result in
significant expenses, potential legal liability, a loss of current or future customers and reputation damage, any of which could have
a material adverse effect on our operations and financial condition.
20
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Increases in our debt levels to fund spectrum purchases, or other strategic decisions could adversely affect our ability to
finance future debt at attractive rates and reduce our ability to respond to competition and adverse economic trends.
We have incurred debt to fund significant acquisitions, as well as spectrum purchases needed to compete in our industry. While we
believe such decisions were prudent and necessary to take advantage of both growth opportunities and respond to industry
developments, we did experience credit-rating downgrades from historical levels. Banks and potential purchasers of our publicly
traded debt may decide that these strategic decisions and similar actions we may take in the future, as well as expected trends in the
industry, will continue to increase the risk of investing in our debt and may demand a higher rate of interest, impose restrictive
covenants or otherwise limit the amount of potential borrowing. Additionally, our capital allocation plan is focused on, among other
things, managing our debt level going forward. Any failure to successfully execute this plan could adversely affect our cost of
funds, liquidity, competitive position and access to capital markets.
Our business may be impacted by changes in tax laws and regulations, judicial interpretations of same or administrative
actions by federal, state, local and foreign taxing authorities.
Tax laws are dynamic and subject to change as new laws are passed and new interpretations of the law are issued or applied. In
many cases, the application of existing, newly enacted or amended tax laws (such as the U.S. Tax Cuts and Jobs Act of 2017) may
be uncertain and subject to differing interpretations, especially when evaluated against ever changing products and services
provided by our global telecommunications, media, and technology businesses. In addition, tax legislation has been introduced or is
being considered in various jurisdictions that could significantly impact our tax rate, tax liabilities, and carrying value of deferred
tax assets or deferred tax liabilities. Any of these changes could materially impact our financial performance and our tax provision,
net income and cash flows.
We are also subject to ongoing examinations by taxing authorities in various jurisdictions. Although we regularly assess the
likelihood of an adverse outcome resulting from these examinations to determine the adequacy of provisions for taxes, there can be
no assurance as to the outcome of these examinations. In the event that we have not accurately or fully described, disclosed or
determined, calculated or remitted amounts that were due to taxing authorities or if the ultimate determination of our taxes owed is
for an amount in excess of amounts previously accrued, we could be subject to additional taxes, penalties and interest, which could
materially impact our business, financial condition and operating results.
The proposed separation and combination of our WarnerMedia business with Discovery may not be completed on the
currently contemplated timeline or at all.
On May 17, 2021, we announced a definitive agreement with Discovery, Inc. (Discovery) to combine our WarnerMedia business
with Discovery (the “WarnerMedia/Discovery Transaction”), which, if consummated, would result in our stockholders owning 71%
of the combined company’s Discovery’s outstanding common stock on a fully diluted basis (computed using the treasury stock
method). The WarnerMedia/Discovery Transaction is expected to close in the second quarter of 2022, subject to certain customary
closing conditions including, among others, the approval of Discovery’s stockholders, the receipt of certain regulatory approvals
and the finalization of a private letter ruling from the Internal Revenue Service (IRS) to the effect that the separation of the
WarnerMedia business and certain related transactions will qualify for tax-free treatment under the Internal Revenue Code (the
“Private Letter Ruling”).
There can be no assurance that such closing conditions will be satisfied or waived, or that the WarnerMedia/Discovery Transaction
will be consummated. Required regulatory approvals may not be received in a timely manner or at all. Further, while we have
entered into voting agreements with certain stockholders of Discovery representing, in the aggregate, approximately 43% of the
voting power of the issued and outstanding shares of Discovery capital stock as of May 14, 2021, pursuant to which they have
agreed to vote in favor of certain aspects of the WarnerMedia/Discovery Transaction, we cannot assure you that the approval of
Discovery’s stockholders will be obtained. We and Discovery may be subject to shareholder lawsuits, or other actions filed in
connection with or in opposition to the WarnerMedia/Discovery Transaction, which could prevent or delay the consummation of
the WarnerMedia/Discovery Transaction.
If the distribution of WarnerMedia, together with certain related transactions, were to fail to qualify for non-recognition
treatment for U.S. federal income tax purposes, then we could be subject to significant tax liability.
Under the Merger Agreement, receipt of the Private Letter Ruling from the IRS is a condition to close the WarnerMedia/Discovery
Transaction. On December 28, 2021, AT&T received a favorable Private Letter Ruling from the IRS. As long as the Private Letter
Ruling continues to be in full force and effect until closing, AT&T expects that the receipt of the Private Letter Ruling satisfies the
closing condition for an IRS ruling. While not anticipated, situations where a Private Letter Ruling could cease to be in full force
and effect may include situations where there is a material change in applicable tax law, or a material change to the terms or
structure of the transaction. Reliance on the ruling is also subject to certain facts, representations and undertakings made in
connection with the request for the ruling.
21
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Accordingly, the IRS or another applicable tax authority could determine on audit that the distribution by us of WarnerMedia to our
stockholders and certain related transactions should be treated as taxable transactions if it determines that any of these facts,
representations or undertakings are incorrect or have been violated. We may be entitled to indemnification from Discovery in the
case of certain breaches of representations or undertakings by Discovery under the tax matters agreement related to the
WarnerMedia/Discovery Transaction. However, we could potentially be required to pay such tax prior to reimbursement from
Discovery, and such indemnification is subject to Discovery’s credit risk. If the IRS or another tax authority were to so conclude,
there could be a material adverse impact on our business, financial condition, results of operations and cash flows.
In addition, in the event that we are unable to effectuate a Spinco Debt Exchange, we could incur significant incremental tax
liability associated with the WarnerMedia/Discovery Transaction. If certain conditions are met, Discovery generally will be
responsible for 50% of such incremental tax liability that does not exceed $4,000. For more information regarding the Spinco Debt
Exchange, refer to the risk factor titled “Even if the WarnerMedia/Discovery Transaction is completed, we may not realize some or
all of the expected benefits of the transaction” below.
The announcement and pendency of the WarnerMedia/Discovery Transaction could cause disruptions in our business.
The WarnerMedia/Discovery Transaction will require significant amounts of time and effort, which could divert management’s
attention from operating, growing our business and other strategic endeavors. Further, our employees may be distracted due to
uncertainty regarding their future roles with us or the WarnerMedia business pending the consummation of the
WarnerMedia/Discovery Transaction. In the event that the WarnerMedia/Discovery Transaction does not close, we will be required
to bear a number of non-recurring costs in connection with the transaction, including financial, legal, accounting, consulting and
other advisory fees and expenses, reorganization and restructuring costs, severance/employee benefit-related expenses, regulatory
and SEC filing fees and expenses, printing expenses and other related charges. Until the consummation or termination of the
WarnerMedia/Discovery Transaction, we are also required to operate the WarnerMedia business in the ordinary course and we are
restricted from taking certain specified actions with respect to our WarnerMedia business without Discovery’s consent. Any of the
foregoing could adversely affect our operating results.
Even if the WarnerMedia/Discovery Transaction is completed, we may not realize some or all of the expected benefits of the
transaction.
Even if the WarnerMedia/Discovery Transaction is completed, the anticipated operational, financial, strategic and other benefits of
such transaction to the Company and our stockholders may not be achieved. There are many factors that could impact the
anticipated benefits from the WarnerMedia/Discovery Transaction, including, among others, strategic adjustments required to
reflect the nature of our business following the WarnerMedia/Discovery Transaction and any negative reaction to the
WarnerMedia/Discovery Transaction by our customers and business partners. In addition, we have agreed to provide certain
transition services to the combined company, which may result in additional expenses and may divert our focus and resources that
would otherwise be invested into maintaining or growing our businesses.
In connection with the WarnerMedia/Discovery Transaction, we will receive approximately $43,000, subject to certain adjustments,
in the form of a combination of (i) the assumption by the WarnerMedia business of certain existing debt, (ii) a cash dividend
distributed to us from the WarnerMedia business (the “Spinco Special Cash Payment”), and (iii) debt instruments of the
WarnerMedia business (the “Spinco Debt Distribution”). We expect to deliver such debt instruments of WarnerMedia in exchange
for certain of our outstanding debt obligations (the “Spinco Debt Exchange”), and to use the proceeds of the Spinco Special Cash
Payment to repay certain of our other outstanding debt obligations. This process will be complex and may require significant time
and resources. Depending on various variables (such as interest rates and timing) at the time of the Spinco Debt Exchange, AT&T’s
transaction costs relating to the Spinco Debt Exchange may be significantly higher than expected. Additionally, if market
conditions change in advance of the Spinco Debt Exchange such that it is no longer feasible for the WarnerMedia business to issue
debt securities with a fair market value at least equal to their face value, we may be required to take an additional distribution of
cash from the WarnerMedia business in lieu of effecting the Spinco Debt Exchange, which could result in potentially significant
incremental tax liability. If certain conditions are met, Discovery generally will be responsible for 50% of such incremental tax
liability that does not exceed $4,000.
An inability to realize the full extent of the anticipated benefits of the WarnerMedia/Discovery Transaction, as well as any
delays encountered in the process, could have an adverse effect on our revenues, level of expenses and operating results.
In connection with the separation of the WarnerMedia business and the completed transaction involving our Video business unit,
certain liabilities will be or were allocated to or retained by us and we will be subject to indemnification obligations in respect of
those liabilities.
22
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
In connection with the separation of the WarnerMedia business and the completed transaction involving our Video business unit
(the “DTV Transaction”), we have agreed to assume or retain, and indemnify the WarnerMedia business and the Video business
unit for, certain liabilities. Payments pursuant to these indemnities may be significant and could negatively impact our business,
particularly indemnities relating to our actions that could impact the tax-free nature of the distribution of the WarnerMedia
business. Third parties could also seek to hold us responsible for any liabilities allocated to the WarnerMedia business and the
Video business unit and such third parties could seek damages, other monetary penalties (whether civil or criminal) and other
remedies.
The separation of the WarnerMedia business and the Video business unit may result in an increase in our costs and
expenses.
Following the consummation of the WarnerMedia/Discovery Transaction and the DTV Transaction, we will no longer benefit from
economies of scale and synergies we currently have or expected to realize between our WarnerMedia business, our Video business
unit and our remaining businesses, including through intercompany arrangements and combined agreements with third parties.
There can be no assurance that we will be able to continue any of these arrangements, or that any such continuing arrangements
will be on the same or more favorable terms, following the separation of the WarnerMedia business and the Video business unit.
Additionally, there can be no assurance that costs retained by AT&T after the WarnerMedia/Discovery Transaction and the DTV
Transaction will be fully recovered through transition service agreements or business transformation initiatives. As a result, our
costs and expenses may increase following the consummation of the WarnerMedia/Discovery Transaction and the DTV
Transaction.
23
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
CAUTIONARY LANGUAGE CONCERNING FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS
Information set forth in this report contains forward-looking statements that are subject to risks and uncertainties, and actual results
could differ materially. Many of these factors are discussed in more detail in the “Risk Factors” section. We claim the protection of
the safe harbor for forward-looking statements provided by the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995.
The following factors could cause our future results to differ materially from those expressed in the forward-looking statements:
•The severity, magnitude and duration of the COVID-19 pandemic and containment, mitigation and other measures taken in
response, including the potential impacts of these matters on our business and operations.
•Our inability to predict the extent to which the COVID-19 pandemic and related impacts will continue to impact our business
operations, financial performance and results of operations.
•Adverse economic, political and/or capital access changes in the markets served by us or in countries in which we have
significant investments and/or operations, including the impact on customer demand and our ability and our suppliers’ ability
to access financial markets at favorable rates and terms.
•Increases in our benefit plans’ costs, including increases due to adverse changes in the United States and foreign securities
markets, resulting in worse-than-assumed investment returns and discount rates; adverse changes in mortality assumptions;
adverse medical cost trends; and unfavorable or delayed implementation or repeal of healthcare legislation, regulations or
related court decisions.
•The final outcome of FCC and other federal, state or foreign government agency proceedings (including judicial review, if any,
of such proceedings) and legislative efforts involving issues that are important to our business, including, without limitation,
pending Notices of Apparent Liability; the transition from legacy technologies to IP-based infrastructure, including the
withdrawal of legacy TDM-based services; universal service; broadband deployment; wireless equipment siting regulations
and, in particular, siting for 5G service; E911 services; competition policy; privacy; net neutrality; multichannel video
programming distributor services and equipment; content licensing and copyright protection; availability of new spectrum on
fair and balanced terms; and wireless and satellite license awards and renewals.
•Enactment of additional state, local, federal and/or foreign regulatory and tax laws and regulations, or changes to existing
standards and actions by tax agencies and judicial authorities including the resolution of disputes with any taxing jurisdictions,
pertaining to our subsidiaries and foreign investments, including laws and regulations that reduce our incentive to invest in our
networks, resulting in lower revenue growth and/or higher operating costs.
•Potential changes to the electromagnetic spectrum currently used for broadcast television and satellite distribution being
considered by the FCC could negatively impact WarnerMedia’s ability to deliver linear network feeds of its domestic cable
networks to its affiliates, and in some cases, WarnerMedia’s ability to produce high-value news and entertainment
programming on location.
•U.S. and foreign laws and regulations regarding intellectual property rights protection and privacy, personal data protection and
user consent are complex and rapidly evolving and could result in adverse impacts to our business plans, increased costs, or
claims against us that may harm our reputation.
•The ability of our competitors to offer product/service offerings at lower prices due to lower cost structures and regulatory and
legislative actions adverse to us, including non-regulation of comparable alternative technologies and/or government-owned or
subsidized networks.
•Disruption in our supply chain for a number of reasons, including, difficulties in obtaining export licenses for certain
technology, inability to secure component parts, general business disruption, workforce shortage, natural disasters, safety
issues, economic and political instability and public health emergencies.
•The continued development and delivery of attractive and profitable wireless, video content and broadband offerings and
devices, and, in particular, the success of our HBO Max platform; the extent to which regulatory and build-out requirements
apply to our offerings; our ability to match speeds offered by our competitors and the availability, cost and/or reliability of the
various technologies and/or content required to provide such offerings.
•Our ability to generate subscription and advertising revenue from attractive video content, especially from WarnerMedia, in the
face of unpredictable and rapidly evolving public viewing habits and legal restrictions on using personal data for advertising.
•The availability and cost and our ability to adequately fund additional wireless spectrum and network upgrades; and
regulations and conditions relating to spectrum use, licensing, obtaining additional spectrum, technical standards and
deployment and usage, including network management rules.
•Our ability to manage growth in wireless data services, including network quality and acquisition of adequate spectrum at
reasonable costs and terms.
•The outcome of pending, threatened or potential litigation (which includes arbitrations), including, without limitation, patent
and product safety claims by or against third parties or claims based on alleged misconduct by employees.
24
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
•The impact from major equipment or software failures on our networks; the effect of security breaches related to the network
or customer information; our inability to obtain handsets, equipment/software or have handsets, equipment/software serviced
in a timely and cost-effective manner from suppliers; or severe weather conditions including flooding and hurricanes, natural
disasters including earthquakes and forest fires, pandemics, energy shortages, wars or terrorist attacks.
•The issuance by the Financial Accounting Standards Board or other accounting oversight bodies of new accounting standards
or changes to existing standards.
•Changes in our corporate strategies to respond to competition and regulatory, legislative and technological developments.
•The uncertainty surrounding further congressional action regarding spending and taxation, which may result in changes in
government spending and affect the ability and willingness of businesses and consumers to spend in general.
•Our ability to realize or sustain the expected benefits of our business transformation initiatives, which are designed to reduce
costs, streamline distribution, remove redundancies and simplify and improve processes and support functions.
•Our ability to successfully complete divestitures, including the separation of the WarnerMedia business, as well as achieve our
expectations regarding the financial impact of the completed and/or pending transactions.
Readers are cautioned that other factors discussed in this report, although not enumerated here, also could materially affect our
future earnings.
ITEM 2. PROPERTIES
Our properties do not lend themselves to description by character and location of principal units. At December 31, 2021, of our
total property, plant and equipment, central office equipment represented 30%; outside plant (including cable, wiring and other non-
central office network equipment) represented 24%; other equipment, comprised principally of wireless network equipment
attached to towers, furniture and office equipment and vehicles and other work equipment, represented 26%; land, building and
wireless communications towers represented 13%; and other miscellaneous property represented 7%.
For our Communications segment, substantially all of the installations of central office equipment are located in buildings and on
land we own. Many garages, administrative and business offices, wireless towers, telephone centers and retail stores are leased.
Property on which communication towers are located may be either owned or leased.
For our WarnerMedia segment, we own or lease offices; studios; technical, production and warehouse spaces; communications
facilities and other properties in numerous locations globally.
ITEM 3. LEGAL PROCEEDINGS
We are a party to numerous lawsuits, regulatory proceedings and other matters arising in the ordinary course of business. As of the
date of this report, we do not believe any pending legal proceedings to which we or our subsidiaries are subject are required to be
disclosed as material legal proceedings pursuant to this item, but have included the below as a matter of general information.
Recently, the U.S. Attorney’s Office for the Northern District of Illinois informed us that they are considering filing a charge
against one of our subsidiaries, Illinois Bell Telephone Company, LLC (Illinois Bell), arising out of a single, nine-month consulting
contract in 2017 worth twenty-two thousand five hundred dollars. Since 2019, Illinois Bell has been cooperating with the U.S.
Attorney’s Office concerning their widely reported investigation of certain elected Illinois politicians and related parties for
corruption. Based on our own extensive investigation of the facts and our engagement with the U.S. Attorney's Office, we have
concluded that the contract at issue was legal in all respects and that any charge against Illinois Bell or its personnel would be
without merit. We cannot predict the outcome of the government’s investigation, which could (i) result in criminal penalties, fines,
or other remedial measures, (ii) adversely affect our reputation with customers, regulators, and other stakeholders, and (iii) impact
our existing federal and state government contracts and our ability to win new contracts in the future.
ITEM 4. MINE SAFETY DISCLOSURES
Not applicable.
25
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Information about our Executive Officers
(As of February 1, 2022)
Name Age Position Held Since
John T. Stankey 59 Chief Executive Officer and President 7/2020
Pascal Desroches 57 Senior Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer 4/2021
Edward W. Gillespie 60Senior Executive Vice President - External and Legislative Affairs,
AT&T Services, Inc. 4/2020
David S. Huntley 63 Senior Executive Vice President and Chief Compliance Officer 12/2014
Jason Kilar 50 Chief Executive Officer, Warner Media, LLC 5/2020
Lori M. Lee 56Chief Executive Officer-AT&T Latin America and Global Marketing
Officer 8/2017
David R. McAtee II 53 Senior Executive Vice President and General Counsel 10/2015
Jeffery S. McElfresh 51 Chief Executive Officer, AT&T Communications, LLC 10/2019
Angela R. Santone 50 Senior Executive Vice President - Human Resources 12/2019
The above executive officers have held high-level managerial positions with AT&T or its subsidiaries for more than the past five
years, except for Mr. Desroches, Mr. Gillespie, Mr. Kilar and Ms. Santone. Executive officers are not appointed to a fixed term of
office.
Mr. Desroches was previously Executive Vice President of Finance of AT&T from November 2020 to March 2021, Executive Vice
President and Chief Financial Officer of WarnerMedia from June 2018 to November 2020 and Executive Vice President and Chief
Financial Officer of Turner Broadcasting Systems Inc. from January 2015 to June 2018.
Mr. Gillespie was previously Managing Director of Sard Verbinnen & Co. from June 2018 to April 2020, Founder and Principal of
Ed Gillespie Strategies from February 2009 to December 2016, and Counselor to the President for George W. Bush, Executive
Office of the President at The White House, from July 2007 to January 2009.
Mr. Kilar was previously Co-Founder and Chief Executive Officer of Vessel from 2013 to 2017 and Founder and Chief Executive
Officer of Hulu from 2007 to 2013.
Ms. Santone was previously Chief Administrative Officer of AT&T from May 2019 to December 2019, Executive Vice President
and Global Chief Human Resources Officer of Turner from February 2016 to April 2019, and Senior Vice President and Chief
Human Resources Officer of Turner from June 2013 to January 2016.
26
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
PART II
ITEM 5. MARKET FOR REGISTRANT’S COMMON EQUITY, RELATED STOCKHOLDER MATTERS AND ISSUER
PURCHASES OF EQUITY SECURITIES
Our common stock is listed on the New York Stock Exchange under the ticker symbol “T”. The number of stockholders of record
as of December 31, 2021 and 2020 was 817,330 and 858,373. The number of stockholders of record as of February 11, 2022, was
814,326. We declared dividends on common stock, on a quarterly basis, totaling $2.08 per share in 2021 and $2.08 per share in
2020.
STOCK PERFORMANCE GRAPH
The comparison above assumes $100 invested on December 31, 2016, in AT&T common stock and the following Standard &
Poor’s (S&P) Indices: S&P 500 Index and S&P 500 Communications Services Index. Total return equals stock price appreciation
plus reinvestment of dividends.
27
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Our Board of Directors has approved the following authorization to repurchase common stock: March 2014 authorization program
for 300 million shares, with 178 million outstanding at December 31, 2021. To implement this authorization, we used open market
repurchases, relying on Rule 10b5-1 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, where feasible. We also used accelerated share
repurchase agreements with large financial institutions to repurchase our stock. We will continue to fund any share repurchases
through a combination of cash from operations, borrowings dependent on market conditions, or cash from the disposition of certain
non-strategic investments.
Excluding the impact of acquisitions, our 2022 financing activities will focus on managing our debt level and paying dividends,
subject to approval by our Board of Directors. We plan to fund our financing uses of cash through a combination of cash from
operations, issuance of debt and asset sales. The timing and mix of any debt issuance and/or refinancing will be guided by credit
market conditions and interest rate trends.
A summary of our repurchases of common stock during the fourth quarter of 2021 is as follows:
ISSUER PURCHASES OF EQUITY SECURITIES
(a) (b) (c) (d)
PeriodTotal Number of
Shares (or Units)
PurchasedAverage Price Paid Per
Share (or Unit)Total Number of
Shares (or Units)
Purchased
as Part of Publicly
Announced Plans or
ProgramsMaximum Number (or
Approximate Dollar
Value) of Shares (or
Units) That May Yet Be
Purchased Under The
Plans or Programs
October 1, 2021 -
October 31, 2021 265,408 $ 27.14 — 177,902,921
November 1, 2021 -
November 30, 2021 56,662 $ 24.96 — 177,902,921
December 1, 2021 -
December 31, 2021 120,417 $ 22.96 — 177,902,921
Total 442,487 $ 25.72 — 
In March 2014, our Board of Directors approved an authorization to repurchase up to 300 million shares of our common stock. The
authorization has no expiration date.
Of the shares purchased, 442,487 shares were acquired through the withholding of taxes on the vesting of restricted stock and performance
shares or in respect of the exercise price of options.
Of the shares repurchased or transferred, no shares were transferred from AT&T  maintained Voluntary Employee Benefit Association (VEBA)
trusts.1,2,3 1
1
2
3
28
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
ITEM 6. [RESERVED]
ITEM 7. MANAGEMENT’S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF
OPERATIONS
OVERVIEW
AT&T Inc. is referred to as “we,” “AT&T” or the “Company” throughout this document, and the names of the particular
subsidiaries and affiliates providing the services generally have been omitted. AT&T is a holding company whose subsidiaries and
affiliates operate worldwide in the telecommunications, media and technology industries. You should read this discussion in
conjunction with the consolidated financial statements and accompanying notes (Notes).
Our Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations included in this document generally
discusses 2021 and 2020 items and year-to-year comparisons between 2021 and 2020. Discussions of 2019 items and year-to-year
comparisons between 2020 and 2019 that are not included in this document can be found in “Management’s Discussion and
Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations” in exhibit 99.1, revised Item 7 of our Annual Report on Form 10-K for
the fiscal year ended December 31, 2020, filed on Form 8-K on June 21, 2021.
On July 31, 2021, we closed our transaction with TPG Capital (TPG) to form a new company named DIRECTV Entertainment
Holdings, LLC (DIRECTV). With the close of the transaction, we separated our Video business, comprised of our U.S. video
operations, and began accounting for our investment in DIRECTV under the equity method. On November 15, 2021, we sold or
Latin America video operations, Vrio, to Grupo Werthein. (See Note 6)
We have three reportable segments: (1) Communications, (2) WarnerMedia and (3) Latin America. Our segment results presented
in Note 4 and discussed below follow our internal management reporting. We analyze our segments based on segment operating
contribution, which consists of operating income, excluding acquisition-related costs and other significant items and equity in net
income (loss) of affiliates for investments managed within each segment. Each segment’s percentage calculation of total segment
operating revenue and contribution is derived from our segment results table in Note 4 and may total more than 100% due to losses
in one or more segments. Percentage increases and decreases that are not considered meaningful are denoted with a dash.
Percent Change
2021 2020 2019 2021 vs. 2020 2020 vs. 2019
Operating Revenues
Communications $ 114,730 $ 109,965 $ 109,969 4.3  % — %
WarnerMedia 35,632 30,442 35,259 17.0 (13.7)
Latin America 5,354 5,716 6,963 (6.3) (17.9)
Corporate and Other:
Corporate 1,264 2,207 2,131 (42.7) 3.6 
Video 15,513 28,610 32,124 (45.8) (10.9)
Eliminations and consolidation (3,629) (5,180) (5,253) 29.9 1.4 
AT&T Operating Revenues 168,864 171,760 181,193 (1.7) (5.2)
Operating Contribution
Communications 28,279 28,313 29,815 (0.1) (5.0)
WarnerMedia 7,277 8,210 10,659 (11.4) (23.0)
Latin America (430) (729) (635) 41.0 (14.8)
Segment Operating Contribution $ 35,126 $ 35,794 $ 39,839 (1.9) (10.2)
Corporate and Other (11,148) (29,294) (11,878) 61.9 — 
AT&T Operating Contribution $ 23,978 $ 6,500 $ 27,961 — % (76.8)%
Includes the reclassification of prior service credit amortization and retained costs previously allocated to Video, the Video business separated
in July 2021, acquisition-related and certain significant items, and eliminations and consolidations. See Note 4 for additional details and
amounts included in Corporate and Other .1
1
29
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
The Communications segment accounted for approximately 74% of our 2021 total segment operating revenues compared to 75%
in 2020 and 81% of our 2021 total segment operating contribution as compared to 79% in 2020. This segment provides services to
businesses and consumers located in the U.S. and businesses globally. Our business strategies reflect bundled product offerings that
cut across product lines and utilize shared assets. This segment contains the following business units:
•Mobility provides nationwide wireless service and equipment.
•Business Wireline provides advanced IP-based services, as well as traditional voice and data services and related equipment to
business customers.
•Consumer Wireline provides internet, including broadband fiber, and legacy telephony voice communication services to
residential customers.
The WarnerMedia segment accounted for approximately 23% of our 2021 total segment operating revenues compared to 21% in
2020 and 21% of our 2021 total segment operating contribution compared to 23% in 2020. This segment develops, produces and
distributes feature films, television, gaming and other content in various physical and digital formats globally. WarnerMedia content
is distributed through basic networks, Direct-to-Consumer (DTC) or theatrical, TV content and games licensing. Segment results
also include Xandr advertising and Otter Media Holdings (Otter Media). We disposed of substantially all of the Otter Media assets
in the third quarter of 2021 (see Note 6).
The Latin America segment accounted for approximately 3% of our 2021 total segment operating revenues compared to 4% in
2020. This segment provides wireless services and equipment in Mexico, and prior to the November 2021 disposition of Vrio,
video services in Latin America and the Caribbean (see Note 6).
RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
Consolidated Results Our financial results are summarized in the following table. We then discuss factors affecting our overall
results. Additional analysis is discussed in our “Segment Results” section. We also discuss our expected revenue and expense trends
for 2022 in the “Operating Environment and Trends of the Business” section. Certain prior-period amounts have been reclassified
to conform to the current period’s presentation.
Percent Change
2021 2020 20192021 vs.
20202020 vs.
2019
Operating revenues
Service $146,391 $152,767 $163,499 (4.2) % (6.6) %
Equipment 22,473 18,993 17,694 18.3 7.3 
Total Operating Revenues 168,864 171,760 181,193 (1.7) (5.2)
Operating expenses
Operations and support 117,751 117,959 123,563 (0.2) (4.5)
Asset impairments and
abandonments 4,904 18,880 1,458 (74.0) — 
Depreciation and amortization 22,862 28,516 28,217 (19.8) 1.1 
Total Operating Expenses 145,517 165,355 153,238 (12.0) 7.9 
Operating Income 23,347 6,405 27,955 — (77.1)
Interest expense 6,884 7,925 8,422 (13.1) (5.9)
Equity in net income of
affiliates 631 95 6 — — 
Other income (expense) – net 9,853 (1,431) (1,071) — (33.6)
Income (Loss) Before Income
Taxes 26,947 (2,856) 18,468 — — 
Net Income (Loss) 21,479 (3,821) 14,975 — — 
Net Income (Loss) Attributable
to AT&T 20,081 (5,176) 13,903 — — 
Net Income (Loss) Attributable
to
Common Stock $ 19,874 $ (5,369)$ 13,900 — % — %
30
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
OVERVIEW
Operating revenues decreased in 2021, with declines reflecting our July 31, 2021 separation of the U.S. video business, the
completion of the sale of our Vrio business unit in November 2021 and the October 2020 sale of wireless and wireline operations in
Puerto Rico and the U.S. Virgin Islands. Also contributing to revenue declines was lower Business Wireline revenues due in part to
higher demand for pandemic-related connectivity in the prior year. Partially offsetting declines were higher Mobility equipment and
service revenues and gains in broadband service in our Communications segment; higher content and DTC subscription revenues in
our WarnerMedia segment; and growth in Mexico wireless operations including favorable foreign exchange impacts.
Operations and support expenses decreased in 2021, with declines reflecting our business divestitures, lower bad debt expense
and lower personnel costs associated with our ongoing transformation initiatives. Declines were mostly offset by increased
domestic wireless equipment expense from higher volumes, and higher WarnerMedia programming costs and marketing activities.
Asset impairments and abandonments decreased in 2021, with higher impairments in 2020. Noncash impairment charges in
2020 included $15,508, resulting from our assessment of the recoverability of the long-lived assets and goodwill associated with
our U.S. video business (see Notes 7 and 9); $2,212 goodwill impairment at our Vrio business unit (see Note 9); and $780 from the
impairment of production and other content inventory at WarnerMedia, with approximately $524 resulting from the continued
shutdown of theaters during the pandemic and the hybrid distribution model for our 2021 film slate (see Note 11). In 2021, we took
an additional Vrio impairment of $4,555, resulting from our assessment of the recoverability of the net assets of Vrio (see Note 6).
Depreciation and amortization expense decreased in 2021.
Amortization expense decreased $3,779, or 47.2%, in 2021, primarily due to ceasing amortization on Video and Vrio held-for-sale
assets.
Depreciation expense decreased $1,875, or 9.1%, in 2021, primarily due to the lower cost basis of property, plant and equipment
resulting from Video impairments taken in the fourth quarter of 2020 and ceasing depreciation on Video and Vrio held-for-sale
assets in 2021.
Operating income increased in 2021 and decreased in 2020. Our operating margin was 13.8% in 2021, compared to 3.7% in 2020
and 15.4% in 2019.
Interest expense decreased in 2021, primarily due to lower interest rates and capitalized interest associated with the spectrum
acquisitions, partially offset by higher debt balances.
Equity in net income (loss) of affiliates increased in 2021, primarily due to the close of our transaction with TPG related to the
U.S. video business, which resulted in our accounting for our investment in DIRECTV under the equity method of accounting
beginning August 1, 2021 (see Notes 6 and 20).
Other income (expense) – net increased in 2021, primarily due to the recognition of $4,140 in actuarial gains, compared to losses
of $4,169 in 2020, and recognition of $1,405 of debt redemption costs in 2020. Also contributing to increased income were higher
net pension and postretirement benefit credits from higher prior service credit amortization (see Note 15) and net gains on the sale
of assets (see Note 6).
Income tax expense increased in 2021, primarily driven by increased income before income taxes, offset primarily by the
Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and Economic Security Act (CARES Act) benefit of U.S. federal Net Operating Loss (NOL) carryback
and benefits on divestitures in 2021.
Our effective tax rate was 20.3% in 2021, (33.8)% in 2020, and 18.9% in 2019. The effective tax rate in 2020 was impacted by our
impairment of Vrio and Video goodwill, which was not deductible for tax purposes.
31
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Segment Results Our segments are strategic business units that offer different products and services over various technology
platforms and/or in different geographies that are managed accordingly. Our segment results presented below follow our internal
management reporting. In addition to segment operating contribution, we also evaluate segment performance based on EBITDA
and/or EBITDA margin. EBITDA is defined as segment operating contribution, excluding equity in net income (loss) of affiliates
and depreciation and amortization. We believe EBITDA to be a relevant and useful measurement to our investors as it is part of our
internal management reporting and planning processes and it is an important metric that management uses to evaluate operating
performance. EBITDA does not give effect to depreciation and amortization expenses incurred in operating contribution nor is it
burdened by cash used for debt service requirements and thus does not reflect available funds for distributions, reinvestment or
other discretionary uses. EBITDA margin is EBITDA divided by total revenues.
COMMUNICATIONS SEGMENT Percent Change
2021 2020 20192021 vs.
20202020 vs.
2019
Segment Operating Revenues
Mobility $ 78,254 $ 72,564 $ 71,056 7.8  % 2.1  %
Business Wireline 23,937 25,083 25,901 (4.6) (3.2)
Consumer Wireline 12,539 12,318 13,012 1.8 (5.3)
Total Segment Operating Revenues 114,730 109,965 109,969 4.3 — 
Segment Operating Contribution
Mobility 23,312 22,372 22,321 4.2 0.2 
Business Wireline 3,990 4,564 5,137 (12.6) (11.2)
Consumer Wireline 977 1,377 2,357 (29.0) (41.6)
Total Segment Operating Contribution $ 28,279 $ 28,313 $ 29,815 (0.1) % (5.0) %
Selected Subscribers and Connections
December 31,
(000s) 2021 2020 2019
Mobility subscribers 201,791 182,558 165,889 
Total domestic broadband connections 15,504 15,384 15,389 
Network access lines in service 6,177 7,263 8,487 
U-verse VoIP connections 3,333 3,816 4,370 
Operating revenues increased in 2021, driven by increases in our Mobility and Consumer Wireline business units, partially offset
by a decrease in our Business Wireline business unit. The increases are primarily driven by equipment and wireless service revenue
growth and gains in broadband service.
Operating contribution decreased in 2021 and 2020. The 2021 operating contribution includes declines in our Business Wireline
and Consumer Wireline business units, and reflects an increase in operating contribution from our Mobility business unit. Our
Communications segment operating income margin was 24.6% in 2021, 25.7% in 2020 and 27.1% in 2019.
32
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Communications Business Unit Discussion
Mobility Results
Percent Change
2021 2020 20192021 vs.
20202020 vs.
2019
Operating revenues
Service $ 57,590 $ 55,542 $ 55,331 3.7  % 0.4 %
Equipment 20,664 17,022 15,725 21.4 8.2 
Total Operating Revenues 78,254 72,564 71,056 7.8 2.1 
Operating expenses
Operations and support 46,820 42,106 40,681 11.2 3.5 
Depreciation and amortization 8,122 8,086 8,054 0.4 0.4 
Total Operating Expenses 54,942 50,192 48,735 9.5 3.0 
Operating Income 23,312 22,372 22,321 4.2 0.2 
Equity in Net Income (Loss) of Affiliates — — — — — 
Operating Contribution $ 23,312 $ 22,372 $ 22,321 4.2  % 0.2  %
The following tables highlight other key measures of performance for Mobility:
Subscribers
Percent Change
(in 000s) 2021 2020 20192021 vs.
20202020 vs.
2019
Postpaid 81,534 77,154 75,207 5.7 % 2.6 %
Postpaid phone 67,260 64,216 63,018 4.7 1.9 
Prepaid 19,028 18,102 17,803 5.1 1.7 
Reseller 6,113 6,535 6,893 (6.5) (5.2)
Connected devices 95,116 80,767 65,986 17.8 22.4 
Total Mobility Subscribers 201,791 182,558 165,889 10.5  % 10.0  %
Includes data-centric devices such as session-based tablets, monitoring devices and primarily wholesale automobile systems.1
1
33
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Mobility Net Additions
Percent Change
(in 000s) 2021 2020 20192021 vs.
20202020 vs.
2019
Postpaid Phone Net Additions 3,196 1,457 483 —  % —  %
Total Phone Net Additions 3,850 1,640 989 — 65.8 
Postpaid 4,482 2,183 (435) — — 
Prepaid 956 379 677 — (44.0)
Reseller (534) (449) (928) (18.9) 51.6 
Connected devices 14,328 14,785 14,645 (3.1) 1.0 
Mobility Net Subscriber Additions 19,232 16,898 13,959 13.8  % 21.1  %
Postpaid Churn 0.94  % 0.98  % 1.18  % (4) BP (20) BP
Postpaid Phone-Only Churn 0.76  % 0.79  % 0.95  % (3) BP (16) BP
Excludes acquisition-related additions during the period.
In addition to postpaid phones, includes tablets and wearables and other . Tablet net adds (losses) were 28, (512) and (1,487) for the years ended
December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, respectively . Wearables and other net adds were 1,257, 1,223 and 569 for the years ended December 31,
2021, 2020 and 2019, respectively .
Includes data-centric devices such as session-based tablets, monitoring devices and primarily wholesale automobile systems. Excludes
postpaid tablets and other postpaid data devices. Wholesale connected car net adds were 7.9 million for the year ended December 31, 2021.
Calculated by dividing the aggregate number of wireless subscribers who canceled service during a month by the total number of wireless
subscribers at the beginning of that month. The churn rate for the period is equal to the average of the churn rate for each month of that period.
Service revenue increased during 2021, largely due to growth from subscriber gains.
ARPU
Average revenue per subscriber (ARPU) decreased in 2021 and reflects the impact of higher promotional discount amortization
(see Note 5).
Churn
The effective management of subscriber churn is critical to our ability to maximize revenue growth and to maintain and improve
margins. Postpaid churn and postpaid phone-only churn were lower in 2021 due to retention offers, migrations to unlimited
plans, continued network performance and lower involuntary disconnects.
Equipment revenue increased in 2021, primarily driven by increased volumes, the sale of higher-priced smartphones and a mix of
higher-priced postpaid smartphones.
Operations and support expenses increased in 2021, largely driven by growth in equipment sales and associated expenses,
including costs associated with the upcoming first-quarter 2022 3G network shutdown, increased content costs associated with
bundling HBO Max, increased amortization of deferred contract acquisition costs and higher network and technology costs. These
expense increases were partially offset by lower sales costs and lower bad debt expense.
Depreciation expense increased in 2021, primarily due to ongoing capital spending for network upgrades and expansion partially
offset by fully depreciated assets.
Operating income increased in 2021 and 2020. Our Mobility operating income margin was 29.8% in 2021, 30.8% in 2020 and
31.4% in 2019. Our Mobility EBITDA margin was 40.2% in 2021, 42.0% in 2020 and 42.7% in 2019.2
3
1
4
4
1 
2
3
4
34
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Subscriber Relationships
As the wireless industry has matured, with nearly full penetration of smartphones in the U.S. population, future wireless growth
will depend on our ability to offer innovative services, plans and devices that bundle product offerings and take advantage of our
5G wireless network, which went nationwide in July 2020. We believe 5G opens up vast possibilities of connecting sensors,
devices, and autonomous things, commonly referred to as the Internet of Things (IoT). More and more, these devices are
performing use cases that require high bandwidth, ultra-reliability and low latency that only 5G and edge computing can bring. To
support higher mobile data usage, our priority is to best utilize a wireless network that has sufficient spectrum and capacity to
support these innovations on as broad a geographic basis as possible. In January 2022, we began to deploy our C-band spectrum
acquired in FCC Auction 107 (see Note 6).
To attract and retain subscribers in a mature and highly competitive market, we have launched a wide variety of plans, including
our FirstNet and prepaid products, and arrangements that bundle our services. Virtually all of our postpaid smartphone subscribers
are on plans that provide for service on multiple devices at reduced rates, and subscribers to such plans tend to have higher
retention and lower churn rates. We offer unlimited data plans and subscribers to such plans also tend to have higher retention and
lower churn rates. Our offerings are intended to encourage existing subscribers to upgrade their current services and/or add devices,
attract subscribers from other providers and/or minimize subscriber churn. Subscribers that purchase two or more services from us
have significantly lower churn than subscribers that purchase only one service.
Business Wireline Results
Percent Change
2021 2020 20192021 vs.
20202020 vs.
2019
Operating revenues
Services $ 23,224 $ 24,313 $ 25,116 (4.5)% (3.2)%
Equipment 713 770 785 (7.4) (1.9)
Total Operating Revenues 23,937 25,083 25,901 (4.6) (3.2)
Operating expenses
Operations and support 14,755 15,303 15,839 (3.6) (3.4)
Depreciation and amortization 5,192 5,216 4,925 (0.5) 5.9 
Total Operating Expenses 19,947 20,519 20,764 (2.8) (1.2)
Operating Income 3,990 4,564 5,137 (12.6) (11.2)
Equity in Net Income (Loss) of Affiliates — — — — — 
Operating Contribution $ 3,990 $ 4,564 $ 5,137 (12.6)% (11.2)%
Service revenues decreased in 2021, driven by lower demand for legacy voice and data services in the current year, proactive
rationalization of low profit margin products and higher demand for pandemic-related connectivity in the prior-year. We expect this
trend to continue.
Equipment revenues decreased in 2021, driven by declines in legacy and non-core services which we expect to continue.
Operations and support expenses decreased in 2021, primarily due to our continued efforts to drive efficiencies in our network
operations through automation and reductions in customer support expenses through digitization and proactive rationalization of
low profit margin products.
Depreciation expense decreased in 2021, primarily due to certain network assets becoming fully depreciated.
Operating income decreased in 2021 and 2020. Our Business Wireline operating income margin was 16.7% in 2021, 18.2% in
2020 and 19.8% in 2019. Our Business Wireline EBITDA margin was 38.4% in 2021, 39.0% in 2020 and 38.8% in 2019.
35
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Consumer Wireline Results
Percent Change
2021 2020 20192021 vs.
20202020 vs.
2019
Operating revenues
Broadband $ 9,085 $ 8,534 $ 8,403 6.5 % 1.6 %
Legacy voice and data services 1,977 2,213 2,573 (10.7) (14.0)
Other service and equipment 1,477 1,571 2,036 (6.0) (22.8)
Total Operating Revenues 12,539 12,318 13,012 1.8 (5.3)
Operating expenses
Operations and support 8,467 8,027 7,775 5.5 3.2 
Depreciation and amortization 3,095 2,914 2,880 6.2 1.2 
Total Operating Expenses 11,562 10,941 10,655 5.7 2.7 
Operating Income 977 1,377 2,357 (29.0) (41.6)
Equity in Net Income (Loss) of Affiliates — — — — — 
Operating Contribution $ 977 $ 1,377 $ 2,357 (29.0) % (41.6)%
The following tables highlight other key measures of performance for Consumer Wireline:
Connections
Percent Change
(in 000s) 2021 2020 20192021 vs.
20202020 vs.
2019
Broadband Connections
Total Broadband and DSL Connections 14,160 14,100 14,119 0.4 % (0.1)%
Fiber Broadband Connections 5,992 4,951 3,887 21.0 27.4 
Voice Connections
Retail Consumer Switched Access Lines 2,423 2,862 3,329 (15.3) (14.0)
U-verse Consumer VoIP Connections 2,736 3,231 3,794 (15.3) (14.8)
Total Retail Consumer Voice Connections 5,159 6,093 7,123 (15.3)% (14.5)%
Net Additions
Percent Change
(in 000s) 2021 2020 20192021 vs.
20202020 vs.
2019
Broadband Net Additions
Total Broadband and DSL Net Additions 60 (19) (290) — % 93.4 %
Fiber Broadband Net Additions 1,041 1,064 1,124 (2.2)% (5.3)%
Broadband revenues increased in 2021, driven by an increase in fiber customers and pricing, which we expect to continue for the
foreseeable future.
Legacy voice and data service revenues decreased in 2021, reflecting the continued decline in the number of customers, which we
expect to continue.
Other service and equipment revenues decreased in 2021, reflecting the continued decline in the number of VoIP customers,
which we expect to continue.
36
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Operations and support expenses increased in 2021, primarily driven by higher advertising, technology and customer support
costs, and content costs associated with plans bundling HBO Max. Partially offsetting these increases was lower amortization of
deferred fulfillment costs, including updates to extend the estimated economic life of our subscribers.
Depreciation expense increased in 2021, primarily due to ongoing capital spending for network upgrades and expansion.
Operating income decreased in 2021 and 2020. Our Consumer Wireline operating income margin was 7.8% in 2021, 11.2% in
2020 and 18.1% in 2019. Our Consumer Wireline EBITDA margin was 32.5% in 2021, 34.8% in 2020 and 40.2% in 2019.
WARNERMEDIA SEGMENT
Percent Change
2021 2020 20192021 vs.
 20202020 vs.
 2019
Segment Operating Revenues
Subscription $ 15,596 $ 13,765 $ 13,651 13.3 % 0.8 %
Content and other 13,514 10,552 14,930 28.1 (29.3)
Advertising 6,522 6,125 6,678 6.5 (8.3)
Total Segment Operating Revenues 35,632 30,442 35,259 17.0 (13.7)
Segment Operating Expenses
Direct Costs
Programming 15,286 11,678 13,949 30.9 (16.3)
Marketing 4,137 2,529 2,953 63.6 (14.4)
Other 3,658 3,211 3,060 13.9 4.9 
Selling, general and administrative 4,656 4,161 4,210 11.9 (1.2)
Depreciation and amortization 656 671 589 (2.2) 13.9 
Total Operating Expenses 28,393 22,250 24,761 27.6 (10.1)
Operating Income 7,239 8,192 10,498 (11.6) (22.0)
Equity in Net Income (Loss) of Affiliates 38 18 161 — (88.8)
Total Segment Operating Contribution $ 7,277 $ 8,210 $ 10,659 (11.4)% (23.0)%
Our WarnerMedia segment is operated as a content organization that distributes across various platforms, including basic networks,
Direct-to-Consumer (DTC) or theatrical, TV content and games licensing.
HBO Latin America Group (HBO LAG) is included as an equity method investment prior to our acquiring the remaining interest in
May 2020. It is included in the segment operating results following the date of acquisition.
On May 17, 2021, we entered into an agreement to combine our WarnerMedia segment, subject to certain exceptions, with a
subsidiary of Discovery Inc. On December 21, 2021, we entered into an agreement to sell the marketplace component of Xandr to
Microsoft Corporation (Microsoft). (See Note 6)
Operating revenues increased in 2021 and decreased in 2020. The increase in 2021 was primarily due to increases in content and
other, reflecting the partial recovery from prior-year impacts of the pandemic, and also in subscription revenues. The decrease in
2020 was primarily due to lower content and advertising revenues, which were negatively impacted by the pandemic, partially
offset by higher subscription revenues.
Subscription revenues increased in 2021 and 2020, reflecting growth of DTC domestic HBO Max and HBO subscribers and the
May 2020 acquisition of the remaining interest in HBO Latin America Group. DTC subscription revenues were $7,723 in 2021,
versus $6,090 and $5,814 in 2020 and 2019, respectively, and include growth from intercompany relationships with the
Communications segment.
37
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Content and other revenues increased in 2021 and decreased in 2020. The increase in 2021 was due to higher TV production and
licensing, which represent a partial recovery from prior-year impacts of the pandemic, as well as higher theatrical, with 2020
including only five worldwide theatrical releases compared to 17 in 2021. The decrease in 2020 was primarily due to pandemic-
related movie theater closures and television and theatrical production delays.
Advertising revenues increased in 2021 and decreased in 2020. The increase in 2021 was due to the return in 2021 of major sporting
events, including the NCAA Division I Men’s Championship Basketball Tournament. The decrease in 2020 was primarily due to
the pandemic-related cancellation of sporting events, partially offset by higher news coverage of general elections and COVID-19
developments.
Direct costs increased in 2021 and decreased in 2020. The increase in 2021 was driven by higher film and programming costs and
increased costs for HBO Max. Direct costs supporting DTC revenues were $7,934 in 2021, versus $5,452 and $3,824 in 2020 and
2019, respectively. The decrease in 2020 was primarily due to pandemic-related closures and production delays.
Selling, general and administrative expenses increased in 2021 and decreased in 2020. The increase in 2021 was primarily due to
incremental selling costs associated with a DIRECTV advertising revenue sharing arrangement, partially offset by lower bad debt
expense and integration of support functions. The decrease in 2020 was primarily due to lower print and advertising expenses from
limited theatrical releases, lower distribution fees and cost-saving initiatives, partially offset by marketing costs associated with
HBO Max.
Operating contribution decreased in 2021 and 2020. The WarnerMedia segment operating income margin was 20.3% in 2021,
26.9% in 2020 and 29.8% in 2019.
LATIN AMERICA SEGMENT
Percent Change
2021 2020 20192021 vs.
20202020 vs.
2019
Segment Operating Revenues
Mexico $ 2,747 $ 2,562 $ 2,869 7.2 % (10.7)%
Vrio 2,607 3,154 4,094 (17.3) (23.0)
Total Segment Operating Revenues 5,354 5,716 6,963 (6.3) (17.9)
Segment Operating Contribution
Mexico (510) (587) (718) 13.1 18.2 
Vrio 80 (142) 83 — — 
Total Segment Operating Contribution $ (430)$ (729)$ (635) 41.0 % (14.8)%
Our Latin America operations conduct business in their local currency and operating results are converted to U.S. dollars using
official exchange rates, subjecting results to foreign currency fluctuations.
On November 15, 2021, we completed the sale of our Latin America video operations, Vrio, to Grupo Werthein (see Note 6).
Operating revenues decreased in 2021, reflecting the sale of Vrio partially offset by growth in the Mexico wireless operations.
Foreign exchange pressure in Vrio was partially offset by improvements in Mexico.
Operating contribution improved in 2021, reflecting higher profitability in Mexico and lower depreciation resulting from Vrio
assets being accounted for as held-for-sale. Our Latin America segment operating income margin was (8.1)% in 2021, (13.2)% in
2020 and (9.5)% in 2019.
38
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Latin America Business Unit Discussion
Mexico Results
Percent Change
2021 2020 20192021 vs.
20202020 vs.
2019
Operating revenues
Service $ 1,834 $ 1,656 $ 1,863 10.7  % (11.1)%
Equipment 913 906 1,006 0.8 (9.9)
Total Operating Revenues 2,747 2,562 2,869 7.2 (10.7)
Operating expenses
Operations and support 2,652 2,636 3,085 0.6 (14.6)
Depreciation and amortization 605 513 502 17.9 2.2 
Total Operating Expenses 3,257 3,149 3,587 3.4 (12.2)
Operating Income (Loss) (510) (587) (718) 13.1 18.2 
Equity in Net Income (Loss) of Affiliates — — — — — 
Operating Contribution $ (510)$ (587)$ (718) 13.1  % 18.2 %
The following tables highlight other key measures of performance for Mexico:
Percent Change
(in 000s) 2021 2020 20192021 vs.
20202020 vs.
2019
Mexico Wireless Subscribers
Postpaid 4,807 4,696 5,103 2.4 % (8.0)%
Prepaid 15,057 13,758 13,584 9.4 1.3 
Reseller 498 489 472 1.8 3.6 
Mexico Wireless Subscribers 20,362 18,943 19,159 7.5 % (1.1)%
Percent Change
(in 000s) 2021 2020 20192021 vs.
20202020 vs.
2019
Mexico Wireless Net Additions
Postpaid 111 (407) (608) — % 33.1 %
Prepaid 1,299 174 1,919 — (90.9)
Reseller 9 118 219 (92.4) (46.1)
Mexico Wireless Net Additions 1,419 (115) 1,530 — % — %
Service revenues increased in 2021, driven by improvements in foreign exchange and growth in other services.
Equipment revenues increased in 2021, driven by improvements in foreign exchange impact partly offset by lower equipment
sales volumes.
Operations and support expenses increased in 2021, due to foreign exchange impact partially offset by lower expenses.
Approximately 7% of Mexico expenses are U.S. dollar-based, with the remainder in the local currency.
Depreciation expense increased in 2021, reflecting higher in-service assets and foreign exchange impacts.
Operating income improved in 2021 and 2020. Our Mexico operating income margin was (18.6)% in 2021, (22.9)% in 2020 and
(25.0)% in 2019. Our Mexico EBITDA margin was 3.5% in 2021, (2.9)% in 2020 and (7.5)% in 2019.
39
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Vrio Results
Percent Change
2021 2020 20192021 vs.
20202020 vs.
2019
Operating revenues $ 2,607 $ 3,154 $ 4,094 (17.3)% (23.0)%
Operating expenses
Operations and support 2,302 2,800 3,378 (17.8) (17.1)
Depreciation and amortization 231 520 660 (55.6) (21.2)
Total Operating Expenses 2,533 3,320 4,038 (23.7) (17.8)
Operating Income (Loss) 74 (166) 56 — — 
Equity in Net Income (Loss) of Affiliates 6 24 27 (75.0) (11.1)
Operating Contribution $ 80 $ (142)$ 83 — % — %
Operating revenues decreased in 2021, driven by the sale of Vrio and foreign exchange impacts.
Operations and support expenses decreased in 2021, driven by the sale of Vrio and foreign exchange impacts.
Depreciation expense decreased in 2021, due to ceasing depreciation on held-for-sale Vrio assets. We applied held-for-sale
accounting to Vrio on June 30, 2021 and ceased depreciation beginning July 1, 2021.
Operating income improved in 2021 and 2020. Our Vrio operating income margin was 2.8% in 2021, (5.3)% in 2020 and 1.4% in
2019. Our Vrio EBITDA margin was 11.7% in 2021, 11.2% in 2020 and 17.5% in 2019.
OPERATING ENVIRONMENT AND TRENDS OF THE BUSINESS
2022 Revenue Trends We expect revenue growth in our wireless and broadband businesses as customers demand instant
connectivity and higher speeds made possible by wireless network enhancements through 5G deployment and our fiber network
expansion. We also expect revenue growth from continued investment in premium content and by expanding the international reach
of HBO Max.
In our Communications segment, we expect that our simplified go-to-market strategy for 5G in underpenetrated markets will
continue to contribute to wireless subscriber and service revenue growth and that expansion of our fiber footprint and our new
multi-gig rollout will drive greater demand for broadband services on our fast-growing fiber network.
In our WarnerMedia segment, we expect our video streaming platform, HBO Max, and premium content will continue to drive
revenue growth. The pandemic-related partial closure of movie theaters is expected to continue to pressure revenues; however, we
are working towards a shorter but exclusive theatrical window for our 2022 film slate. The decline in viewing on our basic cable
networks is expected to continue as consumers continue to increase their use of streaming platforms.
As we expand our fiber reach, we will be orienting our business portfolio to leverage this opportunity to offset continuing declines
in legacy business wireline products by growing connectivity with small to mid-sized business. We plan to use our strong fiber and
wireless assets, broad distribution and converged product offers to strengthen our overall market position. We will continue to
deemphasize non-core services with a longer-term shift of the business to fiber and mobile connectivity, and growth in value-added
services.
2022 Expense Trends We expect the spending required to support growth initiatives, primarily our continued deployment of fiber
and 5G, including 3G shutdown costs in the first quarter of 2022, as well as continued investment into the HBO Max platform, to
pressure expense trends in 2022. To the extent 5G handset introductions continue in 2022, and as anticipated, the expenses
associated with those device sales are expected to contribute to higher costs. During 2022, we will also continue to prioritize
efficiency, led by our cost transformation initiative and continued transition from our hardware-based network technology to more
efficient and less expensive software-based technology. These investments will help prepare us to meet increased customer demand
for enhanced wireless and broadband services, including video streaming, augmented reality and “smart” technologies. The
software benefits of our 5G wireless technology should result in a more efficient use of capital and lower network-related expenses
in the coming years.
40
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
We continue to transform our operations to be more efficient and effective, reinvesting savings into growth areas of the business.
We are restructuring businesses, sunsetting legacy networks, improving customer service and ordering functions through digital
transformation, sizing our support costs and staffing with current activity levels, and reassessing overall benefit costs. Cost savings
and asset sales align with our focus on debt reduction.
Market Conditions The U.S. stock market experienced steady growth in 2021; however, several factors, including the global
pandemic, have resulted in changes in demand in business communication services. The global pandemic has caused, and could
again cause, delays in the development, manufacturing (including the sourcing of key components) and shipment of products, as
well as continued tight labor market and actual or perceived inflation. Most of our products and services are not directly affected by
the imposition of tariffs on Chinese goods. However, we expect ongoing pressure on pricing during 2022 as we respond to the
competitive marketplace, especially in wireless services.
Included on our consolidated balance sheets are assets held by benefit plans for the payment of future benefits. Our pension plans
are subject to funding requirements of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended (ERISA). We expect
only minimal ERISA contribution requirements to our pension plans for 2022. Investment returns on these assets depend largely on
trends in the economy, and a weakness in the equity, fixed income and real asset markets could require us to make future
contributions to the pension plans. In addition, our policy of recognizing actuarial gains and losses related to our pension and other
postretirement plans in the period in which they arise subjects us to earnings volatility caused by changes in market conditions;
however, these actuarial gains and losses do not impact segment performance as they are required to be recorded in “Other income
(expense) – net.” Changes in our discount rate, which are tied to changes in the bond market, and changes in the performance of
equity markets, may have significant impacts on the valuation of our pension and other postretirement obligations at the end of
2022 (see “Critical Accounting Policies and Estimates”).
OPERATING ENVIRONMENT OVERVIEW
AT&T subsidiaries operating within the United States are subject to federal and state regulatory authorities. AT&T subsidiaries
operating outside the United States are subject to the jurisdiction of national and supranational regulatory authorities in the markets
where service is provided.
In the Telecommunications Act of 1996 (Telecom Act), Congress established a national policy framework intended to bring the
benefits of competition and investment in advanced telecommunications facilities and services to all Americans by opening all
telecommunications markets to competition and reducing or eliminating regulatory burdens that harm consumer welfare.
Nonetheless, over the ensuing two decades, the Federal Communications Commission (FCC) and some state regulatory
commissions have maintained or expanded certain regulatory requirements that were imposed decades ago on our traditional
wireline subsidiaries when they operated as legal monopolies. More recently, the FCC has pursued a more deregulatory agenda,
eliminating a variety of antiquated and unnecessary regulations and streamlining its processes in a number of areas. We continue to
support regulatory and legislative measures and efforts, at both the state and federal levels, to reduce inappropriate regulatory
burdens that inhibit our ability to compete effectively and offer needed services to our customers, including initiatives to transition
services from traditional networks to all IP-based networks. At the same time, we also seek to ensure that legacy regulations are not
further extended to broadband or wireless services, which are subject to vigorous competition.
Communications Segment
Internet The FCC currently classifies fixed and mobile consumer broadband services as information services, subject to light-touch
regulation. The D.C. Circuit upheld the FCC’s current classification, although it remanded three discrete issues to the FCC for
further consideration. These issues related to the effect of the FCC’s decision to classify broadband services as information services
on public safety, the regulation of pole attachments, and universal service support for low-income consumers through the Lifeline
program. Because no party sought Supreme Court review of the D.C. Circuit’s decision to uphold the FCC’s classification of
broadband as an information service, that decision is final.
In October 2020, the FCC adopted an order addressing the three issues remanded by the D.C. Circuit for further consideration.
After considering those issues, the FCC concluded they provided no grounds to depart from its determination that fixed and mobile
consumer broadband services should be classified as information services. An appeal of the FCC’s remand decision is pending.
Some states have adopted legislation or issued executive orders that would reimpose net neutrality rules repealed by the FCC. Suits
have been filed concerning such laws in California and Vermont. The California statute is now in effect, and the lawsuit regarding
the Vermont statute has been stayed pending resolution of any appeal of the California lawsuit. We expect that going forward
additional states may seek to impose net neutrality requirements.
41
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
On November 15, 2021, President Biden signed the Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act (IIJA) into law. The legislation
appropriates $65,000 to support broadband deployment and adoption. The National Telecommunications and Information Agency
(NTIA) is responsible for distributing more than $48,000 of this funding, including $42,500 in state grants for broadband
deployment projects in unserved and underserved areas. NTIA will establish rules for this program in the first half of 2022. The
IIJA also appropriated $14,200 for establishment of the Affordable Connectivity Program (ACP), an FCC-administered monthly,
low-income broadband benefit program, replacing the Emergency Broadband Benefit program (established in December 2020 by
the Consolidated Appropriations Act 2021). Qualifying customers can receive up to thirty dollars per month (or seventy-five dollars
per month for those on Tribal lands) to assist with their internet bill. AT&T is a participating provider in the ACP program and will
consider participating in the deployment program where appropriate. The IIJA includes various provisions that will result in FCC
proceedings regarding ACP program administration and consumer protection, reform of the existing universal support program, and
broadband labeling and equal access.
Privacy-related legislation continues to be adopted or considered in a number of jurisdictions. Legislative, regulatory and litigation
actions could result in increased costs of compliance, further regulation or claims against broadband internet access service
providers and others, and increased uncertainty in the value and availability of data.
Wireless Industry-wide network densification and 5G technology expansion efforts, which are needed to satisfy extensive demand
for video and internet access, will involve significant deployment of “small cell” equipment. This increases the importance of local
permitting processes that allow for the placement of small cell equipment in the public right-of-way on reasonable timelines and
terms. Between 2018 and 2020, the FCC adopted multiple Orders streamlining federal, state, and local wireless structure review
processes that had the tendency to delay and impede deployment of small cell and related infrastructure used to provide
telecommunications and broadband services. The key elements of these orders have been affirmed on judicial review. During 2020-
2021, we have also deployed 5G nationwide on “low band” spectrum on macro towers. Executing on the recent spectrum purchase,
we announced on-going construction and continuing deployment of 5G on C-band spectrum in 2022 and beyond.
WarnerMedia Segment
We create, own and distribute intellectual property, including copyrights, trademarks and licenses of intellectual property. To
protect our intellectual property, we rely on a combination of laws and license agreements. Outside of the U.S., laws and
regulations relating to intellectual property protection and the effective enforcement of these laws and regulations vary greatly from
country to country. The European Union Commission is pursuing legislative and regulatory initiatives which could impact
WarnerMedia’s activities in the EU. Piracy, particularly of digital content, continues to threaten WarnerMedia’s revenues from
products and services, and we work to limit that threat through a combination of approaches, including technological and legislative
solutions. Outside the U.S., various laws and regulations, as well as trade agreements with the U.S., also apply to the distribution or
licensing of feature films for exhibition in movie theaters and on broadcast and cable networks. For example, in certain countries,
including China, laws and regulations limit the number of foreign films exhibited in such countries in a calendar year.
EXPECTED GROWTH AREAS
Over the next few years, we expect our growth to come from wireless and IP-based fiber broadband services. We provide integrated
services to diverse groups of customers in the U.S. on an integrated telecommunications network utilizing different technological
platforms. In 2022, our key initiatives include:
•Continuing our wireless subscriber momentum while increasing the pace of our 5G deployment and expansion of 5G service,
including to underpenetrated markets.
•Improving fiber penetration, accelerating subscriber growth and increasing broadband revenues.
•Increasing international subscriber base for HBO Max, our platform for premium content and video offered directly to
consumers, as well as through other distributors.
•Continuing to develop efficiencies and a competitive advantage through cost transformation initiatives and product
simplification.
Wireless We expect to continue to deliver revenue growth in the coming years. We are in a period of rapid growth in wireless video
usage and believe that there are substantial opportunities available for next-generation converged services that combine
technologies and services. As of December 31, 2021, we served 222 million wireless subscribers in North America, with more than
202 million in the United States.
42
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Our LTE technology covers over 434 million people in North America, and in the United States, we cover all major metropolitan
areas and over 330 million people. We also provide 4G coverage using another technology (HSPA+), and when combined with our
upgraded backhaul network, we provide enhanced network capabilities and superior mobile broadband speeds for data and video
services. In December 2018, we introduced the nation’s first commercial mobile 5G service and expanded that deployment
nationwide in July 2020. At December 31, 2021, our network covers more than 250 million people with 5G technology in the
United States and North America.
Our networks covering both the U.S. and Mexico have enabled our customers to use wireless services without roaming on other
companies’ networks. We believe this seamless access will prove attractive to customers and provide a significant growth
opportunity. As of the end of 2021, we provided LTE coverage to over 104 million people in Mexico.
Integration of Data/Broadband and Streaming Services As the communications industry has evolved into internet-based
technologies capable of blending wireline and wireless services, we plan to focus on expanding our wireless network capabilities
and provide broadband offerings that allow customers to integrate their home or business fixed services with their mobile service.
In January 2022, we launched our multi-gig rollout, which brings the fastest internet to AT&T Fiber customers with symmetrical 2
gig and 5 gig tiers. We will continue to develop and provide unique integrated mobile and broadband/fiber solutions.
REGULATORY DEVELOPMENTS
Set forth below is a summary of the most significant regulatory proceedings that directly affected our operations during 2021.
Industry-wide regulatory developments are discussed above in Operating Environment Overview. While these issues may apply
only to certain subsidiaries, the words “we,” “AT&T” and “our” are used to simplify the discussion. The following discussions are
intended as a condensed summary of the issues rather than as a comprehensive legal analysis and description of all of these specific
issues.
International Regulation Our subsidiaries operating outside the United States are subject to the jurisdiction of regulatory
authorities in the territories in which the subsidiaries operate. Our licensing, compliance and advocacy initiatives in foreign
countries primarily enable the provision of enterprise (i.e., large business) globally and wireless services in Mexico.
The General Data Protection Regulation went into effect in Europe in May of 2018. AT&T processes and handles personal data of
its customers and subscribers, employees of its enterprise customers and its employees. This regulation created a range of new
compliance obligations and significantly increased financial penalties for noncompliance.
Federal Regulation We have organized our following discussion by service impacted.
Internet In February 2015, the FCC released an order classifying both fixed and mobile consumer broadband internet access
services as telecommunications services, subject to Title II of the Communications Act. The Order, which represented a departure
from longstanding bipartisan precedent, significantly expanded the FCC’s authority to regulate broadband internet access services,
as well as internet interconnection arrangements. In December 2017, the FCC reversed its 2015 decision by reclassifying fixed and
mobile consumer broadband services as information services and repealing most of the rules that were adopted in 2015. In lieu of
broad conduct prohibitions, the order requires internet service providers to disclose information about their network practices and
terms of service, including whether they block or throttle internet traffic or offer paid prioritization. On October 1, 2019, the D.C.
Circuit issued a unanimous opinion upholding the FCC’s reclassification of broadband as an information service, and its reliance on
transparency requirements and competitive marketplace dynamics to safeguard net neutrality. Because no party sought Supreme
Court review of the D.C. Circuit’s decision to uphold the FCC’s classification of broadband as an information service, that decision
is final. While the court vacated the FCC’s express preemption of any state regulation of net neutrality, it stressed that its ruling did
not prevent the FCC or ISPs from relying on conflict preemption to invalidate particular state laws that are inconsistent with the
FCC’s regulatory objectives and framework. The court also remanded the matter to the FCC for further consideration of the impact
of reclassifying broadband services as information services on public safety, the Lifeline program, and pole attachment regulation.
In October 2020, the FCC adopted an order concluding that those issues did not justify reversing its decision to reclassify
broadband services as information services. An appeal of the FCC’s remand decision is pending.
43
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Following the FCC’s 2017 decision to reclassify broadband as information services, a number of states adopted legislation to
reimpose the very rules the FCC repealed. In some cases, state legislation imposes requirements that go beyond the FCC’s February
2015 order. Additionally, some state governors have issued executive orders that effectively reimpose the repealed requirements.
Suits have been filed concerning laws in California and Vermont. Both lawsuits were stayed pursuant to agreements by those states
not to enforce their laws pending final resolution of all appeals of the FCC’s December 2017 order. Because that order is now final,
the California suit has returned to active status. In January 2021, a U.S. District Court in California denied a request for a
preliminary injunction against enforcement of the California law. As a consequence, the California statute now is in effect. The
trade associations challenging the statute have appealed the denial of their request for preliminary injunction to the Ninth Circuit;
that appeal remains pending. The lawsuit regarding the Vermont statute has been stayed pending the Ninth Circuit’s resolution of
the appeal or April 15, 2022, whichever occurs first. We expect that going forward additional states may seek to impose net
neutrality requirements. We will continue to support congressional action to codify a set of standard consumer rules for the internet.
Privacy-related legislation continues to be adopted or considered in a number of jurisdictions. Legislative, regulatory and litigation
actions could result in increased costs of compliance, further regulation or claims against broadband internet access service
providers and others, and increased uncertainty in the value and availability of data.
Wireless and Broadband In June and November 2020, the FCC issued a Declaratory Ruling clarifying the limits on state and local
authority to deny applications to modify existing structures to accommodate wireless facilities. Appeals of the November 2020
order remain pending in the Ninth Circuit Court of Appeals, following multiple requests by the FCC to hold the appeal in abeyance
until the Senate confirms a fifth FCC Commissioner. If sustained on appeal, these FCC decisions will remove state and local
regulatory barriers and reduce the costs of the infrastructure needed for 5G and FirstNet deployments, which will enhance our
ability to place small cell facilities on utility poles, expand existing facilities to accommodate public safety services, and replace
legacy facilities and services with advanced broadband infrastructure and services. During 2020-2021, we have also deployed 5G
nationwide on “low band” spectrum on macro towers. Executing on the recent spectrum purchase, we announced on-going
construction and continuing deployment of 5G on C-band spectrum in 2022 and beyond.
In March 2020, the FCC released its order setting rules for certain spectrum bands (C-band) for 5G operations. In that order, the
FCC concluded that C-band 5G services that met the agency’s technical limits on power and emissions would not cause harmful
interference with aircraft operations. In reliance on that order, AT&T bid a total of $23,406 and was awarded 1,621 C-band licenses,
including 40 MHz nationwide available for deployment in December 2021, with the remainder available for deployment in
December 2023. In late 2021, the Federal Aviation Administration (FAA) questioned whether the C-band launch could impact radio
altimeter equipment on airplanes, which operate on spectrum bands over 400 MHz away from the spectrum AT&T is launching in
2022. In response, to allow the FAA more time to evaluate, AT&T and Verizon delayed their planned December 2021 5G C-band
launch by six weeks and voluntarily committed to a series of temporary, precautionary measures, in addition to deferring turning on
a limited number of towers around certain airports. On January 19, 2022, we launched 5G C-band services, subject to these
voluntary temporary measures.
In recent years, the FCC took several actions to make spectrum available for 5G services, including the auction of 280 MHz of mid-
band spectrum used for satellite service (the “C Band” auction) and 39 GHz band spectrum. AT&T obtained spectrum in these
auctions (see “Other Business Matters”). The FCC also made 150 MHz of mid-band CBRS spectrum available, to be shared with
Federal incumbents, which enjoy priority. In addition, the FCC recently completed Auction 110, in which AT&T won 40 MHz of
spectrum nationwide at a cost of $9,079.
Following enactment in December 2019 of the Pallone-Thune Telephone Robocall Abuse Criminal Enforcement and Deterrence
Act (TRACED Act) by Congress, the FCC adopted new rules requiring voice service providers to implement caller ID
authentication protocols (known as STIR/SHAKEN) and adopt robocall mitigation measures. These measures apply to portions of
their networks where STIR/SHAKEN is not enabled, in addition to other anti-robocall measures. The new rules contemplate
ongoing FCC oversight and review of efforts related to STIR/SHAKEN implementation. Among other goals, the FCC has stated its
intention to promote the IP transition through its rules.
In September 2019, the FCC released reformed aspects of its intercarrier compensation regime related to tandem switching and
transport charges, with the goal of reducing the prevalence of telephone access arbitrage schemes. In October 2020, the FCC further
reformed aspects of its intercarrier compensation regime by greatly reducing, and in some cases eliminating, the charges long
distance carriers must pay to originating carriers for toll-free calls. Appeals of both orders are pending at the D.C. Circuit Court of
Appeals.
44
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
ACCOUNTING POLICIES AND STANDARDS
Critical Accounting Policies and Estimates Because of the size of the financial statement line items they relate to or the extent of
judgment required by our management, some of our accounting policies and estimates have a more significant impact on our
consolidated financial statements than others. The following policies are presented in the order in which the topics appear in our
consolidated statements of income.
Pension and Postretirement Benefits Our actuarial estimates of retiree benefit expense and the associated significant weighted-
average assumptions are discussed in Note 15. Our assumed weighted-average discount rates for pension and postretirement
benefits of 3.00% and 2.80%, respectively, at December 31, 2021, reflect the hypothetical rate at which the projected benefit
obligations could be effectively settled or paid out to participants. We determined our discount rate based on a range of factors,
including a yield curve composed of the rates of return on several hundred high-quality, fixed income corporate bonds available at
the measurement date and corresponding to the related expected durations of future cash outflows for the obligations. These bonds
had an average rating of at least Aa3 or AA- by the nationally recognized statistical rating organizations, denominated in U.S.
dollars, and neither callable, convertible nor index linked. For the year ended December 31, 2021, when compared to the year
ended December 31, 2020, we increased our pension discount rate by 0.30%, resulting in a decrease in our pension plan benefit
obligation of $1,645, and increased our postretirement discount rate by 0.40%, resulting in a decrease in our postretirement benefit
obligation of $341.
Our expected long-term rate of return is 6.75% on pension plan assets and 4.50% on postretirement plan assets for 2022 and for
2021. Our expected return on plan assets is calculated using the actual fair value of plan assets. If all other factors were to remain
unchanged, we expect that a 0.50% decrease in the expected long-term rate of return would cause 2022 combined pension and
postretirement cost to increase $272, which under our accounting policy would be adjusted to actual returns in the current year as
part of our fourth-quarter remeasurement of our retiree benefit plans.
We recognize gains and losses on pension and postretirement plan assets and obligations immediately in “Other income (expense) –
net” in our consolidated statements of income. These gains and losses are generally measured annually as of December 31, and
accordingly, will normally be recorded during the fourth quarter, unless an earlier remeasurement is required. Should actual
experience differ from actuarial assumptions, the projected pension benefit obligation and net pension cost and accumulated
postretirement benefit obligation and postretirement benefit cost would be affected in future years. See Note 15 for additional
discussions regarding our assumptions.
Depreciation Our depreciation of assets, including use of composite group depreciation for certain subsidiaries and estimates of
useful lives, is described in Notes 1 and 7.
If all other factors were to remain unchanged, we expect that a one-year increase in the useful lives of our plant in service would
have resulted in a decrease of approximately $2,702 in our 2021 depreciation expense and that a one-year decrease would have
resulted in an increase of approximately $3,700 in our 2021 depreciation expense. See Notes 7 and 8 for depreciation and
amortization expense applicable to property, plant and equipment, including our finance lease right-of-use assets.
Asset Valuations and Impairments
Goodwill and other indefinite-lived intangible assets are not amortized but tested at least annually on October 1 for impairment. For
impairment testing, we estimate fair values using models that predominantly rely on the expected cash flows to be derived from the
reporting unit or use of the asset. Long-lived assets are reviewed for impairment whenever events or circumstances indicate that the
book value may not be recoverable over the remaining life. Inputs underlying the expected cash flows include, but are not limited
to, subscriber counts, revenues from subscriptions, advertising and content, revenue per user, capital investment and acquisition
costs per subscriber, production and content costs, and ongoing operating costs. We based our assumptions on a combination of our
historical results, trends, business plans and marketplace participant data.
Annual Goodwill Testing
Goodwill is tested on a reporting unit basis by comparing the estimated fair value of each reporting unit to its book value. If the fair
value exceeds the book value, then no impairment is measured. We estimate fair values using an income approach (also known as a
discounted cash flow model) and a market multiple approach. The income approach utilizes our future cash flow projections with a
perpetuity value discounted at an appropriate weighted average cost of capital. The market multiple approach uses the multiples of
publicly traded companies whose services are comparable to those offered by the reporting units.
45
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Effective January 1, 2021, we updated our reporting units to reflect changes in how WarnerMedia, an integrated content
organization that distributes across various platforms, is managed and evaluated. With this operational change, the reporting unit is
deemed to be the operating segment. The previous reporting units, Turner, Home Box Office, Warner Bros., and Xandr, and the new
WarnerMedia reporting unit were tested for goodwill impairment on January 1, 2021, for which there was no impairment identified.
As of October 1, 2021, the calculated fair values of the reporting units exceeded their book values in all circumstances; however,
the WarnerMedia segment fair value exceeded its book value by less than 10% with increased investment in content and
distribution expenses affecting fair value. For all reporting units, if either the projected rate of long-term growth of cash flows or
revenues declined by 0.5%, or if the weighted average cost of capital increased by 0.5%, the fair values would still be higher than
the book value of the goodwill. In the event of a 10% drop in the fair values of the reporting units, the fair values still would have
exceeded the book values of the reporting units. For the WarnerMedia reporting unit as of October 1, 2021, if the projected rate of
longer-term growth of cash flows or revenues declined by 4.4%, or if the weighted average cost of capital increased by 0.6%, it
would have resulted in impairment of the goodwill.
U.S. Wireless Licenses
The fair value of U.S. wireless licenses is assessed using a discounted cash flow model (the Greenfield Approach) and a qualitative
collaborative market approach based on auction prices, depending upon auction activity. The Greenfield Approach assumes a
company initially owns only the wireless licenses and makes investments required to build an operation comparable to current use.
These licenses are tested annually for impairment on an aggregated basis, consistent with their use on a national scope for the
United States. For impairment testing, we assume subscriber and revenue growth will trend up to projected levels, with a long-term
growth rate reflecting expected long-term inflation trends. We assume churn rates will initially exceed our current experience but
decline to rates that are in line with industry-leading churn. We used a discount rate of 9.25%, based on the optimal long-term
capital structure of a market participant and its associated cost of debt and equity for the licenses, to calculate the present value of
the projected cash flows. If either the projected rate of long-term growth of cash flows or revenues declined by 0.5%, or if the
discount rate increased by 0.5%, the fair values of these wireless licenses would still be higher than the book value of the licenses.
The fair value of these wireless licenses exceeded their book values by more than 10%.
Other Finite-Lived Intangibles
Customer relationships, licenses in Mexico and other finite-lived intangible assets are reviewed for impairment whenever events or
circumstances indicate that the book value may not be recoverable over their remaining life. For this analysis, we compare the
expected undiscounted future cash flows attributable to the asset to its book value. When the asset’s book value exceeds
undiscounted future cash flows, an impairment is recorded to reduce the book value of the asset to its estimated fair value (see
Notes 7 and 9).
Vrio Business
In the second quarter of 2021, we classified the Vrio disposal group as held-for-sale and reported the disposal group at fair value
less cost to sell, which resulted in a noncash, pre-tax impairment charge of $4,555, including approximately $2,100 related to
accumulated foreign currency translation adjustments and $2,500 related to property, plant and equipment and intangible assets.
Approximately $80 of the impairment was attributable to noncontrolling interest. Vrio was sold in November 2021, resulting in the
release of the accumulated foreign currency translation adjustments from accumulated other comprehensive income. (See Notes 3,
7 and 9)
Income Taxes Our estimates of income taxes and the significant items giving rise to the deferred assets and liabilities are shown in
Note 14 and reflect our assessment of actual future taxes to be paid on items reflected in the financial statements, giving
consideration to both timing and probability of these estimates. Actual income taxes could vary from these estimates due to future
changes in income tax law or the final review of our tax returns by federal, state or foreign tax authorities.
We use our judgment to determine whether it is more likely than not that we will sustain positions that we have taken on tax returns
and, if so, the amount of benefit to initially recognize within our financial statements. We regularly review our uncertain tax
positions and adjust our unrecognized tax benefits (UTBs) in light of changes in facts and circumstances, such as changes in tax
law, interactions with taxing authorities and developments in case law. These adjustments to our UTBs may affect our income tax
expense. Settlement of uncertain tax positions may require use of our cash.
New Accounting Standards
See Note 1 for discussion of recently issued or adopted accounting standards.
46
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
OTHER BUSINESS MATTERS
Spectrum Auction On February 24, 2021, the FCC announced that AT&T was the winning bidder for 1,621 C-Band licenses,
comprised of a total of 80 MHz nationwide, including 40 MHz in Phase I. We provided to the FCC an upfront deposit of $550 in
2020 and cash payments totaling $22,856 in the first quarter of 2021, for a total of $23,406. We received the licenses in July 2021
and classified the auction deposits, related capitalized interest and billed relocation costs as “Licenses – Net” on our December 31,
2021 consolidated balance sheet. In December 2021, we paid $955 of Incentive Payments for the clearing of Phase I spectrum and
estimate that we will be responsible for an additional $2,112 upon clearing of Phase II spectrum, expected by the end of 2023.
Additionally, we are responsible for approximately $1,000 of compensable relocation costs over the next several years as the
spectrum is being cleared by satellite operators, of which $650 was paid in the fourth quarter of 2021.
On January 14, 2022, the FCC announced that we were the winning bidder for 1,624 3.45 GHz licenses in Auction 110. We
provided the FCC an upfront deposit of $123 in the third quarter of 2021 and will pay the remaining $8,956 in the first quarter of
2022, for a total of $9,079. We intend to fund the purchase price using cash and short-term investments.
Video Business On July 31, 2021, we closed our transaction with TPG to form a new company named DIRECTV, which is jointly
governed by a board with representation from both AT&T and TPG, with TPG having tie-breaking authority on certain key
decisions. With the close of the transaction, we separated our Video business, comprised of our U.S. video operations, and began
accounting for our investment in DIRECTV under the equity method.
In connection with the transaction, we contributed our U.S. Video business unit to DIRECTV for $4,250 of junior preferred units,
an additional distribution preference of $4,200 and a 70% economic interest in common units (collectively “equity
considerations”). Upon close, we received approximately $7,170 in cash from DIRECTV ($7,600, net of $430 cash on hand) and
transferred $195 of DIRECTV debt. TPG contributed approximately $1,800 in cash to DIRECTV for $1,800 of senior preferred
units and a 30% economic interest in common units. As part of this transaction, we agreed to cover net losses under the NFL
SUNDAY TICKET contract up to a cap of $2,100 over the remaining period of the contract, of which $1,800 was a note payable to
DIRECTV.
Under separate transition services agreements, we will provide DIRECTV certain operational support for up to three years. We also
have entered into commercial arrangements, for up to five years, to provide network transport for U-verse products and sales
services.
WarnerMedia On May 17, 2021, we entered into an agreement to combine our WarnerMedia segment, subject to certain
exceptions, with a subsidiary of Discovery, Inc. (Discovery). The agreement is structured as a Reverse Morris Trust transaction,
under which WarnerMedia will be distributed to AT&T’s shareholders via a pro rata dividend, an exchange offer, or a combination
of both, followed by its combination with Discovery. The transaction is expected to be tax-free to AT&T and AT&T’s shareholders.
AT&T will receive approximately $43,000 (subject to working capital and other adjustments) in a combination of cash, debt
securities, and WarnerMedia’s retention of certain debt. AT&T’s shareholders will receive stock representing approximately 71% of
the new company; Discovery shareholders will own approximately 29% of the new company.
On February 1, 2022, we announced that we will structure the distribution as a spin-off rather than an exchange offer. Upon closing
of the transaction, each AT&T shareholder will receive, on a tax-free basis, an estimated 0.24 shares of the new company for each
share of AT&T common stock held as of the record date for the pro rata distribution. The exact number of shares to be received by
AT&T shareholders for each AT&T common share will be determined closer to the closing based on the number of shares of AT&T
common stock outstanding and the number of shares of Discovery common stock outstanding on an as-converted and as-exercised
basis. AT&T shareholders will continue to hold the same number of shares of AT&T common stock after the transaction closes.
The transaction is expected to close in the second quarter of 2022, subject to approval by Discovery shareholders and customary
closing conditions, including receipt of regulatory approvals. No vote is required by AT&T shareholders. Upon close of the
transaction, WarnerMedia will be deconsolidated.
The merger agreement contains certain customary termination rights for AT&T and Discovery, including, without limitation, a right
for either party to terminate if the transaction is not completed on or before July 15, 2023. Termination fees under specified
circumstances will require Discovery to pay AT&T $720 or AT&T to pay Discovery $1,770.
Magallanes, Inc. (Spinco), a subsidiary of AT&T, entered into a $41,500 commitment letter (Bridge Loan) on May 17, 2021. On
June 4, 2021, Spinco entered into a $10,000 term loan credit agreement (Spinco Term Loan) and reduced the aggregate
commitment amount under the Bridge Loan to $31,500. There have been no draws on the Bridge Loan or the Spinco Term Loan. In
the event advances are made under the Bridge Loan or Spinco Term Loan, those advances will be used by Spinco to finance a
portion of the cash distribution to AT&T in connection with the transaction.
47
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
On September 20, 2021, we sold WarnerMedia’s mobile games app studio, Playdemic Ltd. for approximately $1,370 in cash and
recognized a pre-tax gain of $706. Playdemic was excluded from the pending WarnerMedia/Discovery transaction.
On December 21, 2021, we entered into an agreement to sell the marketplace component of Xandr, our WarnerMedia advertising
business that was not included in the WarnerMedia/Discovery transaction, to Microsoft, which is expected to close in 2022, subject
to customary regulatory approvals.
Vrio On November 15, 2021, we sold our Latin America video operations, Vrio, to Grupo Werthein. In the second quarter of 2021,
we classified the Vrio disposal group as held-for-sale and reported the disposal group at fair value less cost to sell, which resulted in
a noncash, pre-tax impairment charge of $4,555, including approximately $2,100 related to accumulated foreign currency
translation adjustments and $2,500 related to property, plant and equipment and intangible assets. Approximately $80 of the
impairment was attributable to noncontrolling interest. We retained our 41.3% interest in SKY Mexico, a leading pay-TV provider
in Mexico.
Labor Contracts As of January 31, 2022, we employed approximately 203,000 persons. Approximately 37% of our employees are
represented by the Communications Workers of America (CWA), the International Brotherhood of Electrical Workers (IBEW) or
other unions. After expiration of the collective bargaining agreements, work stoppages or labor disruptions may occur in the
absence of new contracts or other agreements being reached. The main contracts included the following:
•A contract covering approximately 12,000 Mobility employees in 36 states and the District of Columbia is set to expire in
February 2022.
•A contract covering approximately 6,000 wireline employees in five Midwest states that was set to expire in April 2022 was
extended for a four-year period until April 2026.
•A contract covering approximately 3,000 MW IBEW employees is set to expire in June 2022.
•A contract covering approximately 2,000 AT&T Corp. employees nationwide that was set to expire in April 2022 was extended
for a four-year period until April 2026.
•A contract covering approximately 170 Teamsters Alascom employees in Alaska is set to expire in February 2022.
Environmental We are subject from time to time to judicial and administrative proceedings brought by various governmental
authorities under federal, state or local environmental laws. We reference in our Forms 10-Q and 10-K certain environmental
proceedings that could result in monetary sanctions (exclusive of interest and costs) of three hundred thousand dollars or more.
However, we do not believe that any of those currently pending will have a material adverse effect on our results of operations.
LIQUIDITY AND CAPITAL RESOURCES
For the years ended December 31, 2021 2020 2019
Cash provided by operating activities $ 41,957 $ 43,130 $ 48,668 
Cash used in investing activities (32,089) (13,548) (16,690)
Cash provided by (used in) financing activities 1,578 (32,007) (25,083)
At December 31, 2021 2020
Cash and cash equivalents $ 21,169 $ 9,740 
Total debt 177,354 157,245 
We had $21,169 in cash and cash equivalents available at December 31, 2021. Cash and cash equivalents included cash of $5,204
and money market funds and other cash equivalents of $15,965. Approximately $2,706 of our cash and cash equivalents were held
by our foreign entities in accounts predominantly outside of the U.S. and may be subject to restrictions on repatriation.
Cash and cash equivalents increased $11,429 since December 31, 2020. In 2021, cash inflows were primarily provided by cash
receipts from operations, including cash from our sale and transfer of our receivables to third parties, the disposition of businesses,
including our recently completed U.S. video business transaction, and issuance of long-term debt and commercial paper. These
inflows were offset by cash used to meet the needs of the business, including, but not limited to, payment of operating expenses,
spectrum acquisitions, funding capital expenditures and vendor financing payments, investment in WarnerMedia content and
dividends to stockholders.We maintain significant availability under our credit facilities and our commercial paper program to meet
our short-term liquidity requirements.
48
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Our cash and debt management will be impacted by the WarnerMedia/Discovery transaction. During this time, we plan to maintain
cash and cash equivalent balances above historical thresholds.
Refer to “Contractual Obligations” discussion below for additional information regarding our cash requirements, including
payments required for Auction 110 which was completed in January 2022. We will make the remaining payment of $8,956 for
Auction 110 spectrum in the first quarter of 2022, funded with cash and short-term investments.
Cash Provided by or Used in Operating Activities
During 2021, cash provided by operating activities was $41,957 compared to $43,130 in 2020, reflecting higher content investment
and the separation of the U.S. video business, partially offset by higher receivable securitizations in 2021. Total cash paid for
WarnerMedia’s content investment was $19,164 in 2021, an increase of $4,266 over 2020.
We actively manage the timing of our supplier payments for operating items to optimize the use of our cash. Among other things,
we seek to make payments on 90-day or greater terms, while providing the suppliers with access to bank facilities that permit
earlier payments at their cost. In addition, for payments to a key supplier, as part of our working capital initiatives, we have
arrangements that allow us to extend payment terms up to 90 days at an additional cost to us (referred to as supplier financing). The
net impact of supplier financing was to improve cash from operating activities $25 in 2021 and $432 in 2020. All supplier financing
payments are due within one year.
Cash Used in or Provided by Investing Activities
During 2021, cash used in investing activities totaled $32,089, and consisted primarily of $16,527 (including interest during
construction) for capital expenditures, and acquisitions of $25,453, which includes C-Band spectrum licenses won in Auction 107,
associated capitalized interest, clearing and compensable relocation costs. Investing activities also included cash receipts of
approximately $5,370 (excluding cash on hand and $1,800 of financing activities) from the separation of our Video business and
$2,910 from the sale of Otter Media assets and Playdemic. In 2021, we received a return of investment of $1,323 from DIRECTV
representing distributions in excess of cumulative equity in earnings from DIRECTV (see Note 10).
On January 14, 2022, the FCC announced that we were the winning bidder for 1,624 3.45 GHz licenses in Auction 110. We
provided the FCC an upfront deposit of $123 in the third quarter of 2021 and will pay the remaining $8,956 in the first quarter of
2022, for a total of $9,079. We intend to fund the purchase price using cash and short-term investments. (See Note 6)
For capital improvements, we have negotiated favorable vendor payment terms of 120 days or more (referred to as vendor
financing) with some of our vendors, which are excluded from capital expenditures and reported as financing activities. Vendor
financing payments were $4,596 in 2021, compared to $2,966 in 2020. Capital expenditures in 2021 were $16,527, and when
including $4,596 cash paid for vendor financing and excluding $515 of FirstNet reimbursements, gross capital investment was
$21,638 ($1,934 higher than the prior year).
The vast majority of our capital expenditures are spent on our networks, including product development and related support
systems. In 2021, we placed $5,282 of equipment in service under vendor financing arrangements (compared to $4,664 in 2020)
and approximately $750 of assets related to the FirstNet build (compared to $1,230 in 2020). Total reimbursements from the
government for FirstNet were $865 for 2021 and $1,626 for 2020, predominantly for capital expenditures.
The amount of our capital expenditures is influenced by demand for services and products, capacity needs and network
enhancements. In 2022, we expect that our gross capital investment, which includes capital expenditures and cash paid for vendor
financing, will be in the $24,000 range with capital expenditures in the $20,000 range.
Cash Used in or Provided by Financing Activities
In 2021, cash provided by financing activities totaled $1,578 and was comprised of debt issuances and repayments, payments of
dividends, and vendor financing payments. We also paid approximately $459 in cash on the $1,800 note payable to DIRECTV (see
Note 6 and Note 20).
49
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
A tabular summary of our debt activity during 2021 is as follows:
First
QuarterSecond
QuarterThird
QuarterFourth
QuarterFull Year
2021
Net commercial paper borrowings $ 7,072 $ (513)$ (2)$ 4 $ 6,561 
Issuance of Notes and Debentures:
U.S. dollar denominated global notes $ 6,000 $ — $ — $ — $ 6,000 
Initial average rate of 1.27%
Euro denominated global notes (converted to USD at issuance) 1,461 — — — 1,461 
Rate of 0.00%
2021 Syndicated Term Loan 7,350 — — — 7,350 
BAML Bilateral Term Loan 2,000 — — — 2,000 
Private financing 750 — — — 750 
Other 636 — 835 — 1,471 
Debt Issuances $18,197 $ — $ 835 $ — $19,032 
Repayments:
Private financing $ (649)$ — $ — $ — $ (649)
2.650% Euro denominated global notes due 2021 — — — (1,349) (1,349)
Other (253) (253) (498) (140) (1,144)
Repayments of long-term debt $ (902)$ (253)$ (498)$ (1,489)$ (3,142)
Includes $1,316 net issuance of commercial paper with original maturities of three months or less, $12,755 of commercial paper issued greater
than 90 days and $7,510 of commercial paper repaid greater than 90 days.
Includes credit agreement borrowing.
The weighted average interest rate of our long-term debt portfolio, including, credit agreement borrowings and the impact of
derivatives, was approximately 3.8% as of December 31, 2021 and 4.1% as of December 31, 2020. We had $169,147 of total notes
and debentures outstanding at December 31, 2021, which included Euro, British pound sterling, Canadian dollar, Mexican peso,
Australian dollar, and Swiss franc denominated debt that totaled approximately $41,249.
At December 31, 2021, we had $24,630 of debt maturing within one year, consisting of $6,586 of commercial paper borrowings,
$10,100 of credit agreement borrowings, and $7,944 of long-term debt issuances.
During 2021, we paid $4,596 of cash under our vendor financing program, compared to $2,966 in 2020. Total vendor financing
payables included in our December 31, 2021 consolidated balance sheet were approximately $5,000, with $3,950 due within one
year (in “Accounts payable and accrued liabilities”) and the remainder predominantly due within five years (in “Other noncurrent
liabilities”).
At December 31, 2021, we had approximately 178 million shares remaining from our share repurchase authorizations approved by
the Board of Directors in 2014.
We paid dividends on common shares and preferred shares of $15,068 in 2021, compared with $14,956 in 2020.
Dividends on common stock declared by our Board of Directors totaled $2.08 per share in both 2021 and 2020. Our dividend
policy considers the expectations and requirements of stockholders, capital funding requirements of AT&T and long-term growth
opportunities. On February 1, 2022, we announced that our Board of Directors approved an expected annual dividend level of $1.11
per share, or approximately $8,000 per year, following the close of the WarnerMedia/Discovery transaction.
Our 2022 financing activities will focus on managing our debt level and paying dividends, subject to approval by our Board of
Directors. We plan to fund our financing uses of cash through a combination of cash from operations, issuance of debt, and asset
sales. The timing and mix of any debt issuance and/or refinancing will be guided by credit market conditions and interest rate
trends.1
2
1
2 
50
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Credit Facilities
The following summary of our various credit and loan agreements does not purport to be complete and is qualified in its entirety by
reference to each agreement filed as exhibits to our Annual Report on Form 10-K.
We use credit facilities as a tool in managing our liquidity status. In November 2020, we amended one of our $7,500 revolving
credit agreements by extending the termination date. In total, we have two $7,500 revolving credit agreements, totaling $15,000,
with one terminating on December 11, 2023 and the other terminating on November 17, 2025. No amounts were outstanding under
either agreement as of December 31, 2021.
On January 29, 2021, we entered into a $14,700 Term Loan Credit Agreement (2021 Syndicated Term Loan), with Bank of
America, N.A., as agent. On March 23, 2021, we borrowed $7,350 under the 2021 Syndicated Term Loan, and the remaining
$7,350 of lenders’ commitments was terminated. As of December 31, 2021, $7,350 was outstanding and is due on March 22, 2022.
In March 2021, we entered into and drew on a $2,000 term loan credit agreement (BAML Bilateral Term Loan) consisting of (i) a
$1,000 facility originally due December 31, 2021 (BAML Tranche A Facility) and subsequently extended to December 31, 2022 in
the fourth quarter of 2021, and (ii) a $1,000 facility due December 31, 2022 (BAML Tranche B Facility), with Bank of America,
N.A., as agent. At December 31, 2021, $2,000 was outstanding under these facilities.
We also utilize other external financing sources, which include various credit arrangements supported by government agencies to
support network equipment purchases as well as a commercial paper program.
 
Each of our credit and loan agreements contains covenants that are customary for an issuer with an investment grade senior debt
credit rating as well as a net debt-to-EBITDA financial ratio covenant requiring AT&T to maintain, as of the last day of each fiscal
quarter through June 30, 2023, a ratio of not more than 4.0-to-1, and a ratio of not more than 3.5-to-1 for any fiscal quarter
thereafter. As of December 31, 2021, we were in compliance with the covenants for our credit facilities.
Collateral Arrangements
Most of our counterparty collateral arrangements require cash collateral posting by AT&T only when derivative market values
exceed certain thresholds. Under these arrangements, which cover approximately 97% of our approximate $41,000 derivative
portfolio, counterparties are still required to post collateral. During 2021, we posted approximately $770 of cash collateral, on a net
basis. Cash postings under these arrangements vary with changes in credit ratings and netting agreements. (See Note 13)
Other
Our total capital consists of debt (long-term debt and debt maturing within one year) and stockholders’ equity. Our capital structure
does not include debt issued by our equity method investments. At December 31, 2021, our debt ratio was 49.1%, compared to
46.7% at December 31, 2020 and 44.7% at December 31, 2019. Our net debt ratio was 43.2% at December 31, 2021, compared to
43.8% at December 31, 2020 and 41.4% at December 31, 2019. The debt ratio is affected by the same factors that affect total
capital, and reflects our recent debt issuances and repayments.
A significant amount of our cash outflows is related to tax items, acquisition of spectrum through FCC auctions and benefits paid
for current and former employees:
•Total taxes incurred, collected and remitted by AT&T during 2021 and 2020, were $21,739 and $21,967. These taxes include
income, franchise, property, sales, excise, payroll, gross receipts and various other taxes and fees.
•Total domestic spectrum acquired primarily through FCC auctions, including cash, exchanged spectrum and auction deposits
was approximately $25,400 in 2021, $2,800 in 2020 and $1,300 in 2019.
•Total health and welfare benefits provided to certain active and retired employees and their dependents totaled $3,617 in 2021
and $3,656 in 2020, with $1,163 paid from plan assets in 2021 compared to $1,029 in 2020. Of those benefits, $3,210 related
to medical and prescription drug benefits in 2021 compared to $3,293 in 2020. In addition, in 2021, we prefunded $685 for
future benefit payments versus $745 in 2020. We paid $5,942 of pension benefits out of plan assets in 2021 compared to
$5,124 in 2020.
On May 17, 2021, we entered into an agreement to combine our WarnerMedia segment with a subsidiary of Discovery. The
transaction is anticipated to close in the second quarter of 2022, subject to approval by Discovery shareholders and customary
closing conditions, including receipt of regulatory approvals. We expect to receive $43,000 (subject to working capital and other
adjustments) in a combination of cash, debt securities, and WarnerMedia’s retention of certain debt. (See Note 6)
51
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
On May 17, 2021, in anticipation of the separation of WarnerMedia business from us, Spinco entered into a $41,500 commitment
letter (Bridge Loan). On June 4, 2021, Spinco entered into a $10,000 term loan credit agreement (Spinco Term Loan) consisting of
(i) an 18 month $3,000 tranche (Tranche 1 Facility), and (ii) a 3 year $7,000 tranche (Tranche 2 Facility), with JPMorgan Chase
Bank, N.A., as agent. In connection with the execution of the Spinco Term Loan, the aggregate commitment amount under the
Bridge Loan was reduced to $31,500. No amounts were outstanding as of December 31, 2021.
Contractual Obligations
Our contractual obligations as of December 31, 2021, and the estimated timing of payment, are in the following table:
Payments Due By Period
TotalLess than
1 Year1-3
Years3-5
YearsMore than
5 Years
Long-term debt obligations $ 181,449 $ 18,185 $ 19,301 $ 17,041 $ 126,922 
Interest payments on long-term debt 117,454 6,710 12,624 11,400 86,720 
Purchase obligations 77,621 28,860 24,585 11,636 12,540 
Operating lease obligations 29,852 4,922 8,472 5,772 10,686 
FirstNet sustainability payments 17,400 195 390 1,785 15,030 
Unrecognized tax benefits 10,108 268 — — 9,840 
Other finance obligations 12,724 4,635 2,414 1,524 4,151 
Note payable to DIRECTV 1,341 1,245 96 — — 
Total Contractual Obligations $ 447,949 $ 65,020 $ 67,882 $ 49,158 $ 265,889 
Represents principal or payof f amounts of notes, debentures and credit agreement borrowings at maturity or , for puttable debt, the next put
opportunity (see Note 12). Foreign debt includes the impact from hedges, when applicable.
Includes credit agreement borrowings.
We expect to fund the purchase obligations with cash provided by operations or through incremental borrowings. Consists of commitments
primarily related to network programming at WarnerMedia, spectrum acquisitions and other commercial commitments. The minimum
commitment for certain obligations is based on termination penalties that could be paid to exit the contracts. (See Note 22)
Represents operating lease payments (see Note 8).
Represents contractual commitment to make sustainability payments over the 25-year contract. These sustainability payments represent our
commitment to fund FirstNet’ s operating expenses and future reinvestment in the network, which we own and operate. FirstNet has a statutory
requirement to reinvest funds that exceed the agency’ s operating expenses, which we anticipate to be $15,000. (See Note 21)
The noncurrent portion of the UTBs is included in the “More than 5 Years” column, as we cannot reasonably estimate the timing or amounts of
additional cash payments, if any , at this time (see Note 14).
Represents future minimum payments under the Crown Castle and other arrangements (see Note 19), payables subject to extended payment
terms (see Note 23) and finance lease payments (see Note 8).
Certain items were excluded from this table, as the year of payment is unknown and could not be reliably estimated since past
trends were not deemed to be an indicator of future payment, we believe the obligations are immaterial or because the settlement of
the obligation will not require the use of cash. These items include: deferred income tax liability of $65,226 (see Note 14); net
postemployment benefit obligations of $13,927 (including current portion); and other noncurrent liabilities of $13,409.
Contractual obligations at December 31, 2021 include approximately $36,912 of commitments related to our WarnerMedia
segment, which we have entered into an agreement to combine with Discovery (see Note 6).
ITEM 7A. QUANTITATIVE AND QUALITATIVE DISCLOSURES ABOUT MARKET RISK
We are exposed to market risks primarily from changes in interest rates and foreign currency exchange rates. These risks, along
with other business risks, impact our cost of capital. It is our policy to manage our debt structure and foreign exchange exposure in
order to manage capital costs, control financial risks and maintain financial flexibility over the long term. In managing market risks,
we employ derivatives according to documented policies and procedures, including interest rate swaps, interest rate locks, foreign
currency exchange contracts and combined interest rate foreign currency contracts (cross-currency swaps). We do not use
derivatives for trading or speculative purposes. We do not foresee significant changes in the strategies we use to manage market
risk in the near future.1
2
3
4
5
6
7
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
52
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
One of the most significant assumptions used in estimating our postretirement benefit obligations is the assumed weighted-average
discount rate, which is the hypothetical rate at which the projected benefit obligations could be effectively settled or paid out to
participants. We determined our discount rate based on a range of factors, including a yield curve composed of the rates of return
on several hundred high-quality, fixed income corporate bonds available at the measurement date and corresponding to the related
expected durations of future cash outflows for the obligations. In recent years, the discount rates have been increasingly volatile,
and on average have been lower than in historical periods. Lower discount rates used to measure our pension and postretirement
plans result in higher obligations. Future increases in these rates could result in lower obligations, improved funded status and
actuarial gains.
Interest Rate Risk
The majority of our financial instruments are medium- and long-term fixed-rate notes and debentures. Changes in interest rates can
lead to significant fluctuations in the fair value of these instruments. The principal amounts by expected maturity, average interest
rate and fair value of our liabilities that are exposed to interest rate risk are described in Notes 12 and 13. In managing interest
expense, we control our mix of fixed and floating rate debt through term loans, floating rate notes, and interest rate swaps. We have
established interest rate risk limits that we closely monitor by measuring interest rate sensitivities in our debt and interest rate
derivatives portfolios.
Most of our foreign-denominated long-term debt has been swapped from fixed-rate or floating-rate foreign currencies to fixed-rate
U.S. dollars at issuance through cross-currency swaps, removing interest rate risk and foreign currency exchange risk associated
with the underlying interest and principal payments. Likewise, periodically we enter into interest rate locks to partially hedge the
risk of increases in the benchmark interest rate during the period leading up to the probable issuance of fixed-rate debt. We expect
gains or losses in our cross-currency swaps and interest rate locks to offset the losses and gains in the financial instruments they
hedge.
We had no interest rate swaps and no interest rate locks at December 31, 2021.
Foreign Exchange Risk
We principally use foreign exchange contracts to hedge certain film production costs denominated in foreign currencies. We are
also exposed to foreign currency exchange risk through our foreign affiliates and equity investments in foreign companies. We have
designated €1,450 million aggregate principal amount of debt as a hedge of the variability of certain Euro-denominated net
investments of our subsidiaries. The gain or loss on the debt that is designated as, and is effective as, an economic hedge of the net
investment in a foreign operation is recorded as a currency translation adjustment within accumulated other comprehensive income,
net on the consolidated balance sheet.
Through cross-currency swaps, most of our foreign-denominated debt has been swapped from fixed-rate or floating-rate foreign
currencies to fixed-rate U.S. dollars at issuance, removing interest rate and foreign currency exchange risk associated with the
underlying interest and principal payments. We expect gains or losses in our cross-currency swaps to offset the gains and losses in
the financial instruments they hedge. We had cross-currency swaps with a notional value of $40,737 and a fair value of $(2,959)
outstanding at December 31, 2021.
For the purpose of assessing specific risks, we use a sensitivity analysis to determine the effects that market risk exposures may
have on the fair value of our financial instruments and results of operations. We had foreign exchange forward contracts with a
notional value of $30 and a fair value of $(33) outstanding at December 31, 2021.
53
AT&T  Inc.
Report of Management
The consolidated financial statements have been prepared in conformity with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles. The
integrity and objectivity of the data in these financial statements, including estimates and judgments relating to matters not
concluded by year end, are the responsibility of management, as is all other information included in the Annual Report, unless
otherwise indicated.
The financial statements of AT&T Inc. (AT&T) have been audited by Ernst & Young LLP, Independent Registered Public
Accounting Firm. Management has made available to Ernst & Young LLP all of AT&T’s financial records and related data, as well
as the minutes of stockholders’ and directors’ meetings. Furthermore, management believes that all representations made to Ernst &
Young LLP during its audit were valid and appropriate.
Management maintains disclosure controls and procedures that are designed to ensure that information required to be disclosed by
AT&T is recorded, processed, summarized, accumulated and communicated to its management, including its principal executive
and principal financial officers, to allow timely decisions regarding required disclosure, and reported within the time periods
specified by the Securities and Exchange Commission’s rules and forms.
Management also seeks to ensure the objectivity and integrity of its financial data by the careful selection of its managers, by
organizational arrangements that provide an appropriate division of responsibility and by communication programs aimed at
ensuring that its policies, standards and managerial authorities are understood throughout the organization.
The Audit Committee of the Board of Directors meets periodically with management, the internal auditors and the independent
auditors to review the manner in which they are performing their respective responsibilities and to discuss auditing, internal
accounting controls and financial reporting matters. Both the internal auditors and the independent auditors periodically meet alone
with the Audit Committee and have access to the Audit Committee at any time.
Assessment of Internal Control
The management of AT&T is responsible for establishing and maintaining adequate internal control over financial reporting, as
defined in Rule 13a-15(f) or 15d-15(f) under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. AT&T’s internal control system was designed to
provide reasonable assurance to the company’s management and Board of Directors regarding the preparation and fair presentation
of published financial statements.
AT&T management assessed the effectiveness of the company’s internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2021.
In making this assessment, it used the criteria set forth by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway
Commission (COSO) in Internal Control – Integrated Framework (2013 framework). Based on its assessment, AT&T management
believes that, as of December 31, 2021, the company’s internal control over financial reporting is effective based on those criteria.
Ernst & Young LLP, the independent registered public accounting firm that audited the financial statements included in this Annual
Report, has issued an attestation report on the company’s internal control over financial reporting.
/s/John T. Stankey /s/Pascal Desroches .
John T. Stankey Pascal Desroches
Chief Executive Officer
   and PresidentSenior Executive Vice President
   and Chief Financial Officer
54
AT&T  Inc.
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
To the Stockholders and the Board of Directors of AT&T Inc.
Opinion on the Financial Statements
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of AT&T Inc. (the Company) as of December 31, 2021 and 2020,
the related consolidated statements of income, comprehensive income, cash flows and changes in stockholders’ equity for each of
the three years in the period ended December 31, 2021, and the related notes and financial statement schedule listed in Item 15(a)
(collectively referred to as the “consolidated financial statements”). In our opinion, the consolidated financial statements present
fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of the Company at December 31, 2021 and 2020, and the results of its
operations and its cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2021, in conformity with U.S. generally
accepted accounting principles.
We also have audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States)
(PCAOB), the Company’s internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2021, based on criteria established in
Internal Control—Integrated Framework issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission
(2013 framework) and our report dated February 16, 2022 expressed an unqualified opinion thereon.
Basis for Opinion
These financial statements are the responsibility of the Company’s management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on the
Company’s financial statements based on our audits. We are a public accounting firm registered with the PCAOB and are required
to be independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and
regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the
audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the financial statements are free of material misstatement, whether due to error
or fraud. Our audits included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of the financial statements,
whether due to error or fraud, and performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such procedures included examining, on a test
basis, evidence regarding the amounts and disclosures in the financial statements. Our audits also included evaluating the
accounting principles used and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of the
financial statements. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinion.
Critical Audit Matters
The critical audit matters communicated below are matters arising from the current period audit of the financial statements that
were communicated or required to be communicated to the audit committee and that: (1) relate to accounts or disclosures that are
material to the financial statements and (2) involved our especially challenging, subjective or complex judgments. The
communication of critical audit matters does not alter in any way our opinion on the consolidatedfinancial statements, taken as a
whole, and we are not, by communicating the critical audit matters below, providing separate opinions on the critical audit matters
or on the accounts or disclosures to which they relate.
Discount rates used in determining pension and postretirement benefit obligations
Description of the
MatterAt December 31, 2021, the Company’s pension benefit obligation was $57,212 million and exceeded the fair
value of defined benefit pension plan assets of $54,401 million, resulting in an unfunded benefit obligation of
$2,811 million. Additionally, at December 31, 2021, the Company’s postretirement benefit obligation was
$12,552 million and exceeded the fair value of postretirement plan assets of $3,198 million, resulting in an
unfunded benefit obligation of $9,354 million. As explained in Note 15 to the consolidated financial
statements, the Company updates the assumptions used to measure the defined benefit pension and
postretirement benefit obligations, including discount rates, at December 31 or upon a remeasurement event.
The Company determines the discount rates used to measure the obligations based on the development of a
yield curve using high-quality corporate bonds selected to yield cash flows that correspond to the expected
timing and amount of the expected future benefit payments. 
55
AT&T  Inc.
Auditing the defined benefit pension and postretirement benefit obligations was complex due to the
judgmental nature of the actuarial assumptions made by management, primarily the discount rate, used in the
Company’s measurement process. The discount rate has a significant effect on the measurement of the
defined benefit pension and postretirement benefit obligations, and auditing the discount rate was complex
because it required an evaluation of the credit quality of the corporate bonds used to develop the discount rate
and the correlation of those bonds’ cash inflows to the timing and amount of future expected benefit
payments.
How We
Addressed the
Matter in Our
AuditWe obtained an understanding, evaluated the design and tested the operating effectiveness of certain controls
over management’s review of the determination of the discount rates used in the defined benefit pension and
postretirement benefit obligations calculations.
To test the determination of the discount rate used in the calculation of the defined benefit pension and
postretirement benefit obligations, we performed audit procedures that focused on evaluating, with the
assistance of our actuarial specialists, the determination of the discount rates, among other procedures. For
example, we evaluated the selected yield curve used to determine the discount rates applied in measuring the
defined benefit pension and postretirement benefit obligations. As part of this assessment, we considered the
credit quality of the corporate bonds that comprise the yield curve and compared the timing and amount of
cash flows at maturity with the expected amounts and duration of the related benefit payments.
Evaluation of goodwill for impairment
Description of the
MatterAt December 31, 2021, the Company’s goodwill balance was $133,223 million. As discussed in Note 1 to the
consolidated financial statements, reporting unit goodwill is tested at least annually for impairment.
Estimating fair values in connection with these impairment evaluations involves the utilization of discounted
cash flow models and market multiples valuation approaches.
Auditing management’s annual goodwill impairment test for the reporting units was complex because the
estimation of fair values involves subjective management assumptions, such as estimates of the projected
rates of discrete and long-term growth of cash flows and weighted average cost of capital. These assumptions
are forward-looking and could be affected by shifts in the evolving market landscape. Changes in these
assumptions can have a material effect on the determination of fair value.
How We Addressed
the
Matter in Our
AuditWe obtained an understanding, evaluated the design and tested the operating effectiveness of controls over the
Company’s impairment evaluation processes. Our procedures included testing controls over management’s
review of the valuation models and the significant assumptions described above.
Our audit procedures to test management’s impairment evaluations included, among others, assessing the
valuation methodologies and significant assumptions discussed above and the underlying data used to
develop such assumptions. For example, we compared the significant assumptions to current industry, market
and economic trends, and other guideline companies in the same industry. Where appropriate, we evaluated
whether changes to the Company’s business model, customer base and other factors would affect the
significant assumptions. We also assessed the historical accuracy of management’s estimates and performed
independent sensitivity analyses. We involved our valuation specialists to assist us in performing our audit
procedures to test the estimated fair values of the Company’s reporting units.
56
AT&T  Inc.
Accounting for the investment in DIRECTV
Description of the
MatterAs discussed in Notes 6 and 10, on July 31, 2021, the Company closed on a transaction with TPG to form a
new company named DIRECTV Entertainment Holdings, LLC (DIRECTV). In connection with the
transaction, the Company contributed its U.S. Video business unit to DIRECTV for $4,250 million of junior
preferred units, an additional distribution preference of $4,200 million and a 70% economic interest in
common units. DIRECTV was considered a variable interest entity for accounting purposes. The Company
concluded that it was not the primary beneficiary and accordingly deconsolidated DIRECTV and accounted
for its investment under the equity method of accounting. The initial fair value of the Company’s investment
in DIRECTV on July 31, 2021 was $6,852 million, which was determined using a discounted cash flow
model, reflecting distribution rights and preference of the individual instruments.
Auditing management’s application of the variable interest entity consolidation model to this transaction, and
its initial estimate of the fair value of the Company’s investment in DIRECTV, required significant judgment.
In particular, management’s assessment of whether the Company is the primary beneficiary under the variable
interest model required significant judgment to determine the activities of the investee that most significantly
impact the investee’s economics, and management applied significant judgment in determining and applying
the valuation model used to estimate the initial fair value of the Company’s investment in DIRECTV.
How We Addressed
the
Matter in Our
AuditWe obtained an understanding, evaluated the design and tested the operating effectiveness of controls over the
Company’s application of the variable interest entity consolidation model, including the identification of the
activities that most significantly impact DIRECTV’s economics, and its selection and application of the
model used to estimate the initial fair value of the Company’s investment in DIRECTV.
Our audit procedures to test the appropriateness of management’s application of the variable interest entity
consolidation model to the DIRECTV transaction included, among others, evaluating the design and purpose
of the variable interest entity, and assessing the terms of the arrangement, that were relevant to the evaluation
of DIRECTV’s significant activities. Our procedures to test the valuation of AT&T’s investment in DIRECTV
included, among others, involving our valuation specialists in assessing the reasonableness of the selected
valuation methodology, performing an independent calculation, and performing sensitivity analysis for certain
assumptions in the model.
/s/ Ernst & Young LLP
We have served as the Company’s auditor since 1999.
Dallas, Texas
February 16, 2022
57
AT&T  Inc.
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
To the Stockholders and the Board of Directors of AT&T Inc.
Opinion on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
We have audited AT&T Inc.’s internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2021, based on criteria established in
Internal Control—Integrated Framework issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission
(2013 framework) (the COSO criteria). In our opinion, AT&T Inc. (the Company) maintained, in all material respects, effective
internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2021, based on the COSO criteria.
We also have audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States)
(PCAOB), the 2021 consolidated financial statements of the Company and our report dated February 16, 2022 expressed an
unqualified opinion thereon.
Basis for Opinion
The Company’s management is responsible for maintaining effective internal control over financial reporting and for its assessment
of the effectiveness of internal control over financial reporting included in the accompanying Report of Management. Our
responsibility is to express an opinion on the Company’s internal control over financial reporting based on our audit. We are a
public accounting firm registered with the PCAOB and are required to be independent with respect to the Company in accordance
with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the
PCAOB.
We conducted our audit in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the
audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether effective internal control over financial reporting was maintained in all material
respects.
Our audit included obtaining an understanding of internal control over financial reporting, assessing the risk that a material
weakness exists, testing and evaluating the design and operating effectiveness of internal control based on the assessed risk, and
performing such other procedures as we considered necessary in the circumstances. We believe that our audit provides a reasonable
basis for our opinion.
Definition and Limitations of Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
A company’s internal control over financial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability
of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted
accounting principles. A company’s internal control over financial reporting includes those policies and procedures that (1) pertain
to the maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and dispositions of the assets of
the company; (2) provide reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial
statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the company are
being made only in accordance with authorizations of management and directors of the company; and (3) provide reasonable
assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use, or disposition of the company’s assets that
could have a material effect on the financial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements. Also,
projections of any evaluation of effectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that controls may become inadequate because
of changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the policies or procedures may deteriorate.
/s/ Ernst & Young LLP
Dallas, Texas
February 16, 2022
58
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA
Consolidated Statements of Income
2021 2020 2019
Operating Revenues
Service $ 146,391 $ 152,767 $ 163,499 
Equipment 22,473 18,993 17,694 
Total operating revenues 168,864 171,760 181,193 
Operating Expenses
Cost of revenues
Equipment 23,778 19,706 18,653 
Broadcast, programming and operations 24,797 27,305 31,132 
Other cost of revenues (exclusive of depreciation
and amortization shown separately below) 31,232 32,909 34,356 
Selling, general and administrative 37,944 38,039 39,422 
Asset impairments and abandonments 4,904 18,880 1,458 
Depreciation and amortization 22,862 28,516 28,217 
Total operating expenses 145,517 165,355 153,238 
Operating Income 23,347 6,405 27,955 
Other Income (Expense)
Interest expense (6,884) (7,925) (8,422)
Equity in net income of affiliates 631 95 6 
Other income (expense) – net 9,853 (1,431) (1,071)
Total other income (expense) 3,600 (9,261) (9,487)
Income (Loss) Before Income Taxes 26,947 (2,856) 18,468 
Income tax expense 5,468 965 3,493 
Net Income (Loss) 21,479 (3,821) 14,975 
Less: Net Income Attributable to Noncontrolling Interest (1,398) (1,355) (1,072)
Net Income (Loss) Attributable to AT&T $ 20,081 $ (5,176)$ 13,903 
Less: Preferred Stock Dividends (207) (193) (3)
Net Income (Loss) Attributable to Common Stock $ 19,874 $ (5,369)$ 13,900 
Basic Earnings Per Share Attributable to Common Stock $ 2.77 $ (0.75)$ 1.90 
Diluted Earnings Per Share Attributable to Common Stock $ 2.76 $ (0.75)$ 1.89 
The accompanying notes are an integral part of the consolidated financial statements.
59
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income
2021 2020 2019
Net income (loss) $ 21,479 $ (3,821)$ 14,975 
Other comprehensive income (loss), net of tax:
Foreign Currency:
Translation adjustment (includes $(2), $(59) and $(9) attributable to
noncontrolling interest), net of taxes of $(44), $(42) and $18 (127) (929) 19 
Reclassification adjustment included in net income (loss), net of taxes of
$204, $0 and $0 2,087 — — 
Securities:
Net unrealized gains (losses), net of taxes of $(21), $27 and $17 (63) 78 50 
Reclassification adjustment included in net income (loss),
net of taxes of $(1), $(5) and $0 (3) (15) — 
Derivative Instruments:
Net unrealized gains (losses), net of taxes of $(192), $(212) and $(240) (715) (811) (900)
Reclassification adjustment included in net income (loss), net of taxes
of $19, $18 and $12 72 69 45 
Defined benefit postretirement plans:
Net prior service (cost) credit arising during period, net of taxes of $(8),
$735 and $1,134 (34) 2,250 3,457 
Amortization of net prior service credit included in net income (loss),
net of taxes of $(660), $(601) and $(475) (2,020) (1,841) (1,459)
Other comprehensive income (loss) (803) (1,199) 1,212 
Total comprehensive income (loss) 20,676 (5,020) 16,187 
Less: Total comprehensive income attributable to noncontrolling interest (1,396) (1,296) (1,063)
Total Comprehensive Income (Loss) Attributable to AT&T $ 19,280 $ (6,316)$ 15,124 
The accompanying notes are an integral part of the consolidated financial statements.
60
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Consolidated Balance Sheets
December 31,
2021 2020
Assets
Current Assets
Cash and cash equivalents $ 21,169 $ 9,740 
Accounts receivable – net of related allowance for credit loss of $771 and $1,221 17,571 20,215 
Inventories 3,464 3,695 
Prepaid and other current assets 17,793 18,358 
Total current assets 59,997 52,008 
Noncurrent Inventories and Theatrical Film and Television Production Costs 18,983 14,752 
Property, Plant and Equipment – Net 125,904 127,315 
Goodwill 133,223 135,259 
Licenses – Net 113,830 93,840 
Trademarks and Trade Names – Net 21,938 23,297 
Distribution Networks – Net 11,942 13,793 
Other Intangible Assets – Net 11,783 15,386 
Investments in and Advances to Equity Affiliates 7,274 1,780 
Operating Lease Right-Of-Use Assets 24,180 24,714 
Other Assets 22,568 23,617 
Total Assets $ 551,622 $ 525,761 
Liabilities and Stockholders’ Equity
Current Liabilities
Debt maturing within one year $ 24,630 $ 3,470 
Note payable to DIRECTV 1,245 — 
Accounts payable and accrued liabilities 50,661 50,051 
Advanced billings and customer deposits 5,303 6,176 
Dividends payable 3,749 3,741 
Total current liabilities 85,588 63,438 
Long-Term Debt 152,724 153,775 
Deferred Credits and Other Noncurrent Liabilities
Deferred income taxes 65,226 60,472 
Postemployment benefit obligation 12,649 18,276 
Operating lease liabilities 21,261 22,202 
Other noncurrent liabilities 30,223 28,358 
Noncurrent portion of note payable to DIRECTV 96 — 
Total deferred credits and other noncurrent liabilities 129,455 129,308 
Stockholders’ Equity
Preferred stock ($1 par value, 10,000,000 authorized at December 31, 2021
and December 31, 2020):
Series A (48,000 issued and outstanding at December 31, 2021 and December 31, 2020) — — 
Series B (20,000 issued and outstanding at December 31, 2021 and December 31, 2020) — — 
Series C (70,000 issued and outstanding at December 31, 2021 and December 31, 2020) — — 
Common stock ($1 par value, 14,000,000,000 authorized at December 31, 2021 and
December 31, 2020: issued 7,620,748,598 at December 31, 2021 and December 31, 2020) 7,621 7,621 
Additional paid-in capital 130,112 130,175 
Retained earnings 42,350 37,457 
Treasury stock (479,684,705 at December 31, 2021 and 494,826,583 at December 31, 2020, at cost) (17,280) (17,910)
Accumulated other comprehensive income 3,529 4,330 
Noncontrolling interest 17,523 17,567 
Total stockholders’ equity 183,855 179,240 
Total Liabilities and Stockholders’ Equity $ 551,622 $ 525,761 
The accompanying notes are an integral part of the consolidated financial statements.
61
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows
2021 2020 2019
Operating Activities
Net income (loss) $ 21,479 $ (3,821)$ 14,975 
Adjustments to reconcile net income (loss) to net cash provided by
operating activities:
Depreciation and amortization 22,862 28,516 28,217 
Amortization of film and television costs 11,006 8,603 9,587 
Distributed (undistributed) earnings from investments in equity affiliates 184 38 295 
Provision for uncollectible accounts 1,240 1,972 2,575 
Deferred income tax expense 5,246 1,675 1,806 
Net (gain) loss on investments, net of impairments (927) (742) (1,218)
Pension and postretirement benefit expense (credit) (3,848) (2,992) (2,002)
Actuarial (gain) loss on pension and postretirement benefits (4,140) 4,169 5,171 
Asset impairments and abandonments 4,904 18,880 1,458 
Changes in operating assets and liabilities:
Receivables (634) 2,216 2,812 
Other current assets, inventories and theatrical film and television
production costs (16,472) (13,070) (12,852)
Accounts payable and other accrued liabilities 1,636 (1,410) (1,524)
Equipment installment receivables and related sales (265) (1,429) 548 
Deferred customer contract acquisition and fulfillment costs 52 376 (910)
Postretirement claims and contributions (822) (985) (1,008)
Other – net 456 1,134 738 
Total adjustments 20,478 46,951 33,693 
Net Cash Provided by Operating Activities 41,957 43,130 48,668 
Investing Activities
Capital expenditures (16,527) (15,675) (19,635)
Acquisitions, net of cash acquired (25,453) (1,851) (1,809)
Dispositions 8,740 3,641 4,684 
Distributions from DIRECTV in excess of cumulative equity in earnings 1,323 — — 
Other – net (172) 337 70 
Net Cash Used in Investing Activities (32,089) (13,548) (16,690)
Financing Activities
Net change in short-term borrowings with original maturities of
three months or less 1,316 (17) (276)
Issuance of other short-term borrowings 21,856 9,440 4,012 
Repayment of other short-term borrowings (7,510) (9,467) (6,904)
Issuance of long-term debt 9,931 31,988 17,039 
Repayment of long-term debt (3,142) (39,964) (27,592)
Note payable to DIRECTV, net of payments of $459 1,341  — — 
Payment of vendor financing (4,596) (2,966) (3,050)
Issuance of preferred stock — 3,869 1,164 
Purchase of treasury stock (202) (5,498) (2,417)
Issuance of treasury stock 96 105 631 
Issuance of preferred interests in subsidiaries — 1,979 7,876 
Redemption of preferred interest in subsidiary — (1,950) — 
Dividends paid (15,068) (14,956) (14,888)
Other – net (2,444) (4,570) (678)
Net Cash Provided by (Used in) Financing Activities 1,578 (32,007) (25,083)
Net increase (decrease) in cash and cash equivalents and restricted cash 11,446 (2,425) 6,895 
Cash and cash equivalents and restricted cash beginning of year 9,870 12,295 5,400 
Cash and Cash Equivalents and Restricted Cash End of Year $ 21,316 $ 9,870 $ 12,295 
The accompanying notes are an integral part of the consolidated financial statements.
62
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars and shares in millions except per share amounts
Consolidated Statements of Changes in Stockholders’ Equity
2021 2020 2019
Shares Amount Shares Amount Shares Amount
Preferred Stock – Series A
Balance at beginning of year — $ — — $ — — $ — 
Issuance of stock — — — — — — 
Balance at end of year — $ — — $ — — $ — 
Preferred Stock – Series B
Balance at beginning of year — $ — — $ — — $ — 
Issuance of stock — — — — — — 
Balance at end of year — $ — — $ — — $ — 
Preferred Stock – Series C
Balance at beginning of year — $ — — $ — — $ — 
Issuance of stock — — — — — — 
Balance at end of year — $ — — $ — — $ — 
Common Stock
Balance at beginning of year 7,621 $ 7,621 7,621 $ 7,621 7,621 $ 7,621 
Issuance of stock — — — — — — 
Balance at end of year 7,621 $ 7,621 7,621 $ 7,621 7,621 $ 7,621 
Additional Paid-In Capital
Balance at beginning of year $ 130,175 $ 126,279 $ 125,525 
Repurchase and acquisition of
common stock — 67 — 
Issuance of preferred stock — 3,869 1,164 
Issuance of treasury stock (76) (62) (125)
Share-based payments 13 18 (271)
Changes related to acquisition of
interests held by noncontrolling
owners — 4 (14)
Balance at end of year $ 130,112 $ 130,175 $ 126,279 
Retained Earnings
Balance at beginning of year $ 37,457 $ 57,936 $ 58,753 
Cumulative effect of accounting
changes and other adjustments — (293) 316 
Adjusted beginning balance 37,457 57,643 59,069 
Net income (loss) attributable to AT&T 20,081 (5,176) 13,903 
Preferred stock dividends (224) (139) (8)
Common stock dividends ($2.08, $2.08,
and $2.05 per share) (14,964) (14,871) (15,028)
Balance at end of year $ 42,350 $ 37,457 $ 57,936 
The accompanying notes are an integral part of the consolidated financial statements.
63
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars and shares in millions except per share amounts
Consolidated Statements of Changes in Stockholders’ Equity - continued
2021 2020 2019
Shares Amount Shares Amount Shares Amount
Treasury Stock
Balance at beginning of year (495)$ (17,910) (366)$ (13,085) (339)$ (12,059)
Repurchase and acquisition of
common stock (8) (237) (150) (5,631) (67) (2,492)
Issuance of treasury stock 23 867 21 806 40 1,466 
Balance at end of year (480)$ (17,280) (495)$ (17,910) (366)$ (13,085)
Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income
Attributable to AT&T, net of tax:
Balance at beginning of year $ 4,330 $ 5,470 $ 4,249 
Other comprehensive income (loss)
attributable to AT&T (801) (1,140) 1,221 
Balance at end of year $ 3,529 $ 4,330 $ 5,470 
Noncontrolling Interest:
Balance at beginning of year $ 17,567 $ 17,713 $ 9,795 
Cumulative effect of accounting
changes and other adjustments — (7) 29 
Adjusted beginning balance 17,567 17,706 9,824 
Net income attributable to
noncontrolling interest 1,398 1,355 1,072 
Issuance and acquisition of
noncontrolling owners 7 1,979 7,881 
Redemption of noncontrolling interest — (1,950) — 
Distributions (1,447) (1,464) (1,055)
Translation adjustments attributable to
noncontrolling interest, net of taxes (2) (59) (9)
Balance at end of year $ 17,523 $ 17,567 $ 17,713 
Total Stockholders’ Equity at
beginning of year $ 179,240 $ 201,934 $ 193,884 
Total Stockholders’ Equity at
end of year $ 183,855 $ 179,240 $ 201,934 
The accompanying notes are an integral part of the consolidated financial statements.
64
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
NOTE 1. SUMMARY OF SIGNIFICANT ACCOUNTING POLICIES
Basis of Presentation Throughout this document, AT&T Inc. is referred to as “AT&T,” “we” or the “Company.” The consolidated
financial statements include the accounts of the Company and subsidiaries and affiliates which we control. AT&T is a holding
company whose subsidiaries and affiliates operate worldwide in the telecommunications, media and technology industries.
On July 31, 2021, we closed our transaction with TPG Capital (TPG) to form a new company named DIRECTV Entertainment
Holdings, LLC (DIRECTV). With the close of the transaction, we separated and deconsolidated our Video business, comprised of
our U.S. video operations, and began accounting for our investment in DIRECTV under the equity method (see Notes 6 and 10).
On November 15, 2021, we sold our Latin America video operations, Vrio, to Grupo Werthein (see Note 6).
All significant intercompany transactions are eliminated in the consolidation process. Investments in subsidiaries and partnerships
which we do not control but have significant influence are accounted for under the equity method. Earnings from certain
investments accounted for using the equity method are included in our results on a one quarter lag. We also record our
proportionate share of our equity method investees’ other comprehensive income (OCI) items, including translation adjustments.
We treat distributions received from equity method investees as returns on investment and classify them as cash flows from
operating activities until those distributions exceed our cumulative equity in the earnings of that investment. We treat the excess
amount as a return of investment and classify it as cash flows from investing activities.
The preparation of financial statements in conformity with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) requires
management to make estimates and assumptions, including other estimates of probable losses and expenses, that affect the amounts
reported in the financial statements and accompanying notes. Actual results could differ from those estimates. Certain prior-period
amounts have been conformed to the current period’s presentation.
Accounting Policies and Adopted Accounting Standards
Credit Losses As of January 1, 2020, we adopted, through modified retrospective application, the Financial Accounting Standards
Board’s (FASB) Accounting Standards Update (ASU) No. 2016-13, “Financial Instruments—Credit Losses (Topic 326):
Measurement of Credit Losses on Financial Instruments,” or Accounting Standards Codification (ASC) 326 (ASC 326), which
replaces the incurred loss impairment methodology under prior GAAP with an expected credit loss model. ASC 326 affects trade
receivables, loans, contract assets, certain beneficial interests, off-balance-sheet credit exposures not accounted for as insurance and
other financial assets that are not subject to fair value through net income, as defined by the standard. Under the expected credit
loss model, we are required to consider future economic trends to estimate expected credit losses over the lifetime of the asset.
Upon adoption on January 1, 2020, we recorded a $293 reduction to “Retained earnings,” $395 increase to “Allowances for credit
losses” applicable to our trade and loan receivables, $10 reduction of contract assets, $105 reduction of net deferred income tax
liability and $7 reduction of “Noncontrolling interest.” Our adoption of ASC 326 did not have a material impact on our financial
statements.
Leases As of January 1, 2019, we adopted, with modified retrospective  application, the FASB's ASU No. 2016-02, “Leases (Topic
842)” (ASC 842), which replaces existing leasing rules with a comprehensive lease measurement and recognition standard and
expanded disclosure requirements (see Note 8). ASC 842 requires lessees to recognize most leases on their balance sheets as
liabilities, with corresponding “right-of-use” assets. For income statement recognition purposes, leases are classified as either a
finance or an operating lease without relying upon bright-line tests.
The key change upon adoption of the standard was balance sheet recognition of operating leases, given that the recognition of lease
expense on our income statement is similar to our historical accounting. Using the modified retrospective transition method of
adoption, we did not adjust the balance sheet for comparative periods but recorded a cumulative effect adjustment to retained
earnings on January 1, 2019. We elected the package of practical expedients permitted under the transition guidance within the new
standard, which, among other things, allowed us to carry forward our historical lease classification. We also elected the practical
expedient related to land easements, allowing us to carry forward our accounting treatment for land easements on existing
agreements that were not accounted for as leases. We excluded leases with original terms of one year or less. Additionally, we
elected to not separate lease and non-lease components for certain classes of assets. Our accounting for finance leases did not
change from our prior accounting for capital leases.
65
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
The adoption of ASC 842 resulted in the recognition of an operating lease liability of $22,121 and an operating right-of-use asset of
the same amount. Existing prepaid and deferred rent accruals were recorded as an offset to the right-of-use asset, resulting in a net
asset of $20,960. The cumulative effect of the adoption to retained earnings was an increase of $316 reflecting the reclassification
of deferred gains related to sale/leaseback transactions. The standard did not materially impact our income statements or statements
of cash flows, and had no impact on our covenant compliance under our current debt agreements.
Income Taxes We record deferred income taxes for temporary differences between the carrying amounts of assets and liabilities for
financial reporting purposes and the computed tax basis of those assets and liabilities. We record valuation allowances against the
deferred tax assets (included, together with our deferred income tax assets, as part of our reportable net deferred income tax
liabilities on our consolidated balance sheets), for which the realization is uncertain. We review these items regularly in light of
changes in federal and state tax laws and changes in our business.
As of January 1, 2021, we adopted, with modified retrospective application, the FASB’s ASU No. 2019-12, “Income Taxes (Topic
740): Simplifying the Accounting for Income Taxes” (ASU 2019-12), which is expected to simplify income tax accounting
requirements in areas deemed costly and complex. ASU 2019-12 did not have a material impact on our financial statements.
Cash and Cash Equivalents Cash and cash equivalents include all highly liquid investments with original maturities of three
months or less. The carrying amounts approximate fair value. At December 31, 2021, we held $5,204 in cash and $15,965 in money
market funds and other cash equivalents. Of our total cash and cash equivalents, $2,706 resided in foreign jurisdictions, some of
which is subject to restrictions on repatriation.
Allowance for Credit Losses We record expense to maintain an allowance for credit losses for estimated losses that result from the
failure or inability of our customers to make required payments deemed collectible from the customer when the service was
provided or product was delivered. When determining the allowances for trade receivables and loans, we consider the probability of
recoverability of accounts receivable based on past experience, taking into account current collection trends and general economic
factors, including bankruptcy rates. We also consider future economic trends to estimate expected credit losses over the lifetime of
the asset. Credit risks are assessed based on historical write-offs, net of recoveries, as well as an analysis of the aged accounts
receivable balances with allowances generally increasing as the receivable ages. Accounts receivable may be fully reserved for
when specific collection issues are known to exist, such as catastrophes or pending bankruptcies.
Inventories Inventories primarily consist of wireless devices and accessories and are valued at the lower of cost or net realizable
value.
Licensed Programming Inventory Cost Recognition and Impairment We enter into agreements to license programming
exhibition rights from licensors. A programming inventory asset related to these rights and a corresponding liability payable to the
licensor are recorded (on a discounted basis if the license agreements are long-term) when (i) the cost of the programming is
reasonably determined, (ii) the programming material has been accepted in accordance with the terms of the agreement, (iii) the
programming is available for its first showing or telecast, and (iv) the license period has commenced. There are variations in the
amortization methods of these rights, depending on whether the network is advertising-supported (e.g., TNT and TBS) or not
advertising-supported (e.g., HBO and Turner Classic Movies).
For the advertising-supported networks, our general policy is to amortize each program’s costs on a straight-line basis (or per-play
basis, if greater) over its license period. In circumstances where the initial airing of the program has more value than subsequent
airings, an accelerated method of amortization is used. The accelerated amortization upon the first airing versus subsequent airings
is determined based on a study of historical and estimated future advertising sales for similar programming. For rights fees paid for
sports programming arrangements, such rights fees are amortized using a revenue-forecast model, in which the rights fees are
amortized using the ratio of current period advertising revenue to total estimated remaining advertising revenue over the term of the
arrangement.
For premium pay television, streaming and over-the-top (OTT) services that are not advertising-supported, each licensed program’s
costs are amortized on a straight-line basis over its license period or estimated period of use, beginning with the month of initial
exhibition. When we have the right to exhibit feature theatrical programming in multiple windows over a number of years,
historical audience viewership is used as the basis for determining the amount of programming amortization attributable to each
window.
66
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Licensed programming inventory is carried at the lower of unamortized cost or fair value. For networks that generate both
advertising and subscription revenues, the net realizable value of unamortized programming costs is generally evaluated based on
the network’s programming taken as a whole. In assessing whether the programming inventory for a particular advertising-
supported network is impaired, the net realizable value for all of the network’s programming inventory is determined based on a
projection of the network’s profitability. This assessment would occur upon the occurrence of certain triggering events. Similarly,
for premium pay television, streaming and OTT services that are not advertising-supported, an evaluation of the fair value of
unamortized programming costs is performed based on services’ licensed programming taken as a whole. Specifically, the fair
value for all premium pay television, streaming and OTT service licensed programming is determined based on projections of
estimated subscription revenues less certain costs of delivering and distributing the licensed programming. Changes in
management’s intended usage of a specific program, such as a decision to no longer exhibit that program and forgo the use of the
rights associated with the program license, results in a reassessment of that program’s fair value, which could result in an
impairment (see Note 11).
Film and Television Production Cost Recognition, Participations and Residuals and Impairments Film and television
production costs on our consolidated balance sheets include the unamortized cost of completed theatrical films and television
episodes, theatrical films and television series in production and undeveloped film and television rights. Film and television
production costs are stated at the lower of cost, less accumulated amortization, or fair value. For films and television programs
predominantly monetized individually, the amount of capitalized film and television production costs and the amount of
participations and residuals to be recognized as broadcast, programming and operations expenses for a given film or television
series in a particular period are determined using the film forecast computation method. Under this method, the amortization of
capitalized costs and the accrual of participations and residuals are based on the proportion of the film’s (or television program’s)
revenues recognized for such period to the film’s (or television program’s) estimated remaining ultimate revenues (i.e., the total
revenue to be received throughout a film’s (or television program’s) life cycle).
The process of estimating a film’s ultimate revenues requires us to make a series of judgments related to future revenue-generating
activities associated with a particular film. We estimate the ultimate revenues, less additional costs to be incurred (including
exploitation and participation costs), in order to determine whether the value of a film or television series is impaired and requires
an immediate write-off of unrecoverable film and television production costs. To the extent that the ultimate revenues are adjusted,
the resulting gross margin reported on the exploitation of that film or television series in a period is also adjusted. (See Note 11)
Prior to the theatrical release of a film, our estimates are based on factors such as the historical performance of similar films, the
star power of the lead actors, the rating and genre of the film, pre-release market research (including test market screenings),
international distribution plans and the expected number of theaters in which the film will be released. In the absence of revenues
directly related to the exhibition of owned film or television programs on our television networks, premium pay television,
streaming or OTT services, we estimate a portion of the unamortized costs that are representative of the utilization of that film or
television program in that exhibition and expense such costs as the film or television program is exhibited. The period over which
ultimate revenues are estimated generally does not exceed ten years from the initial release of a motion picture or from the date of
delivery of the first episode of an episodic television series. Estimates were updated based on information available during the
film’s production and, upon release, the actual results of each film.
For a film (or television program) predominantly monetized as part of a film (or television program) group, the amount of
capitalized film and television production costs is amortized using a reasonably reliable estimate of the portion of unamortized film
costs that is representative of the use of the film. Production costs are expensed as the film (or television program) is exhibited or
exploited.
Property, Plant and Equipment Property, plant and equipment is stated at cost, except for assets acquired using acquisition
accounting, which are initially recorded at fair value (see Note 7). The cost of additions and substantial improvements to property,
plant and equipment is capitalized, and includes internal compensation costs for these projects. The cost of maintenance and repairs
of property, plant and equipment is charged to operating expenses. Property, plant and equipment costs are depreciated using
straight-line methods over their estimated economic lives. Certain subsidiaries follow composite group depreciation methodology.
Accordingly, when a portion of their depreciable property, plant and equipment is retired in the ordinary course of business, the
gross book value is reclassified to accumulated depreciation, and no gain or loss is recognized on the disposition of these assets.
67
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Property, plant and equipment is reviewed for recoverability whenever events or changes in circumstances indicate that the carrying
amount of an asset group may not be recoverable. We recognize an impairment loss when the carrying amount of a long-lived asset
is not recoverable. The carrying amount of a long-lived asset is not recoverable if it exceeds the sum of the undiscounted cash flows
expected to result from the use and eventual disposition of the asset. (See Note 7)
The liability for the fair value of an asset retirement obligation is recorded in the period in which it is incurred if a reasonable
estimate of fair value can be made. In periods subsequent to initial measurement, we recognize period-to-period changes in the
liability resulting from the passage of time and revisions to either the timing or the amount of the original estimate. The increase in
the carrying value of the associated long-lived asset is depreciated over the corresponding estimated economic life.
Software Costs We capitalize certain costs incurred in connection with developing or obtaining internal-use software. Capitalized
software costs are included in “Property, Plant and Equipment – Net” on our consolidated balance sheets. In addition, there is
certain network software that allows the equipment to provide the features and functions unique to the AT&T network, which we
include in the cost of the equipment categories for financial reporting purposes.
We amortize our capitalized software costs over a three-year to seven-year period, reflecting the estimated period during which
these assets will remain in service.
Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets We have the following major classes of intangible assets: goodwill; licenses, which include
Federal Communications Commission (FCC) and other wireless licenses; distribution networks; film and television libraries;
intellectual properties and franchises; trademarks and trade names; customer lists; and various other finite-lived intangible assets
(see Note 9).
Goodwill represents the excess of consideration paid over the fair value of identifiable net assets acquired in business
combinations. Wireless licenses provide us with the exclusive right to utilize certain radio frequency spectrum to provide wireless
communications services. While wireless licenses are issued for a fixed period of time (generally ten years), renewals of domestic
wireless licenses have occurred routinely and at nominal cost. We have determined that there are currently no legal, regulatory,
contractual, competitive, economic or other factors that limit the useful lives of our FCC wireless licenses.
We amortize our wireless licenses in Mexico over their average remaining economic life of 25 years.
We acquired the rights to the AT&T and other trade names in previous acquisitions, classifying certain of those trade names as
indefinite-lived. We have the effective ability to retain these exclusive rights permanently at a nominal cost.
Goodwill, FCC wireless licenses and other indefinite-lived intangible assets are not amortized but are tested at least annually for
impairment. The testing is performed on the value as of October 1 each year, and compares the book values of the assets to their
fair values. Goodwill is tested by comparing the carrying amount of each reporting unit, deemed to be our principal operating
segments or one level below them, to the fair value using both discounted cash flow as well as market multiple approaches. FCC
wireless licenses are tested on an aggregate basis, consistent with our use of the licenses on a national scope, using a discounted
cash flow approach. Prior to 2020, orbital slots were similarly aggregated for purposes of impairment testing and valued using a
discounted cash flow approach. Trade names are tested by comparing their book values to their fair values calculated using a
discounted cash flow approach on a presumed royalty rate derived from the revenues related to each brand name.
Intangible assets that have finite useful lives are amortized over their estimated useful lives (see Note 9). As of January 1, 2020, on
a prospective basis, orbital slots were amortized using the sum-of-the-months-digits method of amortization over their average
remaining economic life (ceased in 2021 in conjunction with the transfer of the orbital slots as part of the DIRECTV transaction).
Customer lists and relationships are amortized using primarily the sum-of-the-months-digits method of amortization over the period
in which those relationships are expected to contribute to our future cash flows. Finite-lived trademarks and trade names and
distribution networks are amortized using the straight-line method over the estimated useful life of the assets. Film library is
amortized using the film forecast computation method, as previously disclosed. The remaining finite-lived intangible assets are
generally amortized using the straight-line method. These assets, along with other long-lived assets, are reviewed for recoverability
whenever events or changes in circumstances indicate that the carrying amount of an asset group may not be recoverable (see Note
6).
Advertising Costs We expense advertising costs for products and services or for promoting our corporate image as incurred (see
Note 23).
68
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Foreign Currency Translation Our foreign subsidiaries and foreign investments generally report their earnings in their local
currencies. We translate their foreign assets and liabilities at exchange rates in effect at the balance sheet dates. We translate their
revenues and expenses using average rates during the year. The resulting foreign currency translation adjustments are recorded as a
separate component of accumulated OCI in our consolidated balance sheets (see Note 3). Operations in countries with highly
inflationary economies use the U.S. dollar as the functional currency.
We hedge a portion of the foreign currency exchange risk involved in certain foreign currency-denominated transactions, which we
explain further in our discussion of our methods of managing our foreign currency risk (see Note 13).
Pension and Other Postretirement Benefits See Note 15 for a comprehensive discussion of our pension and postretirement
benefits, including a discussion of the actuarial assumptions, our policy for recognizing the associated gains and losses and our
method used to estimate service and interest cost components.
New Accounting Standards
Reference Rate Reform In March 2020, the FASB issued ASU No. 2020-04, “Reference Rate Reform (Topic 848): Facilitation of
the Effects of Reference Rate Reform on Financial Reporting” (ASU 2020-04, as amended), which provides optional expedients,
and allows for certain exceptions to existing GAAP, for contract modifications triggered by the expected market transition of
certain benchmark interest rates to alternative reference rates. ASU 2020-04 applies to contracts, hedging relationships, certain
derivatives and other arrangements that reference the London Interbank Offering Rate (LIBOR) or any other rates ending after
December 31, 2022. ASU 2020-04, as amended, became effective immediately. We do not believe our adoption of ASU 2020-04,
including optional expedients, will materially impact our financial statements.
Convertible Instruments Beginning with 2022 interim reporting, we will adopt ASU No. 2020-06, “Debt—Debt With Conversion
and Other Options (Subtopic 470-20) and Derivatives and Hedging—Contracts in Entity’s Own Equity (Subtopic 815-40):
Accounting for Convertible Instruments and Contracts in an Entity’s Own Equity” (ASU 2020-06). ASU 2020-06 eliminated
certain separation models regarding cash conversion and beneficial conversion features to simplify reporting for convertible
instruments as a single liability or equity, with no separate accounting for embedded conversion features. Additionally, ASU 2020-
06 requires that instruments which may be settled in cash or stock are presumed settled in stock in calculating diluted earnings per
share. While our intent is to settle the Mobility II preferred interests in cash (see Note 17), settlement of this instrument in AT&T
shares will result in additional dilutive impact, the magnitude of which is influenced by the fair value of the Mobility II preferred
interests and the average AT&T common stock price during the reporting period, which could vary from period-to-period. We are
currently evaluating our adoption method and the impact on our financial statements, as our recent decision (February 2022) on
methodology of distribution to AT&T’s shareholders (i.e., pro rata dividend) for the pending WarnerMedia transaction could affect
the impact of ASU 2020-06 on our financial statements (see Note 6).
Government Assistance In November 2021, the FASB issued ASU No. 2021-10, “Government Assistance (Topic 832): Disclosures
by Business Entities about Government Assistance” (ASU 2021-10), which requires annual disclosures, in the notes to the financial
statements, about transactions with a government that are accounted for by applying a grant or contribution accounting model by
analogy to other guidance. The annual disclosures include terms and conditions, accounting treatment and impacted financial
statement lines reflecting the impact of the transactions. ASU 2021-10 will be effective for annual reporting periods beginning after
December 15, 2021, under prospective or retrospective application for all in scope government transactions in the financial
statements as of our adoption date or thereafter. We are evaluating the disclosure impacts of our adoption of ASU 2021-10.
69
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
NOTE 2. EARNINGS PER SHARE
A reconciliation of the numerators and denominators of basic and diluted earnings per share is shown in the table below:
Year Ended December 31, 2021 2020 2019
Numerators
Numerator for basic earnings per share:
Net Income (Loss) Attributable to Common Stock $ 19,874 $ (5,369)$ 13,900 
Dilutive potential common shares:
Share-based payment 22 23 21 
Numerator for diluted earnings per share $ 19,896 $ (5,346)$ 13,921 
Denominators (000,000)
Denominator for basic earnings per share:
Weighted average number of common shares outstanding 7,168 7,157 7,319 
Dilutive potential common shares:
Share-based payment (in shares) 31 26 29 
Denominator for diluted earnings per share 7,199 7,183 7,348 
For 2020, dilutive potential common shares are not included in the computation of diluted earnings per share because their ef fect is antidilutive
as a result of the net loss.
In the first quarter of 2020, we completed an accelerated share repurchase agreement with a third-party financial institution to
repurchase AT&T common stock (see Note 17). Under the terms of the agreement, we paid the financial institution $4,000 and
received 104.8 million shares.
Upon adoption of ASU 2020-06, the ability to settle our Mobility II preferred interests in stock will be reflected in our diluted
earnings per share calculation. The numerator will include an adjustment to add back to income the distributions on the Mobility II
preferred interests of $140 per quarter, or $560 annually. The denominator will include the potential issuance of AT&T common
stock to settle the 320 million Mobility II preferred interests outstanding. (See Note 1)1
1
1
70
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
NOTE 3. OTHER COMPREHENSIVE INCOME
Changes in the balances of each component included in accumulated OCI are presented below. All amounts are net of tax and
exclude noncontrolling interest.
Foreign
Currency
Translation
AdjustmentNet Unrealized
Gains (Losses) on
Available-for-
Sale
SecuritiesNet Unrealized
Gains (Losses)
on
Derivative
InstrumentsDefined Benefit
Postretirement
PlansAccumulated
Other
Comprehensive
Income
Balance as of December 31, 2018$ (3,084) $ (2)$ 818 $ 6,517$ 4,249 
Other comprehensive income
(loss) before reclassifications 28 50 (900) 3,457 2,635 
Amounts reclassified from
accumulated OCI — 1— 145 2(1,459)3(1,414)
Net other comprehensive
income (loss) 28 50 (855) 1,998 1,221 
Balance as of December 31, 2019 (3,056) 48 (37) 8,515 5,470 
Other comprehensive income
(loss) before reclassifications (870) 78 (811) 2,250 647 
Amounts reclassified from
accumulated OCI — 1(15)169 2(1,841)3(1,787)
Net other comprehensive
income (loss) (870) 63 (742) 409 (1,140)
Balance as of December 31, 2020 (3,926) 111 (779) 8,924 4,330 
Other comprehensive income
(loss) before reclassifications (125) (63) (715) (34) (937)
Amounts reclassified from
accumulated OCI 2,087 1,4(3)172 2(2,020)3136 
Net other comprehensive
income (loss) 1,962 (66) (643) (2,054) (801)
Balance as of December 31,
2021 $ (1,964) $ 45 $ (1,422)$ 6,870 $ 3,529 
(Gains) losses are included in “Other income (expense) – net” in the consolidated statements of income.
(Gains) losses are included in “Interest expense” in the consolidated statements of income (see Note 13).
The amortization of prior service credits associated with postretirement benefits is included in “Other income (expense) – net” in the
consolidated statements of income (see Note 15).
Represents unrealized foreign currency translation adjustments at Vrio that were released upon sale. (See Note 6)
NOTE 4. SEGMENT INFORMATION
Our segments are comprised of strategic business units that offer products and services to different customer segments over various
technology platforms and/or in different geographies that are managed accordingly. We analyze our segments based on segment
operating contribution, which consists of operating income, excluding acquisition-related costs and other significant items (as
discussed below), and equity in net income (loss) of affiliates for investments managed within each segment. We have three
reportable segments: (1) Communications, (2) WarnerMedia and (3) Latin America.
We also evaluate segment and business unit performance based on EBITDA and/or EBITDA margin. EBITDA is defined as
operating contribution excluding equity in net income (loss) of affiliates and depreciation and amortization. We believe EBITDA to
be a relevant and useful measurement to our investors as it is part of our internal management reporting and planning processes and
it is an important metric that management uses to evaluate operating performance. EBITDA does not give effect to depreciation and
amortization expenses incurred in operating contribution nor is it burdened by cash used for debt service requirements and thus
does not reflect available funds for distributions, reinvestment or other discretionary uses. EBITDA margin is EBITDA divided by
total revenues.
The Communications segment provides wireless and wireline telecom and broadband services to consumers located in the U.S.
and businesses globally. Our business strategies reflect bundled product offerings that cut across product lines and utilize shared1
2
3
4
71
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
assets. This segment contains the following business units:
•Mobility provides nationwide wireless service and equipment.
•Business Wireline provides advanced IP-based services, as well as traditional voice and data services and related equipment to
business customers.
•Consumer Wireline provides internet, including broadband fiber, and legacy telephony voice communication services to
residential customers.
The WarnerMedia segment develops, produces and distributes feature films, television, gaming and other content in various
physical and digital formats globally. WarnerMedia content is distributed through basic networks, Direct-to-Consumer (DTC) or
theatrical, TV content and games licensing. Segment results also include Xandr advertising and Otter Media Holdings (Otter
Media). We disposed of substantially all Otter Media assets in the third quarter of 2021 (see Note 6).
On May 17, 2021, we entered into an agreement to combine our WarnerMedia segment, subject to certain exceptions, with a
subsidiary of Discovery Inc. (See Note 6)
On December 21, 2021, we entered into an agreement to sell the marketplace component of Xandr to Microsoft Corporation
(Microsoft) (see Note 6). We applied held-for-sale accounting for Xandr as of December 31, 2021, and continue to present the
Xandr results within the WarnerMedia segment consistent with how performance was assessed and resource allocation decision
were made through December 31, 2021.
The Latin America segment provides wireless services and equipment in Mexico, and prior to the November 2021 disposition of
Vrio, video services in Latin America and the Caribbean. We applied held-for-sale accounting to Vrio as of June 30, 2021 and
continued to present the Vrio results within the Latin America segment consistent with how performance was assessed and resource
allocation decisions were made until the transaction closed.
Corporate and Other reconciles our segment results to consolidated operating income and income before income taxes, and
includes:
•Corporate, which consists of: (1) businesses no longer integral to our operations or which we no longer actively market, (2)
corporate support functions, (3) impacts of corporate-wide decisions for which the individual operating segments are not being
evaluated, and (4) the reclassification of the amortization of prior service credits, which we continue to report with segment
operating expenses, to consolidated “Other income (expense) – net.” Costs previously allocated to the Video business that were
retained after the transaction, net of reimbursements from DIRECTV under transition service agreements, are reported in
Corporate following the transaction through 2022, to maintain comparability of our operating segment results, and while
operational plans and continued cost reduction initiatives are implemented.
•Video, which consists of our former U.S. video operations that were contributed to DIRECTV on July 31, 2021 and also
includes our share of DIRECTV’s earnings as equity in net income of affiliates (see Note 10).
•Acquisition-related items, which consists of items associated with the merger and integration of acquired or divested
businesses, including amortization of intangible assets.
•Certain significant items, which includes (1) employee separation charges associated with voluntary and/or strategic offers, (2)
asset impairments and abandonments, and (3) other items for which the segments are not being evaluated.
•Eliminations and consolidations, which (1) removes transactions involving dealings between our segments, including channel
distribution between WarnerMedia and Video and Vrio prior to separation, and (2) includes adjustments for our reporting of the
advertising business.
“Interest expense” and “Other income (expense) – net” are managed only on a total company basis and are, accordingly, reflected
only in consolidated results.
72
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
For the year ended December 31, 2021
RevenuesOperations
and Support
Expenses EBITDADepreciation
and
AmortizationOperating
Income
(Loss)Equity in
Net
Income
(Loss) of
AffiliatesOperating
Contribution
Communications
Mobility $ 78,254 $ 46,820 $31,434 $ 8,122 $ 23,312 $ — $ 23,312 
Business Wireline 23,937 14,755 9,182 5,192 3,990 — 3,990 
Consumer Wireline 12,539 8,467 4,072 3,095 977 — 977 
Total Communications 114,730 70,042 44,688 16,409 28,279 — 28,279 
WarnerMedia 35,632 27,737 7,895 656 7,239 38 7,277 
Latin America
Mexico 2,747 2,652 95 605 (510) — (510)
Vrio 2,607 2,302 305 231 74 6 80 
Total Latin America 5,354 4,954 400 836 (436) 6 (430)
Segment Total 155,716 102,733 52,983 17,901 35,082 $ 44 $ 35,126 
Corporate and Other
Corporate 1,264 4,805 (3,541) 372 (3,913) (32) (3,945 )
Video 15,513 12,666 2,847 356 2,491 619 3,110 
Acquisition-related items — 299 (299) 4,233 (4,532) — (4,532 )
Certain significant items — 4,961 (4,961) — (4,961) — (4,961 )
Eliminations and
consolidations (3,629) (2,809) (820) — (820) — (820)
AT&T Inc. $168,864 $122,655 $46,209 $ 22,862 $ 23,347 $ 631 $ 23,978  
Includes $ 2,680  for the reclassification of prior service credit amortization and approximately $ 200 of retained operation and support costs and
$240 of depreciation expense previously allocated to Video, net of reimbursements.1
1
73
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
For the year ended December 31, 2020
RevenuesOperations
and Support
Expenses EBITDADepreciation
and
AmortizationOperating
Income
(Loss)Equity in
Net
Income
(Loss) of
AffiliatesOperating
Contribution
Communications
Mobility $ 72,564 $ 42,106 $ 30,458 $ 8,086 $ 22,372 $ — $ 22,372 
Business Wireline 25,083 15,303 9,780 5,216 4,564 — 4,564 
Consumer Wireline 12,318 8,027 4,291 2,914 1,377 — 1,377 
Total Communications 109,965 65,436 44,529 16,216 28,313 — 28,313 
WarnerMedia 30,442 21,579 8,863 671 8,192 18 8,210 
Latin America
Mexico 2,562 2,636 (74) 513 (587) — (587)
Vrio 3,154 2,800 354 520 (166) 24 (142)
Total Latin America 5,716 5,436 280 1,033 (753) 24 (729)
Segment Total 146,123 92,451 53,672 17,920 35,752 $ 42 $ 35,794 
Corporate and Other
Corporate 2,207 4,205 (1,998) 310 (2,308) 53 (2,255 )
Video 28,610 24,174 4,436 2,262 2,174 — 2,174  
Acquisition-related items — 468 (468) 8,012 (8,480) — (8,480 )
Certain significant items — 19,156 (19,156) 14 (19,170) — (19,170 )
Eliminations and
consolidations (5,180) (3,615) (1,565) (2) (1,563) — (1,563 )
AT&T Inc. $171,760 $136,839 $ 34,921 $ 28,516 $ 6,405 $ 95 $ 6,500  
Includes $ 2,442  for the reclassification of prior service credit amortization.1
1
74
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
For the year ended December 31, 2019
RevenuesOperations
and Support
Expenses EBITDADepreciation
and
AmortizationOperating
Income
(Loss)Equity in
Net
Income
(Loss) of
AffiliatesOperating
Contribution
Communications
Mobility $ 71,056 $ 40,681 $ 30,375 $ 8,054 $ 22,321 $ — $ 22,321 
Business Wireline 25,901 15,839 10,062 4,925 5,137 — 5,137 
Consumer Wireline 13,012 7,775 5,237 2,880 2,357 — 2,357 
Total Communications 109,969 64,295 45,674 15,859 29,815 — 29,815 
WarnerMedia 35,259 24,172 11,087 589 10,498 161 10,659 
Latin America
Mexico 2,869 3,085 (216) 502 (718) — (718)
Vrio 4,094 3,378 716 660 56 27 83 
Total Latin America 6,963 6,463 500 1,162 (662) 27 (635)
Segment Total 152,191 94,930 57,261 17,610 39,651 $ 188 $ 39,839 
Corporate and Other
Corporate 2,203 3,509 (1,306) 645 (1,951) (182) (2,133 )
Video 32,124 27,275 4,849 2,461 2,388 — 2,388  
Acquisition-related items (72) 960 (1,032) 7,460 (8,492) — (8,492 )
Certain significant items — 2,082 (2,082) 43 (2,125) — (2,125 )
Eliminations and
consolidations (5,253) (3,735) (1,518) (2) (1,516) — (1,516 )
AT&T Inc. $181,193 $125,021 $ 56,172 $ 28,217 $ 27,955 $ 6 $ 27,961  
Includes $ 1,934  for the reclassification of prior service credit amortization.1
1
75
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
The following table is a reconciliation of operating income (loss) to “Income (Loss) Before Income Taxes” reported in our
consolidated statements of income:
2021 2020 2019
Communications $ 28,279 $ 28,313 $ 29,815 
WarnerMedia 7,277 8,210 10,659 
Latin America (430) (729) (635)
Segment Contribution 35,126 35,794 39,839 
Reconciling Items:
Corporate and Other (3,913) (2,308) (1,951)
Video 2,491 2,174 2,388 
Merger costs (299) (468) (1,032)
Amortization of intangibles acquired (4,233) (8,012) (7,460)
Asset impairments and abandonments (4,904) (18,880) (1,458)
Gain on spectrum transaction — 900 — 
Employee separation charges and benefit-related losses (57) (1,177) (624)
Other noncash charges (credits), net — (13) (43)
Segment equity in net income of affiliates (44) (42) (188)
Eliminations and consolidations (820) (1,563) (1,516)
AT&T Operating Income 23,347 6,405 27,955 
Interest Expense 6,884 7,925 8,422 
Equity in net income of affiliates 631 95 6 
Other income (expense) – net 9,853 (1,431) (1,071)
Income (Loss) Before Income Taxes $ 26,947 $ (2,856)$ 18,468 
Included as a reduction of “Selling, general and administrative expenses” in the consolidated statements of income.
The following table sets forth revenues earned from customers, and property, plant and equipment located in different geographic
areas:
2021 2020 2019
RevenuesNet Property,
Plant &
Equipment RevenuesNet Property,
Plant &
Equipment RevenuesNet Property,
Plant &
Equipment
United States $ 151,631 $ 120,924 $ 155,899 $ 121,208 $ 161,689 $ 122,567 
Europe 6,079 1,106 5,387 1,152 6,536 1,854 
Mexico 3,043 3,462 2,862 3,530 3,198 3,648 
Brazil 1,486 20 1,807 694 2,797 1,057 
All other Latin America 3,118 115 2,679 485 3,219 544 
Asia/Pacific Rim 2,637 240 2,322 203 2,793 390 
Other 870 37 804 43 961 68 
Total $ 168,864 $ 125,904 $ 171,760 $ 127,315 $ 181,193 $ 130,128 1
1 
76
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
The following tables present intersegment revenues, assets, investments in equity affiliates and capital expenditures by segment:
Intersegment Reconciliation
2021 2020 2019
Intersegment revenues
Communications $ 11 $ 11 $ 26 
WarnerMedia 2,573 3,183 3,318 
Latin America — — — 
Total Intersegment Revenues 2,584 3,194 3,344 
Consolidations 1,045 1,986 1,909 
Eliminations and consolidations $ 3,629 $ 5,180 $ 5,253 
At or for the years ended December
31,2021 2020
AssetsInvestments
in
Equity
Method
InvesteesCapital
Expenditures AssetsInvestments
in
Equity
Method
InvesteesCapital
Expenditures
Communications $494,063 $ — $ 14,860 $506,102 $ — $ 14,107 
WarnerMedia 154,369 1,122 764 148,037 1,123 699 
Latin America 8,874 — 580 15,811 590 708 
Corporate and eliminations (105,684) 6,152 323 (144,189) 67 161 
Total $551,622 $ 7,274 $ 16,527 $525,761 $ 1,780 $ 15,675 
NOTE 5. REVENUE RECOGNITION
We report our revenues net of sales taxes and record certain regulatory fees, primarily Universal Service Fund (USF) fees, on a net
basis. No customer accounted for more than 10% of consolidated revenues in 2021, 2020 or 2019.
Wireless, Advanced Data, Legacy Voice & Data Services and Equipment Revenue
We offer service-only contracts and contracts that bundle equipment used to access the services and/or with other service offerings.
Some contracts have fixed terms and others are cancellable on a short-term basis (i.e., month-to-month arrangements).
Examples of service revenues include wireless, strategic services (e.g., virtual private network service), and legacy voice and data
(e.g., traditional local and long-distance). These services represent a series of distinct services that is considered a separate
performance obligation. Service revenue is recognized when services are provided, based upon either usage (e.g., minutes of
traffic/bytes of data processed) or period of time (e.g., monthly service fees).
Some of our services require customer premises equipment that, when combined and integrated with AT&T’s specific network
infrastructure, facilitates the delivery of service to the customer. In evaluating whether the equipment is a separate performance
obligation, we consider the customer’s ability to benefit from the equipment on its own or together with other readily available
resources and if so, whether the service and equipment are separately identifiable (i.e., is the service highly dependent on, or highly
interrelated with the equipment). When the equipment does not meet the criteria to be a separate performance obligation (e.g.,
equipment associated with certain video services), we allocate the total transaction price to the related service. When equipment is a
separate performance obligation, we record the sale of equipment when title has passed and the products are accepted by the
customer. For devices sold through indirect channels (e.g., national dealers), revenue is recognized when the dealer accepts the
device, not upon activation.
Our equipment and service revenues are predominantly recognized on a gross basis, as most of our services do not involve a third
party and we typically control the equipment that is sold to our customers.
77
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Revenue recognized from fixed term contracts that bundle services and/or equipment is allocated based on the stand-alone selling
price of all required performance obligations of the contract (i.e., each item included in the bundle). Promotional discounts are
attributed to each required component of the arrangement, resulting in recognition over the contract term. Stand-alone selling prices
are determined by assessing prices paid for service-only contracts (e.g., arrangements where customers bring their own devices)
and stand-alone device pricing.
We offer the majority of our customers the option to purchase certain wireless devices in installments over a specified period of
time, and, in many cases, they may be eligible to trade in the original equipment for a new device and have the remaining unpaid
balance paid or settled. For customers that elect these equipment installment payment programs, at the point of sale, we recognize
revenue for the entire amount of revenue allocated to the customer receivable net of fair value of the trade-in right guarantee. The
difference between the revenue recognized and the consideration received is recorded as a note receivable when the devices are not
discounted and our right to consideration is unconditional. When installment sales include promotional discounts (e.g., “buy one
get one free” or equipment discounts with trade-in of a device), the difference between revenue recognized and consideration
received is recorded as a contract asset to be amortized over the contract term.
Less commonly, we offer certain customers highly discounted devices when they enter into a minimum service agreement term. For
these contracts, we recognize equipment revenue at the point of sale based on a stand-alone selling price allocation. The difference
between the revenue recognized and the cash received is recorded as a contract asset that will amortize over the contract term.
Our contracts allow for customers to frequently modify their arrangement, without incurring penalties in many cases. When a
contract is modified, we evaluate the change in scope or price of the contract to determine if the modification should be treated as a
new contract or if it should be considered a change of the existing contract. We generally do not have significant impacts from
contract modifications.
Revenues from transactions between us and our customers are recorded net of revenue-based regulatory fees and taxes. Cash
incentives given to customers are recorded as a reduction of revenue. Nonrefundable, upfront service activation and setup fees
associated with service arrangements are deferred and recognized over the associated service contract period or customer
relationship life.
Subscription Revenue
Subscription revenues from cable networks and premium pay and basic-tier television services are recognized over the license
period as programming is provided to affiliates or digital distributors based on negotiated contractual programming rates. When a
distribution contract with an affiliate has expired and a new distribution contract has not been executed, revenues are based on
estimated rates, giving consideration to factors including the previous contractual rates, inflation, current payments by the affiliate
and the status of the negotiations on a new contract. When the new distribution contract terms are finalized, an adjustment to
revenue is recorded, if necessary, to reflect the new terms.
Subscription revenues from end-user subscribers are recognized when services are provided, based upon either usage or period of
time. Subscription revenues from streaming services are recognized as programming services are provided to customers.
Content Revenue
Feature films typically are produced or acquired for initial exhibition in theaters, followed by distribution, generally commencing
within three years of such initial exhibition. Revenues from film rentals by theaters are recognized as the films are exhibited.
Television programs and series are initially produced for broadcast and may be subsequently licensed or sold in physical format
and/or electronic delivery. Revenues from the distribution of television programming through broadcast networks, cable networks,
first-run syndication and streaming services are recognized when the programs or series are available to the licensee. In certain
circumstances, pursuant to the terms of the applicable contractual arrangements, the availability dates granted to customers may
precede the date in which the customer can be billed for these sales.
Revenues from sales of feature films and television programming in physical format are recognized at the later of the delivery date
or the date when made widely available for sale or rental by retailers based on gross sales less a provision for estimated returns,
rebates and pricing allowances. Revenues from the licensing of television programs and series for electronic sell-through or video-
on-demand are recognized when the product has been purchased by and made available to the consumer to either download or
stream.
78
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Upfront or guaranteed payments for the licensing of intellectual property are recognized as revenue at either the inception of the
license term if the intellectual property has significant standalone functionality or over the corresponding license term if the
licensee’s ability to derive utility is dependent on our continued support of the intellectual property throughout the license term.
Revenues from the sales of console games are recognized at the later of the delivery date or the date that the product is made widely
available for sale or rental by retailers based on gross sales less a provision for estimated returns, rebates and pricing allowances.
Advertising Revenue
Advertising revenues are recognized, net of agency commissions, in the period that the advertisements are aired. If there is a
targeted audience guarantee, revenues are recognized for the actual audience delivery and revenues are deferred for any shortfall
until the guaranteed audience delivery is met, typically by providing additional advertisements. Advertising revenues from digital
properties are recognized as impressions are delivered or the services are performed.
Revenue Categories
The following tables set forth reported revenue by category and by business unit:
For the year ended December 31, 2021
 Communications  
 MobilityBusiness
WirelineConsumer
Wireline WarnerMediaLatin
AmericaCorporate
& Other Elim. Total
Wireless service $57,260 $ — $ — $ — $1,834 $ 74 $ — $59,168 
Video service — — — — 2,607 14,514 — 17,121 
Business service — 23,224 — — — 70 — 23,294 
Broadband — — 9,085 — — — — 9,085 
Subscription — — — 15,596 — — — 13,133 
DTC (HBO Max) — — — — — — (1,051)
Other — — — — — — (1,412)
Content — — — 15,621 — — — 12,622 
DTC (HBO Max) — — — (1,923) — — — 
Other — — — (1,076) — — — 
Advertising 330 — — 6,522 — 909 (909) 6,852 
Legacy voice and data — — 1,977 — — 429 — 2,406 
Other — — 1,384 892 — 691 (257) 2,710 
Total Service 57,590 23,224 12,446 35,632 4,441 16,687 (3,629) 146,391 
Equipment 20,664 713 93 — 913 90 — 22,473 
Total $78,254 $23,937 $ 12,539 $ 35,632 $5,354 $16,777 $(3,629)$168,864 
Represents DTC (HBO Max) intercompany sales to the Communications segment ($ 698 with Mobility and $ 353 with Consumer Wireline).
Represents intercompany video distribution arrangements primarily to DIRECTV/U-verse from WarnerMedia prior to August 1, 2021 (see
Note 20).
Represents intercompany transactions in the WarnerMedia segment.1
2
3
3
1
2
3
79
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
For the year ended December 31, 2020
Communications
MobilityBusiness
WirelineConsumer
Wireline WarnerMediaLatin
AmericaCorporate
& Other Elim. Total
Wireless service $55,251 $ — $ — $ — $1,656 $ 528 $ — $57,435 
Video service — — — — 3,154 26,747 — 29,901 
Business service — 24,313 — — — 321 — 24,634 
Broadband — — 8,534 — — — — 8,534 
Subscription — — — 13,765 — — — 10,655 
DTC (HBO Max) — — — — — — (468)
Other — — — — — — (2,642)
Content — — — 13,083 — — — 9,819 
DTC (HBO Max) — — — (2,249) — — — 
Other — — — (1,015) — — — 
Advertising 291 — — 6,125 — 1,718 (1,718) 6,416 
Legacy voice and data — — 2,213 — — 554 — 2,767 
Other — — 1,564 733 — 661 (352) 2,606 
Total Service 55,542 24,313 12,311 30,442 4,810 30,529 (5,180) 152,767 
Equipment 17,022 770 7 — 906 288 — 18,993 
Total $72,564 $25,083 $ 12,318 $ 30,442 $5,716 $30,817 $(5,180)$171,760 
Represents DTC (HBO Max) intercompany sales to the Communications segment ($ 285 with Mobility and $ 183 with Consumer Wireline).
Represents intercompany video distribution arrangements primarily to DIRECTV/U-verse from WarnerMedia (see Note 20).
Represents intercompany transactions in the WarnerMedia segment.1
2
3
3
1
2
3
80
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
For the year ended December 31, 2019
Communications
MobilityBusiness
WirelineConsumer
Wireline WarnerMediaLatin
AmericaCorporate
& Other Elim. Total
Wireless service $55,039  $ — $ — $ — $1,863  $ 628 $ — $ 57,530  
Video service — — — — 4,094  30,451  — 34,545  
Business service — 25,116 — — — 325 — 25,441  
Broadband — — 8,403  — — — — 8,403  
Subscription — — — 13,651  — — — 10,402  
DTC (HBO Max) — — — — — — — 
Other — — — — — — (3,249 )
Content — — — 14,938  — — — 13,880  
DTC (HBO Max) — — — — — — — 
Other — — — (1,058 ) — — — 
Advertising 292 — — 6,678  — 1,672  (1,672 ) 6,970  
Legacy voice and data — — 2,573  — — 565 — 3,138  
Other — — 2,029  1,050  — 443 (332) 3,190  
Total Service 55,331  25,116 13,005  35,259  5,957  34,084  (5,253 ) 163,499  
Equipment 15,725  785 7 — 1,006  171 — 17,694  
Total $71,056  $25,901  $ 13,012  $ 35,259  $6,963  $ 34,255  $(5,253 )$181,193  
 HBO Max was launched in May 2020.
 Represents intercompany video distribution arrangements primarily to DIRECTV/U-verse from WarnerMedia (see Note 20).
 Represents intercompany transactions in the WarnerMedia segment.
Deferred Customer Contract Acquisition and Fulfillment Costs
Costs to acquire and fulfill customer contracts, including commissions on service activations, for our wireless, business wireline
and consumer wireline services, are deferred and amortized over the contract period or expected customer relationship life, which
typically ranges from three years to five years.
The following table presents the deferred customer contract acquisition and fulfillment costs included on our consolidated balance
sheets at December 31:
Consolidated Balance Sheets 2021 2020
Deferred Acquisition Costs
Prepaid and other current assets $ 2,550 $ 3,087 
Other Assets 3,248 3,198 
Total deferred customer contract acquisition costs $ 5,798 $ 6,285 
Deferred Fulfillment Costs
Prepaid and other current assets $ 2,601 $ 4,118 
Other Assets 4,148 5,634 
Total deferred customer contract fulfillment costs $ 6,749 $ 9,752 1
2
1
3
1
2
3
81
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
The decline in deferred acquisition and fulfillment costs from December 31, 2020 reflects the July 2021 separation of the U.S.
Video business. At separation, we removed $1,218 of deferred acquisitions costs ($693 originally classified as “Prepaid and other
current assets” and $525 originally classified as “Other assets”) and $2,025 of deferred fulfillment costs ($1,134 originally
classified as “Prepaid and other current assets” and $891 originally classified as “Other assets”). (See Note 6)
The following table presents deferred customer contract acquisition and fulfillment cost amortization included in “Other cost of
revenue” for the year ended December 31:
Consolidated Statements of Income 2021 2020
Deferred acquisition cost amortization $ 3,072 $ 2,755 
Deferred fulfillment cost amortization 4,019 5,110 
Contract Assets and Liabilities
A contract asset is recorded when revenue is recognized in advance of our right to bill and receive consideration. The contract asset
will decrease as services are provided and billed. For example, when installment sales include promotional discounts (e.g., “buy
one get one free”) the difference between revenue recognized and consideration received is recorded as a contract asset to be
amortized over the contract term.
Our contract assets primarily relate to our wireless businesses. Promotional equipment sales where we offer handset credits, which
are allocated between equipment and service in proportion to their standalone selling prices, when customers commit to a specified
service period result in additional contract assets recognized. These contract assets will amortize over the service contract period,
resulting in lower future service revenue.
When consideration is received in advance of the delivery of goods or services, a contract liability is recorded. Reductions in the
contract liability will be recorded as we satisfy the performance obligations.
The following table presents contract assets and liabilities on our consolidated balance sheets at December 31:
Consolidated Balance Sheets 2021 2020
Contract asset $ 4,517 $ 3,501 
   Current portion in “Prepaid and other current assets” 2,684 2,054 
Contract liability 5,644 6,879 
   Current portion in “Advanced billings and customer deposits” 5,112 6,071 
Our contract asset balance in 2021 reflects increased promotional equipment sales in our wireless business. We expect the
amortization of these promotional costs to increase throughout 2022 and the contract asset to flatten in 2023.
Changes in our contract asset and contract liability from December 31, 2020 include the impact of the July 2021 separation of the
U.S. Video business. At separation, the contract asset was reduced $303 and the contract liability was reduced $1,098, both of
which were predominantly the current portion. (See Note 6)
Our beginning of period contract liabilities recorded as customer contract revenue during 2021 was $5,662.
Remaining Performance Obligations
Remaining performance obligations primarily relate to our Communications segment and represent services we are required to
provide to customers under bundled or discounted arrangements, which are satisfied as services are provided over the contract term.
In our WarnerMedia segment, the most significant remaining performance obligations relate to the licensing of theatrical and
television content which will be made available to customers at some point in the future. In determining the transaction price
allocated, we do not include non-recurring charges and estimates for usage, nor do we consider arrangements with an original
expected duration of less than one year, which are primarily prepaid wireless and residential internet agreements.
Remaining performance obligations associated with business contracts reflect recurring charges billed, adjusted to reflect estimates
for sales incentives and revenue adjustments. Performance obligations associated with wireless contracts are estimated using a
portfolio approach in which we review all relevant promotional activities, calculating the remaining performance obligation using
the average service component for the portfolio and the average device price. As of December 31, 2021, the aggregate amount of
the transaction price allocated to remaining performance obligations was $42,678, of which we
82
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
expect to recognize approximately 57% by the end of 2022, with the balance recognized thereafter.
NOTE 6. ACQUISITIONS, DISPOSITIONS AND OTHER ADJUSTMENTS
Acquisitions
Spectrum Auctions On February 24, 2021, the Federal Communications Commission (FCC) announced that AT&T was the
winning bidder for 1,621 C-Band licenses, comprised of a total of 80 MHz nationwide, including 40 MHz in Phase I. We provided
to the FCC an upfront deposit of $550 in 2020 and cash payments totaling $22,856 in the first quarter of 2021, for a total of
$23,406. We received the licenses in July 2021 and classified the auction deposits, related capitalized interest and billed relocation
costs as “Licenses – Net” on our December 31, 2021 consolidated balance sheet. In December 2021, we paid $955 of Incentive
Payments upon clearing of Phase I spectrum and estimate that we will pay $2,112 upon clearing of Phase II spectrum, expected by
the end of 2023. Additionally, we are responsible for approximately $1,000 of compensable relocation costs over the next several
years as the spectrum is being cleared by satellite operators, of which $650 was paid in the fourth quarter of 2021. Cash paid,
including spectrum deposits (net of refunds), capitalized interest, and any payments for incentive and relocation costs are included
in “Acquisitions, net of cash acquired” on our consolidated statements of cash flows. Interest is capitalized until the spectrum is
ready for its intended use. Funding for the purchase price of the spectrum included a combination of cash on hand and short-term
investments, as well as short- and long-term debt.
On January 14, 2022, the FCC announced that we were the winning bidder for 1,624 3.45 GHz licenses in Auction 110. We
provided the FCC an upfront deposit of $123 in the third quarter of 2021 and will pay the remaining $8,956 in the first quarter of
2022, for a total of $9,079. We intend to fund the purchase price using cash and short-term investments.
In June 2020, we completed the acquisition of $2,379 of 37/39 GHz spectrum in an FCC auction. Prior to the auction, we
exchanged the 39 GHz licenses with a book value of approximately $300 that were previously acquired through FiberTower
Corporation for vouchers to be applied against the winning bids and recorded a $900 gain in the first quarter of 2020. These
vouchers yielded a value of approximately $1,200, which was applied toward our gross bids. In the second quarter of 2020, we
made the final cash payment of $949, bringing the total cash payment to $1,186.
In December 2019, we acquired $982 of 24 GHz spectrum in an FCC auction.
HBO Latin America Group (HBO LAG) In May 2020, we acquired the remaining interest in HBO LAG for $141, net of cash
acquired. At acquisition, we remeasured the fair value of the total business, which exceeded the carrying amount of our equity
method investment and resulted in a pre-tax gain of $68. We consolidated that business upon close and recorded those assets at fair
value, including $640 of trade names, $271 of distribution networks and $346 of goodwill that is reported in the WarnerMedia
segment.
Dispositions
Video Business On July 31, 2021, we closed our transaction with TPG to form a new company named DIRECTV, which is jointly
governed by a board with representation from both AT&T and TPG, with TPG having tie-breaking authority on certain key
decisions, most significantly the appointment and removal of the CEO.
In connection with the transaction, we contributed our U.S. Video business unit to DIRECTV for $4,250 of junior preferred units,
an additional distribution preference of $4,200 and a 70% economic interest in common units (collectively “equity
considerations”). TPG contributed approximately $1,800 in cash to DIRECTV for $1,800 of senior preferred units and a 30%
economic interest in common units. See Note 10 for additional information on our accounting for our investment in DIRECTV.
Upon close of the transaction in the third quarter, we received approximately $7,170 in cash from DIRECTV ($7,600, net of $430
cash on hand) and transferred $195 of DIRECTV debt. Approximately $1,800 of the cash received is reported as cash received
from financing activities in our consolidated statement of cash flows, as it relates to a note payable to DIRECTV, for which
payment is tied to our agreement to cover net losses under the remaining term of the NFL SUNDAY TICKET contract up to a cap
of $2,100 over the remaining period of the contract. The remainder of the net proceeds is reported as cash from investing activities.
This transaction did not result in a material gain or loss.
83
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
In the first quarter of 2021, we applied held-for-sale accounting treatment to the assets and liabilities of the U.S. video business,
and, accordingly, included the assets in “Prepaid and other current assets,” and the related liabilities in “Accounts payable and
accrued liabilities,” on our consolidated balance sheet, up until the close of the transaction. The held-for-sale classification also
resulted in ceasing depreciation and amortization on the designated assets.
The assets and liabilities of the Video operations, transferred to DIRECTV upon close of the transaction, were as follows:
   Current assets $ 4,893 
   Property, plant and equipment – net 2,673 
   Licenses – net 5,798 
   Other intangible assets – net 1,634 
   Other assets 1,787 
Total Video assets $ 16,785 
   Current liabilities $ 4,267 
   Long-term debt 206 
   Other noncurrent liabilities 343 
Total Video liabilities $ 4,816 
Vrio On November 15, 2021, we completed the sale of our Latin America video operations, Vrio, to Grupo Werthein and recorded a
note receivable of $610 to be paid over four years, of which $300 is in the form of seller financing and the remainder is related to
working capital adjustments. In the second quarter of 2021, we classified the Vrio disposal group as held-for-sale and reported the
disposal group at fair value less cost to sell, which resulted in a noncash, pre-tax impairment charge of $4,555, including
approximately $2,100 related to accumulated foreign currency translation adjustments and $2,500 related to property, plant and
equipment and intangible assets. Approximately $80 of the impairment was attributable to noncontrolling interest. The assets and
liabilities removed from our consolidated balance sheet included $851 of Vrio held-for-sale assets primarily related to deferred
customer contract acquisition and fulfillment costs, prepaids and other deferred charges, and $2,872 of related liabilities primarily
for reserves associated with accumulated foreign currency translation adjustments, which reversed against accumulated other
comprehensive income upon close of the transaction. This disposition did not result in a net material gain or loss. We continue to
hold a 41.3% interest in SKY Mexico, a leading pay-TV provider in Mexico.
Otter Media During the third quarter of 2021, we disposed of substantially all of the assets of Otter Media. We received
approximately $1,540 in cash and removed approximately $1,200 of goodwill associated with these assets. The dispositions did not
result in a material gain or loss.
Playdemic Ltd. On September 20, 2021, we sold WarnerMedia’s mobile games app studio, Playdemic Ltd. (Playdemic) for
approximately $1,370 in cash and recognized a pre-tax gain of $706 in “Other income (expense) – net,” on our consolidated
statement of income. Approximately $600 of goodwill was removed related to this business. Playdemic was excluded from the
pending WarnerMedia/Discovery transaction.
Central European Media Enterprises Ltd. (CME) On October 13, 2020, we completed the sale of our 65.3% interest in CME, a
European broadcasting company, for approximately $1,100. This disposition did not result in a material gain or loss. Upon close,
we received relief from a debt guarantee originally covering approximately $1,100 that was reduced to $600 at the time of the sale.
Operations in Puerto Rico On October 31, 2020, we completed the sale of our previously held-for-sale wireless and wireline
operations in Puerto Rico and the U.S. Virgin Islands for approximately $1,950 and recorded a pre-tax loss of $82. Upon sale we
removed held-for-sale assets (“Prepaid and other current assets”) and held-for-sale liabilities (“Accounts payable and accrued
liabilities”) that primarily consisted of FCC licenses (approximately $1,100), allocated goodwill (approximately $250), net
property, plant and equipment (approximately $850) and net tax liabilities (approximately $500), previously reported on our
consolidated balance sheets. The proceeds were used to redeem $1,950 of cumulative preferred interests in a subsidiary that held
notes secured by the proceeds of this sale.
Hudson Yards In June 2019, we sold our ownership in Hudson Yards North Tower Holdings LLC under a sale-leaseback
arrangement for cash proceeds of $2,081 and recorded a loss of approximately $100 resulting from transaction costs (primarily real
estate transfer taxes).
84
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Hulu In April 2019, we sold our ownership interest in Hulu for cash proceeds of $1,430 and recorded a pre-tax gain of $740.
Pending Dispositions
WarnerMedia On May 17, 2021, we entered into an agreement to combine our WarnerMedia segment, subject to certain
exceptions, with a subsidiary of Discovery, Inc. (Discovery). The agreement is structured as a Reverse Morris Trust transaction,
under which WarnerMedia will be distributed to AT&T’s shareholders via a pro rata dividend, an exchange offer, or a combination
of both, followed by its combination with Discovery. The transaction is expected to be tax-free to AT&T and AT&T’s shareholders.
AT&T will receive approximately $43,000 (subject to working capital and other adjustments) in a combination of cash, debt
securities, and WarnerMedia’s retention of certain debt. AT&T’s shareholders will receive stock representing approximately 71% of
the new company; Discovery shareholders will own approximately 29% of the new company.
On February 1, 2022, we announced that we will structure the distribution as a spin-off rather than an exchange offer. Upon closing
of the transaction, each AT&T shareholder will receive, on a tax-free basis, an estimated 0.24 shares of the new company for each
share of AT&T common stock held as of the record date for the pro rata distribution. The exact number of shares to be received by
AT&T shareholders for each AT&T common share will be determined closer to the closing based on the number of shares of AT&T
common stock outstanding and the number of shares of Discovery common stock outstanding on an as-converted and as-exercised
basis. AT&T shareholders will continue to hold the same number of shares of AT&T common stock after the transaction closes.
The transaction is expected to close in the second quarter of 2022, subject to approval by Discovery shareholders and customary
closing conditions, including receipt of regulatory approvals. No vote is required by AT&T shareholders. Upon close of the
transaction, WarnerMedia will be deconsolidated.
The merger agreement contains certain customary termination rights for AT&T and Discovery, including, without limitation, a right
for either party to terminate if the transaction is not completed on or before July 15, 2023. Termination fees under specified
circumstances will require Discovery to pay AT&T $720 or AT&T to pay Discovery $1,770.
Magallanes, Inc. (Spinco), a subsidiary of AT&T, entered into a $41,500 commitment letter (Bridge Loan) on May 17, 2021. On
June 4, 2021, Spinco entered into a $10,000 term loan credit agreement (Spinco Term Loan) and reduced the aggregate
commitment amount under the Bridge Loan to $31,500. There have been no draws on the Bridge Loan or the Spinco Term Loan. In
the event advances are made under the Bridge Loan or Spinco Term Loan, those advances will be used by Spinco to finance a
portion of the cash distribution to AT&T in connection with the transaction.
Xandr On December 21, 2021, we entered into an agreement to sell the marketplace component of Xandr, primarily representing
the AppNexus business, to Microsoft, which is expected to close in 2022, subject to customary regulatory approvals. This
advertising business is included in our WarnerMedia segment and is excluded from the WarnerMedia/Discovery transaction. We
applied held-for-sale accounting treatment to the related assets and liabilities of this business, resulting in approximately $550 of
goodwill and other intangible assets being reclassified to “Prepaid and other current assets” as of December 31, 2021.
85
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
NOTE 7. PROPERTY, PLANT AND EQUIPMENT
Property, plant and equipment is summarized as follows at December 31:
Lives (years) 2021 2020
Land - $ 2,458 $ 2,571 
Buildings and improvements 2-44 39,306 39,418 
Central office equipment 3-10 97,069 95,981 
Cable, wiring and conduit 15-50 79,961 75,409 
Satellites 14-17 103 908 
Other equipment 3-20 86,830 90,883 
Software 3-7 17,916 18,482 
Under construction - 5,845 4,099 
329,488 327,751 
Accumulated depreciation and amortization 203,584 200,436 
Property, plant and equipment – net $ 125,904 $ 127,315 
Includes certain network software.
Our depreciation expense was $18,629 in 2021, $20,504 in 2020, and $20,758 in 2019. Depreciation expense included amortization
of software totaling $3,021 in 2021, $3,483 in 2020 and $3,313 in 2019.
In December 2020, we reassessed our grouping of long-lived assets and identified certain impairment indicators, requiring us to
evaluate the recoverability of the long-lived assets of our former video business. Based on this evaluation, we determined that these
assets were not fully recoverable and recognized pre-tax impairment charges totaling $7,255, of which $1,681 relates to property,
plant and equipment, including satellites. The reduced carrying amounts of the impaired assets became their new cost basis.
In 2019, we recorded a noncash pre-tax charge of $1,290 to abandon copper assets that we no longer expect will be utilized to
support future network activity. The abandonment was considered outside the ordinary course of business.
NOTE 8. LEASES
We have operating and finance leases for certain facilities and equipment used in our operations. Our leases generally have
remaining lease terms of up to 15 years. Some of our real estate operating leases contain renewal options that may be exercised, and
some of our leases include options to terminate the leases within one year.
We have recognized a right-of-use asset for both operating and finance leases, and a corresponding lease liability that represents the
present value of our obligation to make payments over the lease term. The present value of the lease payments is calculated using
the incremental borrowing rate for operating and finance leases, which was determined using a portfolio approach based on the rate
of interest that we would have to pay to borrow an amount equal to the lease payments on a collateralized basis over a similar term.
We use the unsecured borrowing rate and risk-adjust that rate to approximate a collateralized rate in the currency of the lease,
which will be updated on a quarterly basis for measurement of new lease liabilities.
The components of lease expense were as follows:
2021 2020 2019
Operating lease cost $ 5,793$ 5,896$ 5,684
Finance lease cost:
Amortization of right-of-use assets $ 256$ 287$ 271
Interest on lease obligation 162 156 169
Total finance lease cost $ 418$ 443$ 4401
1 
86
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
The following table provides supplemental cash flows information related to leases:
2021 2020 2019
Cash Flows from Operating Activities
Cash paid for amounts included in lease obligations:
Operating cash flows from operating leases $ 5,012$ 4,852$ 4,583
Supplemental Lease Cash Flow Disclosures
Operating lease right-of-use assets obtained in exchange for
    new operating lease obligations $ 4,581$ 5,270$ 7,818
The following tables set forth supplemental balance sheet information related to leases at December 31:
2021 2020
Operating Leases
Operating lease right-of-use assets $ 24,180 $ 24,714 
Accounts payable and accrued liabilities $ 3,706 $ 3,537 
Operating lease obligation 21,261 22,202 
Total operating lease obligation $ 24,967 $ 25,739 
Finance Leases
Property, plant and equipment, at cost $ 2,609 $ 3,586 
Accumulated depreciation and amortization (1,120) (1,361)
Property, plant and equipment – net $ 1,489 $ 2,225 
Current portion of long-term debt $ 137 $ 189 
Long-term debt 1,484 1,847 
Total finance lease obligation $ 1,621 $ 2,036 
2021 2020
Weighted-Average Remaining Lease Term (years)
Operating leases 8.4 8.5
Finance leases 8.4 9.9
Weighted-Average Discount Rate
Operating leases 3.7 % 4.1 %
Finance leases 7.8 % 8.1 %
87
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
The following table provides the expected future minimum maturities of lease obligations:
At December 31, 2021 Operating
LeasesFinance
Leases
2022 $ 4,922 $ 299 
2023 4,502 283 
2024 3,970 257 
2025 3,232 246 
2026 2,540 243 
Thereafter 10,686 1,068 
Total lease payments 29,852 2,396 
Less: imputed interest (4,885) (775)
Total $ 24,967 $ 1,621 
NOTE 9. GOODWILL AND OTHER INTANGIBLE ASSETS
We test goodwill for impairment at a reporting unit level, which is deemed to be our principal operating segments or one level
below. With our annual impairment testing as of October 1, 2021, the calculated fair values of the reporting units exceeded their
book values in all circumstances; however, the WarnerMedia fair value exceeded its book value by less than 10%, with industry
trends and our content distribution strategy affecting fair value.
Effective January 1, 2021, we updated our reporting units to reflect recent changes in how WarnerMedia, an integrated content
organization that distributes across various platforms, is managed and evaluated. With this operational change, the reporting unit is
deemed to be the operating segment. The previous reporting units, Turner, Home Box Office, Warner Bros., and Xandr, and the new
WarnerMedia reporting unit were tested for goodwill impairment on January 1, 2021, for which no impairment was identified.
Changes to our goodwill in 2021 primarily resulted from the following transactions (see Note 6):
•The agreement to sell our marketplace component of Xandr, our advertising business within the WarnerMedia segment.
Approximately $400 of goodwill was allocated to the business and classified as held-for-sale.
•Our disposition of substantially all the assets of Otter Media and removal of $885 of associated goodwill.
•Our sale of WarnerMedia’s mobile games app studio, Playdemic and removal of $600 of associated goodwill.
Other changes to our goodwill in 2021 primarily resulted from the sale of our Government Solutions business and foreign currency
translation.
In December 2020, we changed our management strategy and reevaluated our former domestic video business, allowing us to
maximize value in our former domestic video business and further accelerate our ability to innovate and execute in our fast-
growing broadband and fiber business. The strategy change required us to reassess the grouping and recoverability of the former
video business long-lived assets. In conjunction with the strategy change, we separated the former Entertainment Group reporting
unit into two reporting units, Video and Consumer Wireline, which includes legacy telephony operations. Our recoverability
assessment resulted in $7,255 of long-lived asset impairment in the former video business, including $4,373 for orbital slots and
$1,201 for customer lists. The change in reporting units required the historical Entertainment Group goodwill to be assigned to the
separate Video and Consumer Wireline reporting units, for which we used the relative fair value allocation methodology. The
affected reporting units were then tested for goodwill impairment. We recorded an impairment of the entire $8,253 of goodwill
allocated to the Video reporting unit. No goodwill impairment was required in the Consumer Wireline reporting unit. We closed our
transaction with TPG and deconsolidated Video in the third quarter of 2021 (see Note 6).
In the second quarter of 2020, driven by significant and adverse economic and political environments in Latin America, including
the impact of COVID-19, we experienced accelerated subscriber losses and revenue decline in the region, as well as closure of our
operations in Venezuela. When combining these business trends and higher weighted-average cost of capital resulting from the
increase in country-risk premiums in the region, we concluded that it was more likely than not that the fair value of the Vrio
reporting unit, estimated using discounted cash flow and market multiple approaches, was less than its carrying amount. We
recorded a $2,212 goodwill impairment in the Vrio reporting unit, with $105 attributable to noncontrolling interest. Vrio was sold in
the fourth quarter of 2021 (see Note 6).
88
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Other changes to our goodwill in 2020 resulted from foreign currency translation, the held-for-sale treatment of Crunchyroll and
our acquisition of the remaining interest in HBO LAG (see Note 6). In 2020, Xandr was combined with our WarnerMedia segment.
At December 31, 2021, our Communications segment has three reporting units: Mobility, Business Wireline and Consumer
Wireline. The reporting unit is deemed to be the operating segment for WarnerMedia and Latin America.
89
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
The following table sets forth the changes in the carrying amounts of goodwill by operating segment:
2021 2020
Balance
at
Jan. 1Dispositions,
currency
exchange
and otherBalance
at
Dec. 31Balance
at
Jan. 1 AcquisitionsImpairmentsDispositions,
currency
exchange
and otherBalance
at
Dec. 31
Communications $91,976 $ (76)$91,900 $100,234 $ — $ (8,253)$ (5)$91,976 
WarnerMedia 42,447 (1,940) 40,507 42,345 415 — (313) 42,447 
Latin America 836 (20) 816 3,662 — (2,212) (614) 836 
Total $135,259 $ (2,036)$133,223 $146,241 $ 415 $(10,465)$ (932)$135,259 
We review amortizing intangible assets for impairment whenever events or circumstances indicate that the carrying amount may
not be recoverable over the remaining life of the asset or asset group, including the video business previously discussed.
In 2021, as a result of the separation of our U.S. video business (see Note 6), we removed $5,798 of orbital slot licenses and $1,585
of customer lists that were transferred to DIRECTV. As a result of the transaction to sell our Latin America video operations (see
Note 6), we classified the Vrio disposal group as held-for-sale and reported the disposal group at fair value less cost to sell, which
resulted in the impairment of certain intangibles related to this business, including $241 for customer lists, $632 for trade names
and $89 for amortizable wireless licenses. Indefinite-lived wireless licenses increased in 2021 due to recent auction activity (see
Note 6).
In 2020, we changed the estimated lives of our orbital slot licenses from indefinite to finite-lived and began amortizing them over
their average remaining economic life of 15 years (see Note 1).
90
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Our other intangible assets at December 31 are summarized as follows:
2021 2020
Other Intangible AssetsWeighted-
Average
LifeGross
Carrying
AmountAccumulated
AmortizationCurrency
Translation
AdjustmentGross
Carrying
AmountAccumulated
AmortizationCurrency
Translation
Adjustment
Amortized intangible assets:
Wireless licenses 21.6 years$ 3,083 $ 307 $ (440)$ 2,979 $ 271 $ (421)
Orbital slots N/A — — — 5,825 — — 
Trademarks and trade
names38.3 years 18,781 
2,077 (7) 20,016 1,518 (442)
Distribution network 10.0 years 18,399 6,457 — 18,414 4,621 — 
Released television and
film content17.8 years 10,939 
6,978 — 10,940 6,240 — 
Customer lists and
relationships11.2 years 637 
483 (98) 4,100 1,645 (460)
Other 22.3 years 10,987 3,221 — 11,311 2,615 (5)
Total 24.6 years$ 62,826 $ 19,523 $ (545)$73,585 $ 16,910 $ (1,328)
Indefinite-lived intangible assets not subject to amortization:
Wireless licenses $ 111,494 $ 85,728 
Trade names 5,241 5,241 
Total $116,735 $ 90,969 
Amortized intangible assets are definite-life assets, and, as such, we record amortization expense based on a method that most
appropriately reflects our expected cash flows from these assets. Amortization expense for definite-life intangible assets in 2021
reflected the separation of our U.S. video and Vrio businesses and was $4,288 for the year ended December 31, 2021, $8,239 for
the year ended December 31, 2020 and $7,932 for the year ended December 31, 2019.
Estimated amortization expense for the next five years is as follows:
Year AT&T Inc.Attributable to
WarnerMedia
2022 $ 3,907 $ 3,747 
2023 3,895 3,741 
2024 3,524 3,377 
2025 3,394 3,258 
2026 3,309 3,174 
 The pending WarnerMedia/Discovery transaction is expected to close in the second
quarter of 2022, subject to approval by Discovery shareholders and customary
closing conditions. (See Note 6)1
1
91
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
NOTE 10. EQUITY METHOD INVESTMENTS
Investments in partnerships, joint ventures and less than majority-owned subsidiaries in which we have significant influence are
accounted for under the equity method.
On July 31, 2021, we closed our transaction with TPG to form a new company named DIRECTV (see Note 6). The transaction
resulted in our deconsolidation of the Video Business, with DIRECTV being accounted for under the equity method beginning
August 1, 2021.
In May 2020, we acquired the remaining interest in HBO LAG and fully consolidated that entity. In October 2020, we sold our
ownership interest in CME. (See Note 6)
In 2019, we sold our investments in Hudson Yards and Hulu. (See Note 6)
Our investments in equity affiliates at December 31, 2021 primarily included our interests in DIRECTV, SKY Mexico and The CW
Network.
DIRECTV We account for our investment in DIRECTV under the equity method of accounting. DIRECTV is considered a
variable interest entity for accounting purposes. As DIRECTV is jointly governed by a board with representation from both AT&T
and TPG, with TPG having tie-breaking authority on certain key decisions, most significantly the appointment and removal of the
CEO, we have concluded that we are not the primary beneficiary of DIRECTV.
The ownership interests in DIRECTV, based on seniority are as follows:
•Preferred units with distribution rights of $1,800 held by TPG, which were fully distributed by December 31, 2021.
•Junior preferred units with distribution rights of $4,250 held by AT&T, of which $3,212 of distribution rights remain as of
December 31, 2021.
•Distribution preference associated with Common units of $4,200 held by AT&T.
•Common units, with 70% held by AT&T and 30% held by TPG.
The initial fair value of the equity considerations on July 31, 2021 was $6,852, which was determined using a discounted cash flow
model reflecting distribution rights and preference of the individual instruments. During 2021, we recognized $619 of equity in net
income of affiliates and received total distributions of $1,942 from DIRECTV. The book value of our investment in DIRECTV at
December 31, 2021 was $5,539.
Our share of net income or loss may differ from the stated ownership percentage interest of DIRECTV as the terms of the
arrangement prescribe substantive non-proportionate cash distributions, both from operations and in liquidation, that are based on
classes of interests held by investors. In the event that DIRECTV records a loss, that loss will be allocated to ownership interests
based on their seniority, beginning with the most subordinated interests.
SKY Mexico We hold a 41.3% interest in SKY Mexico, which is a leading pay-TV provider in Mexico.
The CW Network (The CW) We hold a 50.0% interest in The CW, which is an advertising supported broadcasting and licensing
joint venture between Warner Bros. and CBS Corporation.
92
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
The following table is a reconciliation of our investments in equity affiliates as presented on our consolidated balance sheets:
2021 2020
Beginning of year $ 1,780 $ 3,695 
Additional investments 265 178 
Receipt of equity interest in DIRECTV 6,852 — 
Distributions from DIRECTV in excess of cumulative equity in earnings (1,323) — 
Other capital distributions (26) (22)
Dividends and distributions of cumulative earnings received (815) (133)
Equity in net income of affiliates 631 95 
Acquisition of remaining interest in HBO LAG — (1,141)
Disposition of CME — (749)
Impairments — (146)
Disposition of various investments (68) — 
Currency translation adjustments (16) (10)
Other adjustments (6) 13 
End of year $ 7,274 $ 1,780 
NOTE 11. INVENTORIES AND THEATRICAL FILM AND TELEVISION PRODUCTION COSTS
Film and television production costs are stated at the lower of cost, less accumulated amortization, or fair value and include the
unamortized cost of completed theatrical films and television episodes, theatrical films and television series in production and
undeveloped film and television rights. The amount of capitalized film and television production costs recognized as broadcast,
programming and operations expenses for a given period is determined using the film forecast computation method.
In the fourth quarter of 2020, we recognized an impairment of $524 based on a change in these estimates for various film titles.
This change in estimates was driven by the continued shutdown of theaters during the pandemic, including the resurgence of an
outbreak in the fourth quarter and the impact of our decision to release our 2021 movies in theaters and on HBO Max at the same
time.
93
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
The following table summarizes inventories and theatrical film and television production costs as of December 31:
2021 2020
Inventories:
Programming costs, less amortization $ 7,101 $ 6,010 
Other inventory, primarily DVD and Blu-ray Discs 134 103 
Total inventories 7,235 6,113 
Less: current portion of inventory (134) (103)
Total noncurrent inventories 7,101 6,010 
Theatrical film production costs:
Released, less amortization 525 487 
Completed and not released 343 616 
In production 1,687 1,130 
Development and pre-production 143 190 
Television production costs:
Released, less amortization 3,335 2,495 
Completed and not released 1,350 1,381 
In production 4,376 2,353 
Development and pre-production 123 90 
Total theatrical film and television production costs 11,882 8,742 
Total noncurrent inventories and theatrical film and television production costs $ 18,983 $ 14,752 
Includes the costs of certain programming rights, primarily sports, for which payments have been made prior to the related rights being
received.
Does not include $ 3,961  and $ 4,699  of acquired film and television library intangible assets as of December 31, 2021 and 2020, respectively ,
which are included in “Other Intangible Assets – Net” on our consolidated balance sheets.
Approximately 89% of unamortized film costs for released theatrical and television content are expected to be amortized within
three years from December 31, 2021. In addition, approximately $3,464 of the film costs of released and completed and not
released theatrical and television product are expected to be amortized during 2022.1
2
2
1
2
94
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
NOTE 12. DEBT
Long-term debt of AT&T and its subsidiaries, including interest rates and maturities, is summarized as follows at December 31:
2021 2020
Notes and debentures
Interest Rates Maturities
0.69% -2.99% 2021 - 2039 $ 31,841 $ 25,549 
3.00% -4.99% 2021 - 2061 108,003 110,317 
5.00% -6.99% 2021 - 2095 23,360 24,259 
7.00% -9.15% 2021 - 2097 5,645 5,006 
Credit agreement borrowings 10,400 300 
Fair value of interest rate swaps recorded in debt 16 20 
179,265 165,451 
Unamortized (discount) premium – net (9,610) (9,710)
Unamortized issuance costs (508) (532)
Total notes and debentures 169,147 155,209 
Finance lease obligations 1,621 2,036 
Total long-term debt, including current maturities 170,768 157,245 
Current maturities of long-term debt (7,944) (3,470)
Current maturities of credit agreement borrowings (10,100) — 
Total long-term debt $ 152,724 $ 153,775 
Maturities assume puttable debt is redeemed by the holders at the next opportunity .
We had outstanding Euro, British pound sterling, Canadian dollar, Mexican peso, Australian dollar, and Swiss franc denominated
debt of approximately $41,249 and $43,399 at December 31, 2021 and 2020, respectively.
The weighted-average interest rate of our long-term debt portfolio, including, credit agreement borrowings and the impact of
derivatives, was approximately 3.8% as of December 31, 2021 and 4.1% as of December 31, 2020.
Debt maturing within one year consisted of the following at December 31:
2021 2020
Current maturities of long-term debt $ 7,944 $ 3,470 
Commercial paper 6,586 — 
Credit agreement borrowings 10,100 — 
Total $ 24,630 $ 3,470 1
1
95
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Financing Activities
During 2021, we received net proceeds of $8,931 on the issuance of $8,949 in long-term debt and proceeds of $10,100 on the
issuance of credit agreement borrowings in various markets, with an average weighted maturity of approximately 2.3 years and a
weighted average interest rate of 1.4%. We repaid $2,904 in borrowings of various notes with a weighted average coupon of 3.5%.
Our debt activity during 2021 primarily consisted of the following:
First
QuarterSecond
QuarterThird
QuarterFourth
QuarterFull Year
2021
Net commercial paper borrowings $ 7,072 $ (513)$ (2)$ 4 $ 6,561 
Issuance of Notes and Debentures:
U.S. dollar denominated global notes $ 6,000 $ — $ — $ — $ 6,000 
Initial average rate of 1.27%
Euro denominated global notes (converted to USD at issuance) 1,461 — — — 1,461 
Rate of 0.00%
2021 Syndicated Term Loan 7,350 — — — 7,350 
BAML Bilateral Term Loan 2,000 — — — 2,000 
Private financing 750 — — — 750 
Other 636 — 835 — 1,471 
Debt Issuances $18,197 $ — $ 835 $ — $ 19,032 
Repayments:
Private financing $ (649)$ — $ — $ — $ (649)
2.650% Euro denominated global notes due 2021 — — — (1,349) (1,349)
Other (253) (253) (498) (140) (1,144)
Repayments of long-term debt $ (902)$ (253)$ (498)$(1,489)$ (3,142)
Includes $ 1,316  net issuance of commercial paper with original maturities of three months or less, $ 12,755  of commercial paper issued greater
than 90 days and $ 7,510  of commercial paper repaid greater than 90 days.
Includes credit agreement borrowing.
Tender Offers and Debt Exchanges
In August 2020, we repurchased $11,384 of AT&T global notes and subsidiary notes due 2021 to 2025 through cash tender offers.
In September 2020, we exchanged $17,677 of AT&T and subsidiary notes, with interest rates ranging from 4.350% to 8.750% and
original maturities ranging from 2031 to 2058 for $1,459 of cash and $21,500 of three new series of AT&T Inc. global notes, with
interest rates ranging from 3.500% to 3.650% and maturities ranging from 2053 to 2059.
In December 2020, we also exchanged $8,280 of AT&T and subsidiary notes, with interest rates ranging from 2.950% to 7.125%
and original maturities ranging from 2026 to 2048 for $8 of cash and $9,678 of two new series of AT&T global notes, with interest
rates of 2.550% and 3.800% and maturities of 2033 and 2057, respectively.1
2
1
2 
96
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
As of December 31, 2021 and 2020, we were in compliance with all covenants and conditions of instruments governing our debt.
Substantially all of our outstanding long-term debt is unsecured. Maturities of outstanding long-term notes and debentures, as of
December 31, 2021, and the corresponding weighted-average interest rate scheduled for repayment are as follows:
2022 2023 2024 2025 2026 Thereafter
Debt repayments $18,185 $ 7,739 $11,562 $ 6,484 $10,557 $126,922 
Weighted-average interest rate 1.9 % 3.4 % 2.9 % 3.9 % 3.3 % 4.2 %
Debt repayments represent maturity value and assume puttable debt is redeemed at the next opportunity . Foreign debt includes the impact from
hedges, when applicable. Includes credit agreement borrowings.
Includes credit agreement borrowings.
Credit Facilities
General
In April 2020, we entered into and drew on a $5,500 Term Loan Credit Agreement (Term Loan) with 11 commercial banks and
Bank of America, N.A. as lead agent. We repaid and terminated the Term Loan in May 2020.
On January 29, 2021, we entered into a $14,700 Term Loan Credit Agreement (2021 Syndicated Term Loan), with Bank of
America, N.A., as agent. On March 23, 2021, we borrowed $7,350 under the 2021 Syndicated Term Loan, and the remaining
$7,350 of lenders’ commitments was terminated. As of December 31, 2021, $7,350 was outstanding and is due on March 22, 2022.
In March 2021, we entered into and drew on a $2,000 term loan credit agreement (BAML Bilateral Term Loan) consisting of (i) a
$1,000 facility originally due December 31, 2021 (BAML Tranche A Facility) and subsequently extended to December 31, 2022 in
the fourth quarter of 2021, and (ii) a $1,000 facility due December 31, 2022 (BAML Tranche B Facility), with Bank of America,
N.A., as agent. At December 31, 2021, $2,000 was outstanding under these facilities.
Revolving Credit Agreements
In November 2020, we amended one of our $7,500 revolving credit agreements by extending the termination date. In total, we have
two $7,500 revolving credit agreements, totaling $15,000, with one terminating on December 11, 2023 and the other terminating on
November 17, 2025. No amounts were outstanding under either agreement as of December 31, 2021.
Each of our credit and loan agreements contains covenants that are customary for an issuer with an investment grade senior debt
credit rating as well as a net debt-to-EBITDA financial ratio covenant requiring AT&T to maintain, as of the last day of each fiscal
quarter through June 30, 2023, a ratio of not more than 4.0-to-1, and a ratio of not more than 3.5-to-1 for any fiscal quarter
thereafter. As of December 31, 2021, we were in compliance with the covenants for our credit facilities.
The events of default are customary for agreements of this type and such events would result in the acceleration of, or would permit
the lenders to accelerate, as applicable, required payments and would increase each agreement’s relevant Applicable Margin by
2.00% per annum.
The obligations of the lenders under two revolving credit agreements to provide advances will terminate on December 11, 2023,
and November 17, 2025, unless the commitments are terminated in whole prior to that date. All advances must be repaid no later
than the date on which lenders are no longer obligated to make any advances under the applicable credit agreement.
Each of the credit agreements provides that we and lenders representing more than 50% of the facility amount may agree to extend
their commitments under such Credit Agreement for two one-year periods beyond the initial termination date. We have the right to
terminate, in whole or in part, amounts committed by the lenders under each of the credit agreements in excess of any outstanding
advances; however, any such terminated commitments may not be reinstated.1
 2
1
2
97
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Advances under these agreements would bear interest, at our option, either:
•at a variable annual rate equal to: (1) the highest of (but not less than zero) (a) the rate of interest announced publicly by
Citibank in New York, New York, from time to time, as Citibank’s base rate, (b) 0.5% per annum above the federal funds rate,
and (c) the London interbank offered rate (or the successor thereto) (“LIBOR”) applicable to dollars for a period of one month
plus 1.00%, plus (2) an applicable margin, as set forth in the applicable Credit Agreement (the “Applicable Margin for Base
Advances”); or
•at a rate equal to: (i) LIBOR (adjusted upwards to reflect any bank reserve costs) for a period of one, two, three or six months,
as applicable, plus (ii) an applicable margin, as set forth in the applicable Credit Agreement (the “Applicable Margin for
Eurodollar Rate Advances”).
We pay a facility fee of 0.070%, 0.080%, 0.100% or 0.125% per annum of the amount of the lender commitments, depending on
AT&T’s credit rating.
NOTE 13. FAIR VALUE MEASUREMENTS AND DISCLOSURE
The Fair Value Measurement and Disclosure framework in ASC 820, “Fair Value Measurement,” provides a three-tiered fair value
hierarchy based on the reliability of the inputs used to determine fair value. Level 1 refers to fair values determined based on
quoted prices in active markets for identical assets. Level 2 refers to fair values estimated using significant other observable inputs
and Level 3 includes fair values estimated using significant unobservable inputs.
The level of an asset or liability within the fair value hierarchy is based on the lowest level of any input that is significant to the fair
value measurement. Our valuation techniques maximize the use of observable inputs and minimize the use of unobservable inputs.
The valuation methodologies described above may produce a fair value calculation that may not be indicative of future net
realizable value or reflective of future fair values. We believe our valuation methods are appropriate and consistent with other
market participants. The use of different methodologies or assumptions to determine the fair value of certain financial instruments
could result in a different fair value measurement at the reporting date. There have been no changes in the methodologies used
since December 31, 2020.
Long-Term Debt and Other Financial Instruments
The carrying amounts and estimated fair values of our long-term debt, including current maturities, and other financial instruments,
are summarized as follows:
December 31, 2021 December 31, 2020
Carrying
AmountFair
ValueCarrying
AmountFair
Value
Notes and debentures $ 169,147 $ 194,891 $ 155,209 $ 187,224 
Commercial paper 6,586 6,586 — — 
Investment securities 3,374 3,374 3,249 3,249 
Includes credit agreement borrowings. Excludes note payable to DIRECTV .
Excludes investments accounted for under the equity method.
The carrying amount of debt with an original maturity of less than one year approximates fair value. The fair value measurements
used for notes and debentures are considered Level 2 and are determined using various methods, including quoted prices for
identical or similar securities in both active and inactive markets.1
2
1
2
98
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Following is the fair value leveling for investment securities that are measured at fair value and derivatives as of December 31,
2021 and December 31, 2020. Derivatives designated as hedging instruments are reflected as “Other assets,” “Other noncurrent
liabilities,” “Prepaid and other current assets” and “Accounts payable and accrued liabilities” on our consolidated balance sheets.
December 31, 2021
Level 1 Level 2 Level 3 Total
Equity Securities
Domestic equities $ 1,256 $ — $ — $ 1,256 
International equities 227 — — 227 
Fixed income equities 230 — — 230 
Available-for-Sale Debt Securities — 1,384 — 1,384 
Asset Derivatives
Cross-currency swaps — 211 — 211 
Foreign exchange contracts — 8 — 8 
Liability Derivatives
Cross-currency swaps — (3,170) — (3,170)
Foreign exchange contracts — (41) — (41)
December 31, 2020
Level 1 Level 2 Level 3 Total
Equity Securities
Domestic equities $ 1,010 $ — $ — $ 1,010 
International equities 180 — — 180 
Fixed income equities 236 — — 236 
Available-for-Sale Debt Securities — 1,479 — 1,479 
Asset Derivatives
Cross-currency swaps — 1,721 — 1,721 
Foreign exchange contracts — 6 — 6 
Liability Derivatives
Cross-currency swaps — (1,814) — (1,814)
Foreign exchange contracts — (9) — (9)
Investment Securities
Our investment securities include both equity and debt securities that are measured at fair value, as well as equity securities without
readily determinable fair values. A substantial portion of the fair values of our investment securities is estimated based on quoted
market prices. Investments in equity securities not traded on a national securities exchange are valued at cost, less any impairment,
and adjusted for changes resulting from observable, orderly transactions for identical or similar securities. Investments in debt
securities not traded on a national securities exchange are valued using pricing models, quoted prices of securities with similar
characteristics or discounted cash flows.
The components comprising total gains and losses in the period on equity securities are as follows:
For the years ended December 31, 2021 2020 2019
Total gains (losses) recognized on equity securities $ 293 $ 171 $ 301 
Gains (Losses) recognized on equity securities sold (5) (25) 100 
Unrealized gains (losses) recognized on equity securities held at end of
period $ 298 $ 196 $ 201 
At December 31, 2021, available-for-sale debt securities totaling $1,384 have maturities as follows - less than one year: $41; one to
three years: $171; three to five years: $179; five or more years: $993.
99
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Our cash equivalents (money market securities), short-term investments (certificate and time deposits) and nonrefundable customer
deposits are recorded at amortized cost, and the respective carrying amounts approximate fair values. Short-term investments and
nonrefundable customer deposits are recorded in “Prepaid and other current assets” and our investment securities are recorded in
“Other Assets” on the consolidated balance sheets.
Derivative Financial Instruments
We enter into derivative transactions to manage certain market risks, primarily interest rate risk and foreign currency exchange risk.
This includes the use of interest rate swaps, interest rate locks, foreign exchange forward contracts and combined interest rate
foreign exchange contracts (cross-currency swaps). We do not use derivatives for trading or speculative purposes. We record
derivatives on our consolidated balance sheets at fair value that is derived from observable market data, including yield curves and
foreign exchange rates (all of our derivatives are Level 2). Cash flows associated with derivative instruments are presented in the
same category on the consolidated statements of cash flows as the item being hedged.
Fair Value Hedging Periodically, we enter into and designate fixed-to-floating interest rate swaps as fair value hedges. The purpose
of these swaps is to manage interest rate risk by managing our mix of fixed-rate and floating-rate debt. These swaps involve the
receipt of fixed-rate amounts for floating interest rate payments over the life of the swaps without exchange of the underlying
principal amount.
We also designate some of our cross-currency swaps as fair value hedges. The purpose of these contracts is to hedge foreign
currency risk associated with changes in spot rates on foreign denominated debt. For these hedges we have elected to exclude the
change in fair value of the cross-currency swap related to both time value and cross-currency basis spread from the assessment of
hedge effectiveness.
Unrealized and realized gains or losses from fair value hedges impact the same category on the consolidated statements of income
as the item being hedged, including the earnings impact of excluded components. In instances where we have elected to exclude
components from the assessment of hedge effectiveness related to fair value hedges, unrealized gains or losses on such excluded
components are recorded as a component of accumulated OCI and recognized into earnings through the swap accrual over the life
of the hedging instrument. Unrealized gains on derivatives designated as fair value hedges are recorded at fair value as assets, and
unrealized losses are recorded at fair value as liabilities. Except for excluded components, changes in the fair value of derivative
instruments designated as fair value hedges are offset against the change in fair value of the hedged assets or liabilities through
earnings. In the years ended December 31, 2021 and 2020, no ineffectiveness was measured on fair value hedges.
Cash Flow Hedging We designate most of our cross-currency swaps as cash flow hedges. We have entered into multiple cross-
currency swaps to hedge our exposure to variability in expected future cash flows that are attributable to foreign currency risk
generated from our foreign-denominated debt. These agreements include initial and final exchanges of principal from fixed foreign
currency denominated amounts to fixed U.S. dollar denominated amounts, to be exchanged at a specified rate that is usually
determined by the market spot rate upon issuance. They also include an interest rate swap of a fixed or floating foreign currency-
denominated interest rate to a fixed U.S. dollar denominated interest rate.
We also designate some of our foreign exchange contracts as cash flow hedges. The purpose of these contracts is to hedge certain
forecasted film production costs and film tax incentives denominated in foreign currencies.
Unrealized gains on derivatives designated as cash flow hedges are recorded at fair value as assets, and unrealized losses are
recorded at fair value as liabilities. For derivative instruments designated as cash flow hedges, changes in fair value are reported as
a component of accumulated OCI and are reclassified into the consolidated statements of income in the same period the hedged
transaction affects earnings.
Periodically, we enter into and designate interest rate locks to partially hedge the risk of changes in interest payments attributable to
increases in the benchmark interest rate during the period leading up to the probable issuance of fixed-rate debt. We designate our
interest rate locks as cash flow hedges. Gains and losses when we settle our interest rate locks are amortized into income over the
life of the related debt. Over the next 12 months, we expect to reclassify $73 from accumulated OCI to “Interest expense” due to
the amortization of net losses on historical interest rate locks.
100
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Net Investment Hedging We have designated €1,450 million aggregate principal amount of debt as a hedge of the variability of
some of the Euro-denominated net investments of our subsidiaries. The gain or loss on the debt that is designated as, and is
effective as, an economic hedge of the net investment in a foreign operation is recorded as a currency translation adjustment within
accumulated OCI, net on the consolidated balance sheets. Net gains on net investment hedges recognized in accumulated OCI for
2021 were $122.
Collateral and Credit-Risk Contingency We have entered into agreements with our derivative counterparties establishing collateral
thresholds based on respective credit ratings and netting agreements. At December 31, 2021, we had posted collateral of $135 (a
deposit asset) and held collateral of $7 (a receipt liability). Under the agreements, if AT&T’s credit rating had been downgraded two
ratings levels by Fitch Ratings, one level by S&P and one level by Moody’s, before the final collateral exchange in December, we
would have been required to post additional collateral of $36. If AT&T’s credit rating had been downgraded three ratings levels by
Fitch Ratings, two levels by S&P, and two levels by Moody’s, we would have been required to post additional collateral of $2,816.
At December 31, 2020, we had posted collateral of $53 (a deposit asset) and held collateral of $694 (a receipt liability). We do not
offset the fair value of collateral, whether the right to reclaim cash collateral (a receivable) or the obligation to return cash collateral
(a payable) exists, against the fair value of the derivative instruments.
Following are the notional amounts of our outstanding derivative positions at December 31:
2021 2020
Cross-currency swaps $ 40,737 $ 40,745 
Foreign exchange contracts 30 90 
Total $ 40,767 $ 40,835 
Following are the related hedged items affecting our financial position and performance:
Effect of Derivatives on the Consolidated Statements of Income
Fair Value Hedging Relationships
For the years ended December 31, 2021 2020 2019
Interest rate swaps (Interest expense):
Gain (Loss) on interest rate swaps $ (4)$ (6)$ 58 
Gain (Loss) on long-term debt 4 6 (58)
Cross-currency swaps:
Gain (Loss) on cross-currency swaps (91) — — 
Gain (Loss) on long-term debt 91 — — 
Gain (Loss) recognized in accumulated OCI (17) — — 
In addition, the net swap settlements that accrued and settled in the periods above were offset against “Interest expense.”
Cash Flow Hedging Relationships
For the years ended December 31, 2021 2020 2019
Cross-currency swaps:
Gain (Loss) recognized in accumulated OCI $ (873)$ (378)$ (1,066)
Foreign exchange contracts:
Gain (Loss) recognized in accumulated OCI (17) 3 10 
Other income (expense) – net reclassified from
accumulated OCI into income 1 (3) 6 
Interest rate locks:
Gain (Loss) recognized in accumulated OCI — (648) (84)
Interest income (expense) reclassified from
accumulated OCI into income (92) (84) (63)
101
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Nonrecurring Fair Value Measurements
In addition to assets and liabilities that are recorded at fair value on a recurring basis, impairment indicators may subject goodwill,
long-lived assets and film costs to nonrecurring fair value measurements. The implied fair values of the U.S. video and Vrio
businesses were estimated using both the discounted cash flow as well as market multiple approaches. The fair values of long-lived
assets in the U.S. video business were determined using a present value approach of probability-weighted expected cash flows. The
fair values of film productions were estimated using a discounted cash flow approach. The inputs to all of these approaches are
considered Level 3.
Our nonrecurring fair value measurements also include the valuation of our initial investment in DIRECTV at July 31, 2021 (see
Note 10). This nonrecurring fair value measurement was estimated using a discounted cash flow approach. The inputs to these
models are considered Level 3.
During 2020, goodwill amounts related to the Video and Vrio reporting units were fully impaired. At December 31, 2020,
nonrecurring fair value measurements in our Video business unit totaled $9,744 and were comprised of $5,873 for orbital slots,
$1,613 for customer lists and $2,258 for property, plant and equipment (see Notes 7 and 9). Nonrecurring fair value measurements
for film costs within our WarnerMedia segment totaled $844 (see Note 11).
NOTE 14. INCOME TAXES
Significant components of our deferred tax liabilities (assets) are as follows at December 31:
2021 2020
Depreciation and amortization $ 47,433 $ 46,952 
Licenses and nonamortizable intangibles 15,576 13,930 
Employee benefits (3,338) (5,279)
Deferred fulfillment costs 1,797 2,691 
Equity in partnership 3,285 — 
Net operating loss and other carryforwards (6,703) (7,355)
Other – net 2,308 4,562 
Subtotal 60,358 55,501 
Deferred tax assets valuation allowance 4,638 4,773 
Net deferred tax liabilities $ 64,996 $ 60,274 
Noncurrent deferred tax liabilities $ 65,226 $ 60,472 
Less: Noncurrent deferred tax assets (230) (198)
Net deferred tax liabilities $ 64,996 $ 60,274 
At December 31, 2021, we had combined net operating and capital loss carryforwards (tax effected) for federal income tax
purposes of $452, state of $1,012 and foreign of $2,709, expiring through 2041. Additionally, we had federal credit carryforwards
of $604 and state credit carryforwards of $1,926, expiring primarily through 2041.
We recognize a valuation allowance if, based on the weight of available evidence, it is more likely than not that some portion, or
all, of a deferred tax asset will not be realized. Our valuation allowances at December 31, 2021 and 2020 related primarily to state
and foreign net operating losses and state credit carryforwards.
We consider post-1986 unremitted foreign earnings subjected to the one-time transition tax not to be indefinitely reinvested as such
earnings can be repatriated without any significant incremental tax costs. We consider other types of unremitted foreign earnings to
be indefinitely reinvested. U.S. income and foreign withholding taxes have not been recorded on temporary differences related to
investments in certain foreign subsidiaries as such differences are considered indefinitely reinvested. Determination of the amount
of unrecognized deferred tax liability is not practicable.
102
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
We recognize the financial statement effects of a tax return position when it is more likely than not, based on the technical merits,
that the position will ultimately be sustained. For tax positions that meet this recognition threshold, we apply our judgment, taking
into account applicable tax laws, our experience in managing tax audits and relevant GAAP, to determine the amount of tax benefits
to recognize in our financial statements. For each position, the difference between the benefit realized on our tax return and the
benefit reflected in our financial statements is recorded on our consolidated balance sheets as an unrecognized tax benefit (UTB).
We update our UTBs at each financial statement date to reflect the impacts of audit settlements and other resolutions of audit
issues, the expiration of statutes of limitation, developments in tax law and ongoing discussions with taxing authorities. A
reconciliation of the change in our UTB balance from January 1 to December 31 for 2021 and 2020 is as follows:
Federal, State and Foreign Tax 2021 2020
Balance at beginning of year $ 10,001 $ 10,979 
Increases for tax positions related to the current year 677 1,580 
Increases for tax positions related to prior years 443 112 
Decreases for tax positions related to prior years (1,344) (994)
Lapse of statute of limitations (29) (24)
Settlements (342) (1,646)
Current year dispositions (4) — 
Foreign currency effects — (6)
Balance at end of year 9,402 10,001 
Accrued interest and penalties 2,221 2,450 
Gross unrecognized income tax benefits 11,623 12,451 
Less: Deferred federal and state income tax benefits (799) (878)
Less: Tax attributable to timing items included above (3,515) (3,588)
Total UTB that, if recognized, would impact the
effective income tax rate as of the end of the year $ 7,309 $ 7,985 
Periodically we make deposits to taxing jurisdictions which reduce our UTB balance but are not included in the reconciliation
above. The amount of deposits that reduced our UTB balance was $377 at December 31, 2021 and $702 at December 31, 2020.
Accrued interest and penalties included in UTBs were $2,221 as of December 31, 2021 and $2,450 as of December 31, 2020. We
record interest and penalties related to federal, state and foreign UTBs in income tax expense. The net interest and penalty expense
(benefit) included in income tax expense was $(155) for 2021, $149 for 2020 and $267 for 2019.
We file income tax returns in the U.S. federal jurisdiction and various state, local and foreign jurisdictions. As a large taxpayer, our
income tax returns are regularly audited by the Internal Revenue Service (IRS) and other taxing authorities.
The IRS has completed field examinations of our tax returns through 2012. All audit periods prior to 2005 are closed for federal
examination purposes and we have effectively resolved all outstanding audit issues for years through 2010 with the IRS Appeals
Division. Those years will be closed as the final paperwork is processed in the coming months.
While we do not expect material changes, we are generally unable to estimate the range of impacts on the balance of the remaining
uncertain tax positions or the impact on the effective tax rate from the resolution of these issues until each year is closed; and it is
possible that the amount of unrecognized benefit with respect to our uncertain tax positions could increase or decrease within the
next 12 months.
103
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
The components of income tax (benefit) expense are as follows:
2021 2020 2019
Federal:
Current $ (1,198)$ (687)$ 584 
Deferred 5,296 1,039 1,656 
4,098 352 2,240 
State and local:
Current 646 (6) 603 
Deferred 456 263 144 
1,102 257 747 
Foreign:
Current 516 413 605 
Deferred (248) (57) (99)
268 356 506 
Total $ 5,468 $ 965 $ 3,493 
“Income (Loss) Before Income Taxes” in the Consolidated Statements of Income included the following components for the years
ended December 31:
2021 2020 2019
U.S. income (loss) before income taxes $ 30,223 $ (452)$ 18,301 
Foreign income (loss) before income taxes (3,276) (2,404) 167 
Total $ 26,947 $ (2,856)$ 18,468 
A reconciliation of income tax expense (benefit) and the amount computed by applying the statutory federal income tax rate of 21%
to income from continuing operations before income taxes is as follows:
2021 2020 2019
Taxes computed at federal statutory rate $ 5,659 $ (600) $ 3,878 
Increases (decreases) in income taxes resulting from:
State and local income taxes – net of federal income tax benefit 967 193 611 
CARES Act federal NOL carryback (471) — — 
Tax on foreign investments (68) (141) (115)
Noncontrolling interest (294) (285) (230)
Permanent items and R&D credit (163) (239) (285)
Audit resolutions (298) (112) (156)
Divestitures (112) 107 — 
Goodwill impairment 250 2,120 — 
Other – net (2) (78) (210)
Total $ 5,468 $ 965 $ 3,493 
Effective Tax Rate 20.3 % (33.8)% 18.9 %
Goodwill impairments are not deductible for tax purposes.
On March 27, 2020, the Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and Economic Security (CARES) Act was enacted, which allows for a Net
Operating Loss (NOL) generated in 2020 to be carried back to a year with a federal rate of 35%. During 2021, we recorded a $471
tax benefit for the rate impact of the 2020 NOL carryback adjusted for the domestic manufacturing deduction limitation in the
carryback year and applicable unrecognized tax benefits.
AT&T is subject to the Global Intangible Low Taxed Income (GILTI) provisions created under the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act of 2017.
We report the tax impact of GILTI as a period cost when incurred.1
1 
104
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
NOTE 15. PENSION AND POSTRETIREMENT BENEFITS
We offer noncontributory pension programs covering the majority of domestic nonmanagement employees in our Communications
business. Nonmanagement employees’ pension benefits are generally calculated using one of two formulas: a flat dollar amount
applied to years of service according to job classification or a cash balance plan with negotiated annual pension band credits as well
as interest credits. Most employees can elect to receive their pension benefits in either a lump sum payment or an annuity.
Pension programs covering U.S. management employees are closed to new entrants. These programs continue to provide benefits
to participants that were generally hired before January 1, 2015, who receive benefits under either cash balance pension programs
that include annual or monthly credits based on salary as well as interest credits, or a traditional pension formula (i.e., a stated
percentage of employees’ adjusted career income).
We also provide a variety of medical, dental and life insurance benefits to certain retired employees under various plans and accrue
actuarially determined postretirement benefit costs as active employees earn these benefits.
WarnerMedia and certain of its subsidiaries have both funded and unfunded defined benefit pension plans, the substantial majority
of which are noncontributory plans covering domestic employees. WarnerMedia also sponsors unfunded domestic postretirement
benefit plans covering certain retirees and their dependents. At acquisition, the plans were already closed to new entrants and frozen
for new accruals.
During the fourth quarter of 2020, we committed to, and reflected in our results, plan changes impacting retiree life and death
coverage and health and medical subsidy benefits. Changes were also communicated that impact future pension accruals for certain
management employees. These plan changes align our benefit plans to, or above market level.
Obligations and Funded Status
For defined benefit pension plans, the benefit obligation is the projected benefit obligation, the actuarial present value, as of our
December 31 measurement date, of all benefits attributed by the pension benefit formula to employee service rendered to that date.
The amount of benefit to be paid depends on a number of future events incorporated into the pension benefit formula, including
estimates of the average life of employees and their beneficiaries and average years of service rendered. It is measured based on
assumptions concerning future interest rates and future employee compensation levels as applicable.
For postretirement benefit plans, the benefit obligation is the accumulated postretirement benefit obligation, the actuarial present
value as of the measurement date of all future benefits attributed under the terms of the postretirement benefit plans to employee
service.
The following table presents the change in the projected benefit obligation for the years ended December 31:
Pension Benefits Postretirement Benefits
2021 2020 2021 2020
Benefit obligation at beginning of year $ 62,158 $ 59,873 $ 13,928 $ 16,041 
Service cost - benefits earned during the period 957 1,029 45 53 
Interest cost on projected benefit obligation 1,276 1,687 210 416 
Amendments — (340) — (2,655)
Actuarial (gain) loss (1,237) 5,054 (275) 1,423 
Benefits paid, including settlements (5,942) (5,124) (1,356) (1,370)
Curtailment — (1) — — 
Plan transfers — (20) — 20 
Benefit obligation at end of year $ 57,212 $ 62,158 $ 12,552 $ 13,928 
105
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
The following table presents the change in the fair value of plan assets for the years ended December 31 and the plans’ funded
status at December 31:
Pension Benefits Postretirement Benefits
2021 2020 2021 2020
Fair value of plan assets at beginning of year $ 54,606 $ 53,530 $ 3,843 $ 4,145 
Actual return on plan assets 5,737 6,199 210 302 
Benefits paid, including settlements (5,942) (5,124) (1,163) (1,029)
Contributions — 2 308 425 
Plan transfers — (1) — — 
Fair value of plan assets at end of year 54,401 54,606 3,198 3,843 
Unfunded status at end of year $ (2,811)$ (7,552)$ (9,354)$ (10,085)
At our discretion, certain postretirement benefits may be paid from our cash accounts, which does not reduce Voluntary Employee Benefit
Association (VEBA) assets. Future benefit payments may be made from VEBA  trusts and thus reduce those asset balances.
Funded status is not indicative of our ability to pay ongoing pension benefits or of our obligation to fund retirement trusts. Required pension
funding is determined in accordance with the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended (ERISA) and applicable
regulations.
Amounts recognized on our consolidated balance sheets at December 31 are listed below:
Pension BenefitsPostretirement Benefits
2021 2020 2021 2020
Current portion of employee benefit obligation $ — $ — $ (1,106)$ (1,213)
Employee benefit obligation (2,811) (7,552) (8,248) (8,872)
Net amount recognized $ (2,811)$ (7,552)$ (9,354)$ (10,085)
Included in “Accounts payable and accrued liabilities.”
Included in “Postemployment benefit obligation,” combined with international pension obligations and other postemployment obligations of
$364 and $ 1,226  at December 31, 2021, and $ 553 and $ 1,299  at December 31, 2020, respectively .
The accumulated benefit obligation for our pension plans represents the actuarial present value of benefits based on employee
service and compensation as of a certain date and does not include an assumption about future compensation levels. The
accumulated benefit obligation for our pension plans was $56,159 at December 31, 2021, and $60,848 at December 31, 2020.1
2
1
2
1
 2
1
2
106
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Net Periodic Benefit Cost and Other Amounts Recognized in Other Comprehensive Income
Periodic Benefit Costs
The service cost component of net periodic pension cost (credit) is recorded in operating expenses in the consolidated statements of
income while the remaining components are recorded in “Other income (expense) – net.” Our combined net pension and
postretirement cost (credit) recognized in our consolidated statements of income was $(7,652), $711 and $2,762 for the years ended
December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019.
The following table presents the components of net periodic benefit cost (credit):
Pension BenefitsPostretirement Benefits
2021 2020 2019 2021 2020 2019
Service cost – benefits earned
during the period $ 957 $ 1,029 $ 1,019 $ 45 $ 53 $ 71 
Interest cost on projected benefit
obligation 1,276 1,687 1,960 210 416 675 
Expected return on assets (3,513) (3,557) (3,561) (151) (178) (227)
Amortization of prior service credit (144) (113) (113) (2,537) (2,329) (1,820)
Net periodic benefit cost (credit) before
   remeasurement (1,424) (954) (695) (2,433) (2,038) (1,301)
Actuarial (gain) loss (3,461) 2,404 3,088 (334) 1,299 1,670 
Net pension and postretirement
cost (credit) $ (4,885)$ 1,450 $ 2,393 $ (2,767)$ (739)$ 369 
Other Changes in Benefit Obligations Recognized in Other Comprehensive Income
The following table presents the after-tax changes in benefit obligations recognized in OCI and the after-tax prior service credits
that were amortized from OCI into net periodic benefit costs:
Pension Benefits Postretirement Benefits
2021 2020 2019 2021 2020 2019
Balance at beginning of year $ 525 $ 361 $ 447 $ 8,416 $ 8,171 $ 6,086 
Prior service (cost) credit — 250 — — 2,001 3,457 
Amortization of prior service credit (109) (86) (86) (1,912) (1,756) (1,372)
Total recognized in other
comprehensive (income) loss (109) 164 (86) (1,912) 245 2,085 
Balance at end of year $ 416 $ 525 $ 361 $ 6,504 $ 8,416 $ 8,171 
107
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Assumptions
In determining the projected benefit obligation and the net pension and postretirement benefit cost, we used the following
significant weighted-average assumptions:
Pension Benefits Postretirement Benefits
2021 2020 2019 2021 2020 2019
Weighted-average discount rate for
determining benefit obligation at
December 31 3.00 % 2.70 % 3.40 % 2.80 % 2.40 % 3.20 %
Discount rate in effect for
determining
service cost 3.30 % 3.60 % 4.10 % 2.90 % 3.50 % 4.40 %
Discount rate in effect for
determining interest cost 2.30 % 2.90 % 3.50 % 1.60 % 2.70 % 3.70 %
Weighted-average interest credit
rate for cash balance pension
programs 3.20 % 3.10 % 3.30 % — % — % — %
Long-term rate of return on plan
assets 6.75 % 7.00 % 7.00 % 4.50 % 4.75 % 5.75 %
Composite rate of compensation
increase for determining benefit
obligation 3.00 % 3.00 % 3.00 % 3.00 % 3.00 % 3.00 %
Composite rate of compensation
increase for determining net cost
(benefit) 3.00 % 3.00 % 3.00 % 3.00 % 3.00 % 3.00 %
Weighted-average discount rates shown for years with interim remeasurements: 2021 and 2019 for pension benefits and 2019 for
postretirement benefits.
Weighted-average interest crediting rates for cash balance pension programs relate only to the cash balance portion of total pension benefits. A
0.50% increase in the weighted-average interest crediting rate would increase the pension benefit obligation by $ 125.
We recognize gains and losses on pension and postretirement plan assets and obligations immediately in “Other income (expense) –
net” in our consolidated statements of income. These gains and losses are generally measured annually as of December 31 and
accordingly, will normally be recorded during the fourth quarter, unless an earlier remeasurement is required. Should actual
experience differ from actuarial assumptions, the projected pension benefit obligation and net pension cost and accumulated
postretirement benefit obligation and postretirement benefit cost would be affected in future years.
Discount Rate Our assumed weighted-average discount rate for pension and postretirement benefits of 3.00% and 2.80%
respectively, at December 31, 2021, reflects the hypothetical rate at which the projected benefit obligation could be effectively
settled or paid out to participants. We determined our discount rate based on a range of factors, including a yield curve composed of
the rates of return on several hundred high-quality, fixed income corporate bonds available at the measurement date and
corresponding to the related expected durations of future cash outflows. These bonds had an average rating of at least Aa3 or AA-
by the nationally recognized statistical rating organizations, denominated in U.S. dollars, and neither callable, convertible nor index
linked. For the year ended December 31, 2021, when compared to the year ended December 31, 2020, we increased our pension
discount rate by 0.30%, resulting in a decrease in our pension plan benefit obligation of $1,645 and increased our postretirement
discount rate by 0.40%, resulting in a decrease in our postretirement benefit obligation of $341. For the year ended December 31,
2020, we decreased our pension discount rate by 0.70%, resulting in an increase in our pension plan benefit obligation of $5,594
and decreased our postretirement discount rates by 0.80%, resulting in an increase in our postretirement benefit obligation of
$1,311.
We utilize a full yield curve approach in the estimation of the service and interest components of net periodic benefit costs for
pension and other postretirement benefits. Under this approach, we apply discounting using individual spot rates from a yield curve
composed of the rates of return on several hundred high-quality, fixed income corporate bonds available at the measurement date.
These spot rates align to each of the projected benefit obligations and service cost cash flows. The service cost component relates to
the active participants in the plan, so the relevant cash flows on which to apply the yield curve are considerably longer in duration
on average than the total projected benefit obligation cash flows, which also include benefit payments to retirees. Interest cost is
computed by multiplying each spot rate by the corresponding discounted projected benefit obligation cash flows. The full yield
curve approach reduces any actuarial gains and losses based upon interest rate expectations (e.g., built-in gains in interest cost in an
upward sloping yield curve scenario), or gains and losses merely resulting from the timing and magnitude of cash outflows1
1
2
1
2
associated with our benefit obligations. Neither the annual measurement of our total benefit obligations nor annual net benefit cost
is affected by the full yield curve approach.
108
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Expected Long-Term Rate of Return In 2022, our expected long-term rate of return is 6.75% on pension plan assets and 4.50% on
postretirement plan assets. Our long-term rates of return reflect the average rate of earnings expected on the funds invested, or to be
invested, to provide for the benefits included in the projected benefit obligations. In setting the long-term assumed rate of return,
management considers capital markets’ future expectations, the asset mix of the plans’ investment and average historical asset
return. Actual long-term returns can, in relatively stable markets, also serve as a factor in determining future expectations. We
consider many factors that include, but are not limited to, historical returns on plan assets, current market information on long-term
returns (e.g., long-term bond rates) and current and target asset allocations between asset categories. The target asset allocation is
determined based on consultations with external investment advisers. If all other factors were to remain unchanged, we expect that
a 0.50% decrease in the expected long-term rate of return would cause 2022 combined pension and postretirement cost to increase
$272. However, any differences in the rate and actual returns will be included with the actuarial gain or loss recorded in the fourth
quarter when our plans are remeasured.
Composite Rate of Compensation Increase Our expected composite rate of compensation increase cost of 3.00% in 2021 and 2020
reflects the long-term average rate of salary increases.
Healthcare Cost Trend Our healthcare cost trend assumptions are developed based on historical cost data, the near-term outlook and
an assessment of likely long-term trends. Based on our assessment of expectations of healthcare industry inflation, our 2022
assumed annual healthcare prescription drug cost trend and medical cost trend for eligible participants will increase from an annual
and ultimate trend rate of 4.00% to an annual and ultimate trend rate of 4.25%. This change in assumption increased our obligation
by $31. For 2021, our assumed annual healthcare prescription drug cost trend and medical cost trend for eligible participants
remained at 4.00% annual and ultimate rate.
Plan Assets
Plan assets consist primarily of private and public equity, government and corporate bonds, and real assets (real estate and natural
resources). The asset allocations of the pension plans are maintained to meet ERISA requirements. Any plan contributions, as
determined by ERISA regulations, are made to a pension trust for the benefit of plan participants. We do not have significant
ERISA required contributions to our pension plans for 2022.
We maintain VEBA trusts to partially fund postretirement benefits; however, there are no ERISA or regulatory requirements that
these postretirement benefit plans be funded annually. We made discretionary contributions of $308 in December 2021 and $425 in
December 2020 to our postretirement plan.
The principal investment objectives are to ensure the availability of funds to pay pension and postretirement benefits as they
become due under a broad range of future economic scenarios, maximize long-term investment return with an acceptable level of
risk based on our pension and postretirement obligations, and diversify broadly across and within the capital markets to insulate
asset values against adverse experience in any one market. Each asset class has broadly diversified characteristics. Substantial
biases toward any particular investing style or type of security are sought to be avoided by managing the aggregation of all
accounts with portfolio benchmarks. Asset and benefit obligation forecasting studies are conducted periodically, generally every
two to three years, or when significant changes have occurred in market conditions, benefits, participant demographics or funded
status. Decisions regarding investment policy are made with an understanding of the effect of asset allocation on funded status,
future contributions and projected expenses.
109
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
The plans’ weighted-average asset targets and actual allocations as a percentage of plan assets, including the notional exposure of
future contracts by asset categories at December 31 are as follows:
Pension Assets Postretirement (VEBA) Assets
Target 2021 2020 Target 2021 2020
Equity securities:
Domestic 12  %- 22  % 16  % 19  % 14  %- 24  % 19  % 19  %
International 8  %- 18  % 13 15 14  %- 24  % 19 14 
Fixed income
securities 35  %- 45  % 38 35 34  %- 44  % 39 45 
Real assets 7  %- 17  % 10 8 — %- 6  % 1 1 
Private equity 3  %- 13  % 12 9 — %- 6  % 1 1 
Preferred interests 5 %- 15  % 10 10 — %- — % — — 
Other — %- 5  % 1 % 4 17  %- 27  % 21 20 
Total 100  % 100  % 100  % 100  %
The pension trust holds preferred equity interests valued at $5,562 in AT&T Mobility II LLC (Mobility II), the primary holding
company for our wireless business (see Note 17). During 2020, the trust sold a portion of these preferred interests valued at $2,885
to third party investors. The preferred equity interests were valued at $5,771 as of December 31, 2020.
At December 31, 2021, AT&T securities represented 11% of assets held by our pension trust, including the preferred interests in
Mobility II. The VEBA trusts included in these financial statements no longer hold AT&T securities.
Investment Valuation
Investments are stated at fair value. Fair value is the price that would be received to sell an asset or paid to transfer a liability at the
measurement date.
Investments in securities traded on a national securities exchange are valued at the last reported sales price on the final business day
of the year. If no sale was reported on that date, they are valued at the last reported bid price. Investments in securities not traded on
a national securities exchange are valued using pricing models, quoted prices of securities with similar characteristics or discounted
cash flows. Shares of registered investment companies are valued based on quoted market prices, which represent the net asset
value of shares held at year-end.
Other commingled investment entities are valued at quoted redemption values that represent the net asset values of units held at
year-end which management has determined approximates fair value.
Real estate and natural resource direct investments are valued at amounts based upon appraisal reports. Fixed income securities
valuation is based upon observable prices for comparable assets, broker/dealer quotes (spreads or prices), or a pricing matrix that
derives spreads for each bond based on external market data, including the current credit rating for the bonds, credit spreads to
Treasuries for each credit rating, sector add-ons or credits, issue-specific add-ons or credits as well as call or other options.
The preferred interests in Mobility II are valued by an independent fiduciary using an income approach.
Purchases and sales of securities are recorded as of the trade date. Realized gains and losses on sales of securities are determined on
the basis of average cost. Interest income is recognized on the accrual basis. Dividend income is recognized on the ex-dividend
date.
Non-interest bearing cash and overdrafts are valued at cost, which approximates fair value.
Fair Value Measurements
See Note 13 for a discussion of the fair value hierarchy that prioritizes the inputs to valuation techniques used to measure fair value.
110
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
The following tables set forth by level, within the fair value hierarchy, the pension and postretirement assets and liabilities at fair
value as of December 31, 2021:
Pension Assets and Liabilities at Fair Value as of December 31, 2021
Level 1 Level 2 Level 3Total
Non-interest bearing cash $ 167 $ — $ — $ 167 
Interest bearing cash 11 — — 11 
Foreign currency contracts — 5 — 5 
Equity securities:
Domestic equities 7,693 — 1 7,694 
International equities 4,117 — 7 4,124 
Preferred interests — — 5,562 5,562 
Fixed income securities:
Corporate bonds and other investments — 11,168 2 11,170 
Government and municipal bonds — 6,977 — 6,977 
Mortgage-backed securities — 268 — 268 
Real estate and real assets — — 3,318 3,318 
Securities lending collateral 1,645 1,285 — 2,930 
Receivable for variation margin 8 — — 8 
Assets at fair value 13,641 19,703 8,890 42,234 
Investments sold short and other liabilities at fair value (529) (3) (1) (533)
Total plan net assets at fair value $ 13,112 $ 19,700 $ 8,889 $ 41,701 
Assets held at net asset value practical expedient
Private equity funds 6,454 
Real estate funds 2,329 
Commingled funds 6,780 
Total assets held at net asset value practical expedient 15,563 
Other assets (liabilities) (2,863)
Total Plan Net Assets $ 54,401 
Other assets (liabilities) include amounts receivable, accounts payable and net adjustment for securities lending payable.
Postretirement Assets and Liabilities at Fair Value as of December 31, 2021
Level 1 Level 2 Level 3 Total
Interest bearing cash $ 371 $ 295 $ — $ 666 
Equity securities:
Domestic equities 323 — — 323 
International equities 287 — 1 288 
Fixed income securities:
Corporate bonds and other investments 1 — — 1 
Securities lending collateral — 9 — 9 
Assets at fair value 982 304 1 1,287 
Securities lending payable and other liabilities — (9) — (9)
Total plan net assets at fair value $ 982 $ 295 $ 1 $ 1,278 
Assets held at net asset value practical expedient
Commingled funds 1,883 
Private equity 19 
Real estate funds 16 
Total assets held at net asset value practical expedient 1,918 
Other assets (liabilities) 2 
Total Plan Net Assets $ 3,198 
Other assets (liabilities) include amounts receivable and accounts payable.1
1
1
1
111
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
The tables below set forth a summary of changes in the fair value of the Level 3 pension and postretirement assets for the year
ended December 31, 2021:
Pension Assets EquitiesFixed Income
FundsReal Estate and
Real Assets Total
Balance at beginning of year $ 5,793 $ 53 $ 2,544 $ 8,390 
Realized gains (losses) 2 — (31) (29)
Unrealized gains (losses) (203) — 558 355 
Transfers in — 1 — 1 
Transfers out (7) (8) — (15)
Purchases 7 1 425 433 
Sales (23) (45) (178) (246)
Balance at end of year $ 5,569 $ 2 $ 3,318 $ 8,889 
Postretirement Assets EquitiesFixed Income
FundsReal Estate and
Real Assets Total
Balance at beginning of year $ — $ 4 $ — $ 4 
Realized gains (losses) — (1) — (1)
Unrealized gains (losses) — 1 — 1 
Transfers in 1 — — 1 
Sales — (4) — (4)
Balance at end of year $ 1 $ — $ — $ 1 
112
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
The following tables set forth by level, within the fair value hierarchy, the pension and postretirement assets and liabilities at fair
value as of December 31, 2020:
Pension Assets and Liabilities at Fair Value as of December 31, 2020
Level 1Level 2 Level 3Total
Non-interest bearing cash $ 173 $ — $ — $ 173 
Interest bearing cash 7 — — 7 
Foreign currency contracts — 3 — 3 
Equity securities:
Domestic equities 9,784 — 11 9,795 
International equities 4,821 11 12 4,844 
Preferred interests — — 5,771 5,771 
Fixed income securities:
Corporate bonds and other investments — 11,043 52 11,095 
Government and municipal bonds — 6,039 — 6,039 
Mortgage-backed securities — 442 1 443 
Real estate and real assets — — 2,544 2,544 
Securities lending collateral 621 1,435 — 2,056 
Receivable for variation margin 23 — — 23 
Assets at fair value 15,429 18,973 8,391 42,793 
Investments sold short and other liabilities at fair value (450) (8) (1) (459)
Total plan net assets at fair value $ 14,979 $ 18,965 $ 8,390 $ 42,334 
Assets held at net asset value practical expedient
Private equity funds 5,154 
Real estate funds 1,694 
Commingled funds 7,706 
Total assets held at net asset value practical expedient 14,554 
Other assets (liabilities) (2,282)
Total Plan Net Assets $ 54,606 
Other assets (liabilities) include amounts receivable, accounts payable and net adjustment for securities lending payable.1
1
113
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Postretirement Assets and Liabilities at Fair Value as of December 31, 2020
Level 1 Level 2 Level 3 Total
Interest bearing cash $ 497 $ 302 $ — $ 799 
Equity securities:
Domestic equities 363 — — 363 
International equities 282 — — 282 
Fixed income securities:
Corporate bonds and other investments 5 307 3 315 
Government and municipal bonds 6 132 1 139 
Mortgage-backed securities — 94 — 94 
Securities lending collateral — 28 — 28 
Assets at fair value 1,153 863 4 2,020 
Securities lending payable and other liabilities (1) (29) — (30)
Total plan net assets at fair value $ 1,152 $ 834 $ 4 $ 1,990 
Assets held at net asset value practical expedient
Private equity funds 24 
Real estate funds 22 
Commingled funds 1,843 
Total assets held at net asset value practical expedient 1,889 
Other assets (liabilities) (36)
Total Plan Net Assets $ 3,843 
Other assets (liabilities) include amounts receivable and accounts payable.
The tables below set forth a summary of changes in the fair value of the Level 3 pension and postretirement assets for the year
ended December 31, 2020:
Pension Assets EquitiesFixed Income
FundsReal Estate and
Real Assets Total
Balance at beginning of year $ 8,816 $ 6 $ 2,817 $ 11,639 
Realized gains (losses) (150) — 255 105 
Unrealized gains (losses) 3 — (178) (175)
Transfers in 4 51 36 91 
Transfers out — (3) — (3)
Purchases 9,114 1 223 9,338 
Sales (11,994) (2) (609) (12,605)
Balance at end of year $ 5,793 $ 53 $ 2,544 $ 8,390 
Postretirement Assets EquitiesFixed Income
FundsReal Estate and
Real Assets Total
Balance at beginning of year $ — $ 32 $ — $ 32 
Transfers in — 3 — 3 
Transfers out — (11) — (11)
Sales — (20) — (20)
Balance at end of year $ — $ 4 $ — $ 4 1
1
114
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Estimated Future Benefit Payments
Expected benefit payments are estimated using the same assumptions used in determining our benefit obligation at December 31,
2021. Because benefit payments will depend on future employment and compensation levels; average years employed; average life
spans; and payment elections, among other factors, changes in any of these assumptions could significantly affect these expected
amounts. The following table provides expected benefit payments under our pension and postretirement plans:
Pension
BenefitsPostretirement
Benefits
2022 $ 5,922 $ 1,262 
2023 4,237 1,181 
2024 4,121 888 
2025 4,113 842 
2026 3,934 794 
Years 2027 - 2031 18,292 3,544 
Supplemental Retirement Plans
We also provide certain senior- and middle-management employees with nonqualified, unfunded supplemental retirement and
savings plans. While these plans are unfunded, we have assets in a designated non-bankruptcy remote trust that are independently
managed and used to provide for certain of these benefits. These plans include supplemental pension benefits as well as
compensation-deferral plans, some of which include a corresponding match by us based on a percentage of the compensation
deferral. For our supplemental retirement plans, the projected benefit obligation was $2,326 and the net supplemental retirement
pension credit was $41 at and for the year ended December 31, 2021. The projected benefit obligation was $2,687 and the net
supplemental retirement pension cost was $330 at and for the year ended December 31, 2020.
We use the same significant assumptions for the composite rate of compensation increase in determining our projected benefit
obligation and the net pension and postemployment benefit cost. Our discount rates of 2.70% at December 31, 2021 and 2.30% at
December 31, 2020 were calculated using the same methodologies used in calculating the discount rate for our qualified pension
and postretirement benefit plans.
Deferred compensation expense was $171 in 2021, $183 in 2020 and $199 in 2019.
Contributory Savings Plans
We maintain contributory savings plans that cover substantially all employees. Under the savings plans, we match in cash or
company stock a stated percentage of eligible employee contributions, subject to a specified ceiling. There are no debt-financed
shares held by the Employee Stock Ownership Plans, allocated or unallocated.
Our match of employee contributions to the savings plans is fulfilled with purchases of our stock on the open market or company
cash. Benefit cost, which is based on the cost of shares or units allocated to participating employees’ accounts or the cash
contributed to participant accounts, was $760, $814 and $793 for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019.
NOTE 16. SHARE-BASED PAYMENTS
Under our various plans, senior and other management employees and nonemployee directors have received nonvested stock and
stock units. In conjunction with the 2018 acquisition of Time Warner, restricted stock units issued under Time Warner plans were
converted to AT&T share units that will be distributed in the form of AT&T common stock and cash. The shares will vest over a
period of one to four years in accordance with the terms of those plans. In addition, outstanding Time Warner stock options were
converted to AT&T stock options that vested within one year. We do not intend to issue any additional grants under the Time
Warner Inc. plans. Future grants to eligible employees will be issued under AT&T plans.
115
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
We grant performance stock units, which are nonvested stock units, based upon our stock price at the date of grant and award them
in the form of AT&T common stock and cash at the end of a three-year period, subject to the achievement of certain performance
goals. We treat the cash settled portion of these awards as a liability. We grant forfeitable restricted stock and stock units, which are
valued at the market price of our common stock at the date of grant and predominantly vest over a three- to five-year period. We
also grant other nonvested stock units and award them in cash at the end of a three-year period, subject to the achievement of
certain market-based conditions. As of December 31, 2021, we were authorized to issue up to approximately 139 million shares of
common stock (in addition to shares that may be issued upon exercise of outstanding options or upon vesting of performance stock
units or other nonvested stock units) to officers, employees and directors pursuant to these various plans.
We account for our share-based payment arrangements based on the fair value of the awards on their respective grant date, which
may affect our ability to fully realize the value shown on our consolidated balance sheets of deferred tax assets associated with
compensation expense. We record a valuation allowance when our future taxable income is not expected to be sufficient to recover
the asset. Accordingly, there can be no assurance that the current stock price of our common shares will rise to levels sufficient to
realize the entire tax benefit currently reflected on our consolidated balance sheets. However, to the extent we generate excess tax
benefits (i.e., those additional tax benefits in excess of the deferred taxes associated with compensation expense previously
recognized) the potential future impact on income would be reduced.
Our consolidated statements of income include the compensation cost recognized for those plans as operating expenses, as well as
the associated tax benefits, which are reflected in the table below:
2021 2020 2019
Performance stock units $ 245 $ 348 $ 544 
Restricted stock and stock units 385 290 273 
Other nonvested stock units 7 — 7 
Stock options — — (5)
Total $ 637 $ 638 $ 819 
Income tax benefit $ 157 $ 157 $ 202 
A summary of the status of our nonvested stock units as of December 31, 2021, and changes during the year then ended is
presented as follows (shares in millions):
Nonvested Stock Units SharesWeighted-
Average Grant-
Date Fair Value
Nonvested at January 1, 2021 43 $ 34.50 
Granted 36 28.79 
Vested (26) 31.56 
Forfeited (4) 31.52 
Nonvested at December 31, 2021 49 $ 32.06 
As of December 31, 2021, there was $916 of total unrecognized compensation cost related to nonvested share-based payment
arrangements granted. That cost is expected to be recognized over a weighted-average period of 1.95 years. The total fair value of
shares vested during the year was $811 for 2021, compared to $647 for 2020 and $798 for 2019.
It is our intent to satisfy share option exercises using our treasury stock. Cash received from stock option exercises was $60 for
2021, $65 for 2020 and $446 for 2019.
116
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
NOTE 17. STOCKHOLDERS’ EQUITY
Authorized Shares We have authorized 14 billion common shares of AT&T stock and 10 million preferred shares of AT&T stock,
each with a par value of $1.00 per share. Cumulative perpetual preferred shares consist of the following:
•Series A: 48 thousand shares outstanding at December 31, 2021 and December 31, 2020, with a $25,000 per share liquidation
preference and a dividend rate of 5.000%.
•Series B: 20 thousand shares outstanding at December 31, 2021 and December 31, 2020, with a €100,000 per share liquidation
preference, and an initial rate of 2.875%, subject to reset after May 1, 2025.
•Series C: 70 thousand shares outstanding at December 31, 2021 and December 31, 2020, with a $25,000 per share liquidation
preference, and a dividend rate of 4.75%.
So long as the quarterly preferred dividends are declared and paid on a timely basis on each series of preferred shares, there are no
limitations on our ability to declare a dividend on or repurchase AT&T common shares. The preferred shares are optionally
redeemable by AT&T at the liquidation price on or after five years from the issuance date, or upon certain other contingent events.
Stock Repurchase Program From time to time, we repurchase shares of common stock for distribution through our employee
benefit plans or in connection with certain acquisitions. Our Board of Directors has approved the following authorization to
repurchase common stock: (1) March 2013 authorization program of 300 million shares, which was completed in 2020 and (2)
March 2014 authorization program for 300 million shares, with approximately 178 million outstanding at December 31, 2021.
To implement these authorizations, we used open market repurchases, relying on Rule 10b5-1 of the Securities Exchange Act of
1934, where feasible. We also used accelerated share repurchase agreements with large financial institutions to repurchase our
stock. During 2020, we repurchased approximately 142 million shares totaling $5,278 under the March 2013 and March 2014
authorizations. During 2021, there were no shares repurchased under the March 2014 authorization.
Dividend Declarations In December 2021 and December 2020, AT&T declared a quarterly preferred dividend of $36 and a
quarterly common dividend of $0.52 per share of common stock.
Preferred Interests Issued by Subsidiaries We have issued cumulative perpetual preferred membership interests in certain
subsidiaries. The preferred interests are entitled to cash distributions, subject to declaration. The preferred interests are included in
“Noncontrolling interest” on the consolidated balance sheets.
Mobility II
We previously issued 320 million Series A Cumulative Perpetual Preferred Membership Interests in Mobility II (Mobility preferred
interests), representing all currently outstanding Mobility preferred equity interests, which pay cash distributions of $560 per
annum, subject to declaration. So long as the distributions are declared and paid, the terms of the Mobility preferred equity interests
will not impose any limitations on cash movements between affiliates, or our ability to declare a dividend on or repurchase AT&T
shares.
A holder of the Mobility preferred interests may put the interests to Mobility II. Mobility II may redeem the interests upon a change
in control of Mobility II or on or after September 9, 2022. When either option arises due to a passage of time, that option may be
exercised only during certain periods.
The price at which a put option or a redemption option can be exercised is the greater of (1) the market value of the interests as of
the last date of the quarter preceding the date of the exercise of a put or redemption option and (2) the sum of (a) twenty-five
dollars ($8,000 in the aggregate) plus (b) any accrued and unpaid distributions. The redemption price may be paid with cash, AT&T
common stock, or a combination of cash and AT&T common stock, at Mobility II’s sole election. In no event shall Mobility II be
required to deliver more than 250 million shares of AT&T common stock to settle put and redemption options. We have the intent
and ability to settle the Mobility preferred equity interests with cash.
Tower Holdings
In 2019, we issued $6,000 nonconvertible cumulative preferred interests in a wireless subsidiary (Tower Holdings) that holds
interests in various tower assets and have the right to receive approximately $6,000 if the purchase options from the tower
companies are exercised.
117
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
The membership interests in Tower Holdings consist of (1) common interests, which are held by a consolidated subsidiary of
AT&T, and (2) two series of preferred interests (collectively the “Tower preferred interests”). The September series (Class A-1) of
the preferred interests totals $1,500 and pays an initial preferred distribution of 5.0%, and the December series (Class A-2) totals
$4,500 and pays an initial preferred distribution of 4.75%. Distributions are paid quarterly, subject to declaration, and reset every
five years. Any failure to declare or pay distributions on the Tower preferred interests would not impose any limitation on cash
movements between affiliates, or our ability to declare a dividend on or repurchase AT&T shares. We can call the Tower preferred
interests at the issue price beginning five years from the issuance date or upon the receipt of proceeds from the sale of the
underlying assets.
The holders of the Tower preferred interests have the option to require redemption upon the occurrence of certain contingent
events, such as the failure of AT&T to pay the preferred distribution for two or more periods or to meet certain other requirements,
including a minimum credit rating. If notice is given upon such an event, all other holders of equal or more subordinate classes of
membership interests in Tower Holdings are entitled to receive the same form of consideration payable to the holders of the
preferred interests, resulting in a deemed liquidation for accounting purposes.
Telco LLC
In September 2020, we issued $2,000 nonconvertible cumulative preferred interests out of a newly created limited liability
company (Telco LLC) that was formed to hold telecommunication-related assets.
Members’ equity in Telco LLC consist of (1) member’s interests, which are held by a consolidated subsidiary of AT&T, and (2)
preferred interests (Telco preferred interests), which pay an initial preferred distribution of 4.25% annually, subject to declaration,
and subject to reset every seven years. Failure to pay distributions on the Telco preferred interests would not limit cash movements
between affiliates, or our ability to declare a dividend on or repurchase AT&T shares. We can call the Telco preferred interests at the
issue price beginning seven years from the issuance date.
The holders of the Telco preferred interests have the option to require redemption upon the occurrence of certain contingent events,
such as the failure of Telco LLC to pay the preferred distribution for two or more periods or to meet certain other requirements,
including a minimum credit rating. If notice is given, all other holders of equal or more subordinate classes of members’ equity are
entitled to receive the same form of consideration payable to the holders of the preferred interests, resulting in a deemed liquidation
for accounting purposes.
PR Holdings
In 2019, we issued $1,950 nonconvertible cumulative preferred interests in a subsidiary (PR Holdings) that held notes secured by
the proceeds from our agreement to sell wireless and wireline operations in Puerto Rico and the U.S. Virgin Islands. These
preferred interests were redeemed on November 6, 2020. (See Note 6)
The membership interests in PR Holdings consisted of (1) common interests, which were held by consolidated subsidiaries of
AT&T, and (2) preferred interests (PR preferred interests). The PR preferred interests paid an initial preferred distribution at an
annual rate of 4.75%. Distributions were paid quarterly, subject to declaration.
NOTE 18. SALES OF RECEIVABLES
We have agreements with various third-party financial institutions pertaining to the sales of certain types of our accounts
receivable. The most significant of these programs are discussed in detail below and generally consist of (1) receivables arising
from equipment installment plans, which are sold for cash and a deferred purchase price, and (2) revolving service and trade
receivables. Under these programs, we transfer receivables to purchasers in exchange for cash and additional consideration upon
settlement of the receivables, where applicable. Under the terms of our agreements for these programs, we continue to bill and
collect the payments from our customers on behalf of the financial institutions.
The sales of receivables did not have a material impact on our consolidated statements of income or to “Total Assets” reported on
our consolidated balance sheets. We reflect cash receipts on sold receivables as cash flows from operations in our consolidated
statements of cash flows. Cash receipts on the deferred purchase price are classified as cash flows from investing activities.
118
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Our equipment installment and revolving receivables programs are discussed in detail below. The following table sets forth a
summary of the receivables and accounts being serviced at December 31:
2021 2020
Equipment
Installment RevolvingEquipment
Installment Revolving
Gross receivables: $ 4,361 $ 3,527 $ 5,565 $ 3,909 
Balance sheet classification
Accounts receivable
Notes receivable 1,846 — 2,716 — 
Trade receivables 606 3,337 554 3,715 
Other Assets
Noncurrent notes and trade receivables 1,909 190 2,295 194 
Outstanding portfolio of receivables derecognized from
our consolidated balance sheets 9,767 6,280 7,827 5,300 
Cash proceeds received, net of remittances 6,644 6,280 5,646 5,300 
Represents amounts to which financial institutions remain entitled, excluding the deferred purchase price.
Equipment Installment Receivables Program
We offer our customers the option to purchase certain wireless devices in installments over a specified period of time and, in many
cases, once certain conditions are met, they may be eligible to trade in the original equipment for a new device and have the
remaining unpaid balance paid or settled.
We maintain a program under which we transfer a portion of these receivables through our bankruptcy-remote subsidiary in
exchange for cash and additional consideration upon settlement of the receivables, referred to as the deferred purchase price. In the
event a customer trades in a device prior to the end of the installment contract period, we agree to make a payment to the financial
institutions equal to any outstanding remaining installment receivable balance. Accordingly, we record a guarantee obligation for
this estimated amount at the time the receivables are transferred.
The following table sets forth a summary of equipment installment receivables sold under this program:
2021 2020 2019
Gross receivables sold $ 10,793 $ 7,270 $ 9,921 
Net receivables sold 10,502 7,026 9,483 
Cash proceeds received 9,740 6,089 8,189 
Deferred purchase price recorded 1,080 1,021 1,451 
Guarantee obligation recorded 434 157 341 
Receivables net of allowance, imputed interest and equipment trade-in right guarantees.
The deferred purchase price and guarantee obligation are initially recorded at estimated fair value and subsequently adjusted for
changes in present value of expected cash flows. The estimation of their fair values is based on remaining installment payments
expected to be collected and the expected timing and value of device trade-ins. The estimated value of the device trade-ins
considers prices offered to us by independent third parties and contemplate changes in value after the launch of a device model. The
fair value measurements used for the deferred purchase price and the guarantee obligation are considered Level 3 under the Fair
Value Measurement and Disclosure framework (see Note 13).1
1
1
1
119
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
The following table presents the previously transferred equipment installment receivables, which we repurchased in exchange for
the associated deferred purchase price:
2021 2020 2019
Fair value of repurchased receivables $ 1,424 $ 1,271 $ 1,418 
Carrying value of deferred purchase price 1,334 1,235 1,350 
Gain on repurchases $ 90 $ 36 $ 68 
These gains are included in “Selling, general and administrative” in the consolidated statements of income.
At December 31, 2021 and December 31, 2020, our deferred purchase price receivable was $3,177 and $1,991, respectively, of
which $2,123 and $1,476 are included in “Prepaid and other current assets” on our consolidated balance sheets, with the remainder
in “Other Assets.” The guarantee obligation at December 31, 2021 and December 31, 2020 was $371 and $228, respectively, of
which $101 and $161 are included in “Accounts payable and accrued liabilities” on our consolidated balance sheets, with the
remainder in “Other noncurrent liabilities.” Our maximum exposure to loss as a result of selling these equipment installment
receivables is limited to the total amount of our deferred purchase price and guarantee obligation.
Revolving Receivables Program
We have a revolving agreement to transfer up to $6,680 of certain receivables (primarily from WarnerMedia) through our
bankruptcy-remote subsidiaries to various financial institutions on a recurring basis in exchange for cash equal to the gross
receivables transferred. This agreement is subject to renewal on an annual basis and the transfer limit may be expanded or reduced
from time to time. As customers pay their balances, we transfer additional receivables into the program, resulting in our gross
receivables sold exceeding net cash flow impacts (e.g., collect and reinvest). The transferred receivables are fully guaranteed by our
bankruptcy-remote subsidiaries, which hold additional receivables in the amount of $3,527 that are pledged as collateral under this
agreement. The transfers are recorded at fair value of the proceeds received and obligations assumed less derecognized receivables.
The obligation is subsequently adjusted for changes in estimated expected credit losses and interest rates. Our maximum exposure
to loss related to these receivables transferred is limited to the amount outstanding.
The fair value measurement used for the obligation is considered Level 3 under the Fair Value Measurement and Disclosure
framework (see Note 13).
The following table sets forth a summary of receivables sold:
2021 2020 2019
Gross receivables sold/cash proceeds received $ 20,060 $ 15,888 $ 11,989 
Total collections under revolving agreement 18,910 14,888 7,689 
Receivables repurchased 170 — — 
Net cash proceeds received $ 980 $ 1,000 $ 4,300 
Net receivables sold $ 19,775 $ 15,760 $ 11,604 
Obligations recorded 18 271 530 
Includes initial sale of receivables of $ 1,380 , $1,000  and $ 4,300  for 2021, 2020 and 2019, respectively .
Includes collections of $ 400, $0 and $ 0 for 2021, 2020 and 2019, respectively , that were not reinvested under the revolving agreement.
Receivables net of allowance, return and incentive reserves and imputed interest.
NOTE 19. TOWER TRANSACTION
In December 2013, we closed our transaction with Crown Castle International Corp. (Crown Castle) in which Crown Castle gained
the exclusive rights to lease and operate 9,048 wireless towers and purchased 627 of our wireless towers for $4,827 in cash. The
leases have various terms with an average length of approximately 28 years. As the leases expire, Crown Castle will have fixed
price purchase options for these towers totaling approximately $4,200, based on their estimated fair market values at the end of the
lease terms. We sublease space on the towers from Crown Castle for an initial term of ten years at current market rates, subject to
optional renewals in the future.1
1
1
2
3
1
2
3
120
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
We determined that we did not transfer control of the tower assets, which prevented us from achieving sale-leaseback accounting
for the transaction, and we accounted for the cash proceeds from Crown Castle as a financing obligation on our consolidated
balance sheets. We record interest on the financing obligation using the effective interest method at a rate of approximately 3.9%.
The financing obligation is increased by interest expense and estimated future net cash flows generated and retained by Crown
Castle from operation of the tower sites, and reduced by our contractual payments. We continue to include the tower assets in
“Property, Plant and Equipment – Net” on our consolidated balance sheets and depreciate them accordingly. At December 31, 2021
and 2020, the tower assets had a balance of $725 and $764, respectively. Our depreciation expense for these assets was $39 for
each of 2021, 2020 and 2019.
Payments made to Crown Castle under this arrangement were $253 for 2021. At December 31, 2021, the future minimum payments
under the sublease arrangement are $258 for 2022, $264 for 2023, $269 for 2024, $274 for 2025, $280 for 2026 and $707
thereafter.
NOTE 20. TRANSACTIONS WITH DIRECTV
On July 31, 2021, we closed our transaction with TPG to form a new company named DIRECTV (see Note 6). The transaction
resulted in our deconsolidation of the Video business. Effective August 1, 2021, we began accounting for our investment in
DIRECTV under the equity method and recorded our share of DIRECTV earnings as equity in net income of affiliates, with
DIRECTV considered a related party (see Note 10).
For the five months ended December 31, 2021, our share of DIRECTV’s earnings included in equity in net income of affiliates was
$619. Cash distributions from DIRECTV totaled $1,942, with $619 classified as operating activities and $1,323 classified as
investing activities in our consolidated statement of cash flows.
In addition to the assets and liabilities contributed to DIRECTV, we recorded total obligations of approximately $2,100 to cover
certain net losses under the NFL SUNDAY TICKET contract, of which $1,800 is in the form of a note payable to DIRECTV (see
Note 6). Cash payments to DIRECTV on the note totaled $459 and were classified as financing activities in our consolidated
statement of cash flows. Amounts due under the DIRECTV note were $1,341 at December 31, 2021.
Through our WarnerMedia properties, we license content and programming and provide advertising services to DIRECTV.
Revenue recognized from DIRECTV, which was previously eliminated, totaled approximately $670 for the five months ended
December 31, 2021. We also provide DIRECTV with network transport for U-verse products and sales services under commercial
arrangements for up to five years.
Pursuant to a commercial agreement, WarnerMedia continues to sell DIRECTV’s advertising inventory under a revenue sharing
agreement. WarnerMedia records amounts billed as advertising revenue and recognizes expense for DIRECTV’s revenue share,
which was approximately $600 for the five months ended December 31, 2021. Under separate transition services agreements, we
provide DIRECTV certain operational support, including servicing of certain of their customer receivables for up to three years.
For the five months ended December 31, 2021, we billed DIRECTV approximately $550 for these costs, which were primarily
recorded as a reduction to the operations and support expenses incurred and resulted in net retained costs to AT&T of
approximately $200.
At December 31, 2021, we had accounts receivable from DIRECTV of $436 and accounts payable to DIRECTV of $329.
We are not committed, implicitly or explicitly, to provide financial or other support, other than noted above, as our involvement
with DIRECTV is limited to the carrying amount of the assets and liabilities recognized on our balance sheet.
121
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
NOTE 21. FIRSTNET
In 2017, the First Responder Network Authority (FirstNet) selected AT&T to build and manage the first nationwide broadband
network dedicated to America’s first responders. Under the 25-year agreement, FirstNet provides 20 MHz of valuable
telecommunications spectrum and success-based payments of $6,500 over the first five years to support network buildout. We are
required to construct a network that achieves coverage and nationwide interoperability requirements and have a contractual
commitment to make sustainability payments of $18,000 over the 25-year contract. These sustainability payments represent our
commitment to fund FirstNet’s operating expenses and future reinvestments in the network which we own and operate, which we
estimate in the $3,000 or less range over the life of the 25-year contract. After FirstNet’s operating expenses are paid, we anticipate
the remaining amount, expected to be in the $15,000 range, will be reinvested into the network.
During 2021, we submitted $120 in sustainability payments, with future payments under the agreement of $195 for 2022, 2023,
2024 and 2025; $1,590 for 2026; and $15,030 thereafter. Amounts paid to FirstNet, which are not expected to be returned to AT&T
to be reinvested into our network, will be expensed in the period paid. In the event FirstNet does not reinvest any funds to
construct, operate, improve and maintain this network, our maximum exposure to loss is the total amount of the sustainability
payments, which would be reflected in higher expense.
The $6,500 of initial funding from FirstNet is contingent on the achievement of six operating capability milestones and certain first
responder subscriber adoption targets. These milestones are based on coverage objectives of the first responder network during the
construction period, which is expected to be over five years, and subscriber adoption targets. Funding payments received from
FirstNet are reflected as a reduction from the costs capitalized in the construction of the network and, as appropriate, a reduction of
associated operating expenses. As of December 31, 2021, we have collected approximately $5,860 for the completion of certain
tasks and anticipate collecting the remainder of the $6,500 as we achieve milestones set out by FirstNet in 2022. We also received
approximately $170 in 2021 from FirstNet for reinvestment above the original success-based payments.
NOTE 22. CONTINGENT LIABILITIES
We are party to numerous lawsuits, regulatory proceedings and other matters arising in the ordinary course of business. In
evaluating these matters on an ongoing basis, we take into account amounts already accrued on the balance sheet. In our opinion,
although the outcomes of these proceedings are uncertain, they should not have a material adverse effect on our financial position,
results of operations or cash flows.
We have contractual obligations to purchase certain goods or services from various other parties. Our purchase obligations are
expected to be approximately $28,860 in 2022, $24,585 in total for 2023 and 2024, $11,636 in total for 2025 and 2026 and $12,540
in total for years thereafter.
See Note 13 for a discussion of collateral and credit-risk contingencies.
NOTE 23. ADDITIONAL FINANCIAL INFORMATION
December 31,
Consolidated Balance Sheets 2021 2020
Accounts payable and accrued liabilities:
Accounts payable $ 30,756 $ 31,836 
Accrued payroll and commissions 3,449 2,988 
Current portion of employee benefit obligation 1,278 1,415 
Accrued participations and residuals 2,966 2,708 
Accrued interest 2,463 2,454 
Accrued taxes 1,402 1,019 
Other 8,347 7,631 
Total accounts payable and accrued liabilities $ 50,661 $ 50,051 
122
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Consolidated Statements of Income 2021 2020 2019
Advertising expense $ 6,316 $ 5,253 $ 6,121 
Interest expense incurred $ 7,838 $ 8,048 $ 8,622 
Capitalized interest – capital expenditures (173) (123) (200)
Capitalized interest – spectrum (781) — — 
Total interest expense $ 6,884 $ 7,925 $ 8,422 
Included in “Acquisitions, net of cash acquired” on our consolidated statement of cash flows.
Cash and Cash Flows We typically maintain our restricted cash balances for purchases and sales of certain investment securities
and funding of certain deferred compensation benefit payments.
The following table summarizes cash and cash equivalents and restricted cash balances on our consolidated balance sheets:
December 31,
Cash and Cash Equivalents and Restricted Cash 2021 2020 2019 2018
Cash and cash equivalents $ 21,169 $ 9,740 $ 12,130 $ 5,204 
Restricted cash in Other current assets 3 9 69 61 
Restricted cash in Other Assets 144 121 96 135 
Cash and cash equivalents and restricted cash $ 21,316 $ 9,870 $ 12,295 $ 5,400 
The following table summarizes cash paid during the periods for interest income taxes and spectrum:
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows 2021 2020 2019
Cash paid (received) during the year for:
Interest $ 7,673 $ 8,237 $ 8,693 
Income taxes, net of refunds 700 993 1,421 
Spectrum acquisitions 24,672 1,613 1,576 
Included as cash paid for “Acquisitions, net of cash acquired” on our consolidated statement of cash flows. Excludes interest during
construction.
Noncash Investing and Financing Activities In connection with capital improvements and the acquisition of other productive
assets, we negotiate favorable payment terms (referred to as vendor financing), which are reported as financing activities in our
statements of cash flows when paid. We recorded $5,282 of vendor financing commitments related to capital investments in 2021,
$4,664 in 2020 and $2,632 in 2019.
Total vendor financing payables included in our December 31, 2021 consolidated balance sheet were approximately $5,000, with
$3,950 due within one year (in “Accounts payable and accrued liabilities”) and the remainder predominantly due within five years
(in “Other noncurrent liabilities”).
Labor Contracts As of January 31, 2022, we employed approximately 203,000 persons. Approximately 37% of our employees are
represented by the Communications Workers of America (CWA), the International Brotherhood of Electrical Workers (IBEW) or
other unions. After expiration of the agreements, work stoppages or labor disruptions may occur in the absence of new contracts or
other agreements being reached. The main contracts included the following:
•A contract covering approximately 12,000 Mobility employees in 36 states and the District of Columbia is set to expire in
February 2022.
•A contract covering approximately 6,000 wireline employees in five Midwest states that was set to expire in April 2022 was
extended for a four-year period until April 2026.
•A contract covering approximately 3,000 MW IBEW employees is set to expire in June 2022.
•A contract covering approximately 2,000 AT&T Corp. employees nationwide that was set to expire in April 2022 was extended
for a four-year period until April 2026.
•A contract covering approximately 170 Teamsters Alascom employees in Alaska is set to expire in February 2022.1
1
1
1
123
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
ITEM 9. CHANGES IN AND DISAGREEMENTS WITH ACCOUNTANTS ON ACCOUNTING AND FINANCIAL
DISCLOSURE
During our two most recent fiscal years, there has been no change in the independent accountant engaged as the principal
accountant to audit our financial statements, and the independent accountant has not expressed reliance on other independent
accountants in its reports during such time period.
ITEM 9A. CONTROLS AND PROCEDURES
Disclosure Controls and Procedures
The registrant maintains disclosure controls and procedures that are designed to ensure that information required to be disclosed by
the registrant is recorded, processed, summarized, accumulated and communicated to its management, including its principal
executive and principal financial officers, to allow timely decisions regarding required disclosure, and reported within the time
periods specified in the SEC’s rules and forms. The Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer have performed an
evaluation of the effectiveness of the design and operation of the registrant’s disclosure controls and procedures as of December 31,
2021. Based on that evaluation, the Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer concluded that the registrant’s disclosure
controls and procedures were effective as of December 31, 2021.
There have not been any changes in our internal control over financial reporting during our most recent fiscal quarter that have
materially affected, or are reasonably likely to materially affect, our internal control over financial reporting.
Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
a.Management’s Annual Report on Internal Control over Financial Reporting
The management of AT&T is responsible for establishing and maintaining adequate internal control over financial reporting.
AT&T’s internal control system was designed to provide reasonable assurance as to the integrity and reliability of the published
financial statements. AT&T management assessed the effectiveness of the company’s internal control over financial reporting as of
December 31, 2021. In making this assessment, it used the criteria set forth by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the
Treadway Commission (COSO) in Internal Control – Integrated Framework (2013 framework). Based on its assessment, AT&T
management believes that, as of December 31, 2021, the Company’s internal control over financial reporting is effective based on
those criteria.
b.Attestation Report of the Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
The independent registered public accounting firm that audited the financial statements included in the Annual Report containing
the disclosure required by this Item, Ernst & Young LLP, has issued an attestation report on the Company’s internal control over
financial reporting.
ITEM 9B. OTHER INFORMATION
There is no information that was required to be disclosed in a report on Form 8-K during the fourth quarter of 2021 but was not
reported.
124
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
PART III
ITEM 10. DIRECTORS, EXECUTIVE OFFICERS AND CORPORATE GOVERNANCE
Information regarding executive officers required by Item 401 of Regulation S-K is furnished in a separate disclosure at the end of
Part I of this report entitled “Information about our Executive Officers.” Information regarding directors required by Item 401 of
Regulation S-K is incorporated herein by reference pursuant to General Instruction G(3) from the registrant’s 2022 definitive proxy
statement (Proxy Statement) under the heading “Management Proposal Item No. 1. Election of Directors.”
Information required by Item 405 of Regulation S-K is incorporated herein by reference pursuant to General Instruction G(3) from
the registrant’s Proxy Statement under the heading “Delinquent Section 16(a) Reports.”
The registrant has a separately-designated standing audit committee established in accordance with Section 3(a)(58)(A) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934. The members of the committee are Messrs. Di Piazza, Jr., Luczo and McCallister, and Ms. Taylor.
The additional information required by Item 407(d)(5) of Regulation S-K is incorporated herein by reference pursuant to General
Instruction G(3) from the registrant’s Proxy Statement under the heading “Audit Committee.”
The registrant has adopted a code of ethics entitled “Code of Ethics” that applies to the registrant’s principal executive officer,
principal financial officer, principal accounting officer, or controller or persons performing similar functions. The additional
information required by Item 406 of Regulation S-K is provided in this report under the heading “General” under Part I, Item 1.
Business.
ITEM 11. EXECUTIVE COMPENSATION
Information required by this Item is incorporated herein by reference pursuant to General Instruction G(3) from the registrant’s
Proxy Statement under the headings “Director Compensation,” “CEO Pay Ratio,” and the pages beginning with the heading
“Compensation Discussion and Analysis” and ending with, and including, the pages under the heading “Potential Payments upon
Change in Control.”
Information required by Item 407(e)(5) of Regulation S-K is included in the registrant’s Proxy Statement under the heading
“Compensation Committee Report” and is incorporated herein by reference pursuant to General Instruction G(3) and shall be
deemed furnished in this Annual Report on Form 10-K and will not be deemed incorporated by reference into any filing under the
Securities Act of 1933 or the Securities Exchange Act of 1934.
125
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
ITEM 12. SECURITY OWNERSHIP OF CERTAIN BENEFICIAL OWNERS AND MANAGEMENT AND RELATED
STOCKHOLDER MATTERS
Information required by Item 403 of Regulation S-K is included in the registrant’s Proxy Statement under the heading “Common
Stock Ownership,” which is incorporated herein by reference pursuant to General Instruction G(3).
Equity Compensation Plan Information
The following table provides information as of December 31, 2021, concerning shares of AT&T common stock authorized for
issuance under AT&T’s existing equity compensation plans.
Equity Compensation Plan Information
Plan CategoryNumber of securities to be
issued upon
exercise of
outstanding options,
warrants and rights
(a)Weighted average
exercise price of
outstanding
options, warrants
and rights
(b)Number of securities
 remaining available for
future issuance under
equity compensation plans
(excluding securities
reflected in column (a))
(c)
Equity compensation plans approved by
security holders 78,313,573 $ 29.87 115,401,058 
Equity compensation plans not approved
by security holders — — — 
Total 78,313,573 $ 29.87 115,401,058 
Includes the issuance of stock in connection with the following stockholder approved plans: (a) 349 stock options under the
Stock Purchase and Deferral Plan (SPDP), (b) 97,731 phantom stock units under the Stock Savings Plan (SSP), 14,455,686
phantom stock units under the SPDP, 0 restricted stock units under the 2011 Incentive Plan, 806,254 restricted stock units
under the 2016 Incentive Plan and 32,316,464 restricted stock units under the 2018 Incentive Plan, (c) 0 target number of
stock-settled performance shares under the 2011 Incentive Plan, 0 target number of stock-settled performance shares under the
2016 Incentive Plan, and 27,341,555 target number of stock-settled performance shares under the 2018 Incentive Plan. At
payout, the target number of performance shares may be reduced to zero or increased by up to 150%. Each phantom stock unit
and performance share is settleable in stock on a 1-to-1 basis. The weighted-average exercise price in the table does not include
outstanding performance shares or phantom stock units.
The SSP was approved by stockholders in 1994 and then was amended by the Board of Directors in 2000 to increase the
number of shares available for purchase under the plan (including shares from the Company match and reinvested dividend
equivalents). Stockholder approval was not required for the amendment. To the extent applicable, the amount shown for
approved plans in column (a), in addition to the above amounts, includes 3,295,534 phantom stock units (computed on a first-
in-first-out basis) that were approved by the Board in 2000. Under the SSP, shares could be purchased with payroll deductions
and reinvested dividend equivalents by mid-level and above managers and limited Company partial matching contributions.
No new contributions may be made to the plan.
Includes 25,799,904 shares that may be issued under the SPDP, 87,034,186 shares that may be issued under the 2018 Incentive
Plan, and up to 2,566,969 shares that may be purchased through reinvestment of dividends on phantom shares held in the SSP.
Does not include certain stock options issued by companies acquired by AT&T that were converted into options to acquire
AT&T stock. As of December 31, 2021, there were 2,861,614 shares of AT&T common stock subject to the converted options,
having a weighted-average exercise price of $21.63. Also, does not include 355,008 outstanding phantom stock units that were
issued by companies acquired by AT&T that are convertible into stock on a 1-to-1 basis, along with an estimated 111,755
shares that may be purchased with reinvested dividend equivalents paid on the outstanding phantom stock units. No further
phantom stock units, other than reinvested dividends, may be issued under the assumed plans. The weighted-average exercise
price in the table does not include outstanding performance shares or phantom stock units.(1) (2)
(3) (2)
(1)
(2)
(3)
126
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
ITEM 13. CERTAIN RELATIONSHIPS AND RELATED TRANSACTIONS, AND DIRECTOR INDEPENDENCE
Information required by Item 404 of Regulation S-K is included in the registrant’s Proxy Statement under the heading “Related
Person Transactions,” which is incorporated herein by reference pursuant to General Instruction G(3). Information required by Item
407(a) of Regulation S-K is included in the registrant’s Proxy Statement under the heading “Director Independence,” which is
incorporated herein by reference pursuant to General Instruction G(3).
ITEM 14. PRINCIPAL ACCOUNTANT FEES AND SERVICES
Information required by this Item is included in the registrant’s Proxy Statement under the heading “Principal Accountant Fees and
Services,” which is incorporated herein by reference pursuant to General Instruction G(3).
Part IV
ITEM 15. EXHIBITS and FINANCIAL STATEMENT SCHEDULES
(a)Documents filed as a part of the report:
Page
(1) Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm (PCAOB ID: 42) 55
Financial Statements covered by Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm:
Consolidated Statements of Income 59
Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income 60
Consolidated Balance Sheets 61
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows 62
Consolidated Statements of Changes in Stockholders’ Equity 63
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements 65
(2) Financial Statement Schedules:
II - Valuation and Qualifying Accounts 131
Financial statement schedules other than those listed above have been omitted because the required information is contained in the
financial statements and notes thereto, or because such schedules are not required or applicable.
(3) Exhibits:
Exhibits identified in parentheses below, on file with the SEC, are incorporated herein by reference as exhibits hereto. Unless
otherwise indicated, all exhibits so incorporated are from File No. 1-8610.
Exhibit
Number
2-aAgreement and Plan of Merger, dated as of May 17, 2021, by and among AT&T
Inc., Magallanes, Inc., and Discovery, Inc. (Exhibit 2.1 to Form 8-K filed on May
20, 2021)*
2-b Separation and Distribution Agreement, dated as of May 17, 2021, by and among
AT&T Inc., Magallanes, Inc., and Discovery, Inc. (Exhibit 2.2 to Form 8-K filed on
May 20, 2021)*
3-aRestated Certificate of Incorporation, filed with the Secretary of State of Delaware
on December 13, 2013 (Exhibit 3.1 to Form 8-K filed on December 16, 2013)
3-b Bylaws (Exhibit 3.1 to Form 8-K filed on June 26, 2020)
3-cCertificate of Designations with respect to Series A Preferred Stock (Exhibit 3.1 to
Form 8-K filed on December 12, 2019)
3-d Certificate of Designations with respect to Series B Preferred Stock (Exhibit 3.1 to
Form 8-K filed on February 18, 2020)
3-eCertificate of Designations with respect to Series C Preferred Stock (Exhibit 3.2 to
Form 8-K filed on February 18, 2020)
127
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
4-aNo instrument which defines the rights of holders of long-term debt of the registrant
and all of its consolidated subsidiaries is filed herewith pursuant to Regulation S-K,
Item 601(b)(4)(iii)(A), except for the instruments referred to in 4-b, 4-c, 4-d, 4-e, 4-
f below. Pursuant to this regulation, the registrant hereby agrees to furnish a copy of
any such instrument not filed herewith to the SEC upon request.
4-bGuaranty of certain obligations of Pacific Bell Telephone Co. and Southwestern
Bell Telephone Co. (Exhibit 4-c to Form 10-K for the period ending December 31,
2011)
4-cGuaranty of certain obligations of Ameritech Capital Funding Corp., Indiana Bell
Telephone Co. Inc., Michigan Bell Telephone Co., Pacific Bell Telephone Co.,
Southwestern Bell Telephone Company, Illinois Bell Telephone Company, The Ohio
Bell Telephone Company, The Southern New England Telephone Company,
Southern New England Telecommunications Corporation, and Wisconsin Bell, Inc.
(Exhibit 4-d to Form 10-K for the period ending December 31, 2011)
4-dGuarantee of certain obligations of AT&T Corp. (Exhibit 4-e to Form 10-K for the
period ending December 31, 2011)
4-eIndenture, dated as of May 15, 2013, between AT&T Inc. and The Bank of New
York Mellon Trust Company, N.A., as Trustee (Exhibit 4.1 to Form 8-K filed on
May 15, 2013)
4-fIndenture dated as of November 1, 1994 between SBC Communications Inc. and
The Bank of New York, as Trustee (Exhibit 4-h to Form 10-K for the period ending
December 31, 2013)
4-gDeposit Agreement, dated December 12, 2019, among the AT&T Inc.,
Computershare Inc. and Computershare Trust Company, N.A., collectively, as
depositary, and the holders from time to time of the depository receipts described
therein (Exhibit 4.3 to Form 8-K filed December 12, 2019)
4-hDeposit Agreement, dated February 18, 2020, among the Company, Computershare
Inc. and Computershare Trust Company, N.A., collectively, as depositary, and the
holders from time to time of the depositary receipts described therein (Exhibit 4.3 to
Form 8-K filed February 18, 2020)
4-iDescription of AT&T’s Securities Registered Under Section 12 of the Exchange Act
10-a2018 Incentive Plan (Exhibit 10-a to Form 10-K for the period ending December
31, 2017)**
10-b2016 Incentive Plan (Exhibit 10-a to Form 10-Q for the period ending March 31,
2016)**
10-b(i)Resolution Regarding John Stankey (Exhibit 10-b to Form 10-Q for the
period ending September 30, 2017)**
10-b(ii)Resolution Regarding John Stephens (Exhibit 10-c to Form 10-Q for the
period ending September 30, 2017)**
10-c2011 Incentive Plan (Exhibit 10-a to Form 10-Q for the period ending September
30, 2015)**
10-dShort Term Incentive Plan (Exhibit 10.1 to Form 8-K filed on February 2, 2018)**
10-eSupplemental Life Insurance Plan (Exhibit 10.1 to Form 8-K filed on June 26,
2020)**
10-fSupplemental Retirement Income Plan (Exhibit 10-e to Form 10-K for the period
ending December 31, 2013)**
10-g2005 Supplemental Employee Retirement Plan**
10-hSalary and Incentive Award Deferral Plan (Exhibit 10-k to Form 10-K for the period
ending December 31, 2011)**
10-iStock Savings Plan (Exhibit 10-l to Form 10-K for the period ending December 31,
2011)**
10-jStock Purchase and Deferral Plan as amended July 29,2021 (Exhibit 10.6 to Form
10-Q for the period ending September 30, 2021)**
10-kCash Deferral Plan as amended July 29, 2021 (Exhibit 10.5 to Form 10-Q for the
period ending September 30, 2021)**
10-lMaster Trust Agreement for AT&T Inc. Deferred Compensation Plans and Other
Executive Benefit Plans and subsequent amendments dated August 1, 1995 and
November 1, 1999 (Exhibit 10-dd to Form 10-K for the period ending December
31, 2009)**
10-mOfficer Disability Plan (Exhibit 10-i to Form 10-Q for the period ending June 30,
2009)**
10-nAT&T Inc. Health Plan (Exhibit 10.4 to Form 10-Q for the period ending September
30, 2021)**
10-oPension Benefit Makeup Plan No.1 (Exhibit 10-n to Form 10-K for the period
ending December 31, 2016)**
10-pAT&T Inc. Equity Retention and Hedging Policy (Exhibit 10.2 to Form 8-K filed on
December 16, 2011)
10-qAdministrative Plan (Exhibit 10-q to Form 10-K for the period ending December
31, 2019)**
10-rAT&T Inc. Non-Employee Director Stock and Deferral Plan**
128
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
10-sAT&T Inc. Non-Employee Director Stock Purchase Plan (Exhibit 10-t to Form 10-
K for the period ending December 31, 2013)**
10-tAT&T Inc. Board of Directors Communications Concession Program (Exhibit 10-aa
to Form 10-K for the period ending December 31, 2012)
10-uForm of Indemnity Agreement, effective July 1, 1986, between Southwestern Bell
Corporation (now AT&T Inc.) and its directors and officers. (Exhibit 10-bb to Form
10-K for the period ending December 31, 2011)**
10-vAT&T Executive Physical Program (Exhibit 10-ff to Form 10-K for the period
ending December 31, 2016)**
10-wAttorney Fee Payment Agreement for John Stankey (Exhibit 10.1 to Form 8-K filed
on July 3, 2018)**
10-xAgreement between Jason Kilar and WarnerMedia LLC (Exhibit 10.2 to Form 10-Q
for the period ending June 30, 2020)**
10-y$7,500,000,000 Amended and Restated Credit Agreement, dated as of November
17, 2020, among AT&T Inc., certain lenders named therein and Citibank, N.A., as
agent. (Exhibit 10.1 to Form 8-K filed on November 18, 2020)
10-zAmendment No. 1 to the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement dated as of June
4, 2021 (Exhibit 10.3 to Form 8-K filed June 10, 2021)
10-aa$7,500,000,000 Five Year Credit Agreement, dated as of December 11, 2018,
among AT&T Inc., certain lenders named therein and Citibank, N.A., as agent
(Exhibit 10.2 to Form 8-K filed on December 13, 2018)
10-bbAmendment No. 1 to the $7,500,000,000 Five Year Credit Agreement, dated
December 11, 2018, among AT&T, certain lenders named therein and Citibank,
N.A., as agent. (Exhibit 10.2 to Form 8-K filed on November 18, 2020)
10-ccAmendment No. 2 to the Five Year Credit Agreement dated as of June 4, 2021
(Exhibit 10.4 to Form 8-K filed June 10, 2021)
10-ddAmended and Restated Contribution Agreement (Exhibit 10-ee to Form 10-K for
the period ending December 31, 2018)
10-eeFifth Amended and Restated Limited Liability Company Agreement of Mobility II
LLC (Exhibit 10-1 to Form 10-Qfor the period ending September 30, 2020)
10-ffFirst Amendment to the Fourth Amended and Restated Limited Liability Company
Agreement of Mobility II LLC (Exhibit 10-gg to Form 10-K for the period ending
December 31,2018)
10-ggSecond Amendment to the Fourth Amended and Restated Limited Liability
Company Agreement of Mobility II LLC (Exhibit 10-hh to Form 10-K for the
period ending December 31, 2018)
10-hhAmended and Restated Registration Rights Agreement by and among AT&T Inc.
and The SBC Master Pension Trust and Brock Fiduciary Services LLC (Exhibit 10-
ii to Form 10-K for the period ending December 31, 2018)
10-iiFirst Amendment to Amended and Restated Registration Rights Agreement by and
among AT&T Inc. and The SBC Master Pension Trust and Brock Fiduciary Services
LLC (Exhibit 10.2 to Form 10-Q for the period ending September 30, 2020)
10-jjSecond Amended and Restated Limited Liability Company Agreement of NCWPCS
MPL Holdings, LLC (Exhibit 10.1 to Form 8-K filed on December 12, 2019)
10-kkAT&T Inc. Change in Control Severance Plan (Exhibit 10.1 to Form 8-K filed on
June 30, 2014)**
10-llAgreement of Contribution and Subscription, dated February 25, 2021 (Exhibit 10.1
to Form 8-K filed on February 25, 2021)
10-mmTerm Loan Credit Agreement, dated as of January 29, 2021, among AT&T Inc., the
Initial Lenders and Bank of America N.A. as Agent (Exhibit 10.1 to Form 8-K filed
on January 29, 2021)
10-nnAmendment No. 1 to the Term Loan Credit Agreement dated as of June 4,
2021(Exhibit 10.2 to Form 8-K filed June 10, 2021)
10-ooConsulting Services Agreement (Exhibit 10.1 to Form 8-K filed on March 30,
2021)**
10-ppVoting Agreement (Exhibit 10.1 to Form 8-K Filed on May 20, 2021)
10-qqVoting Agreement (Exhibit 10.2 to Form 8-K Filed on May 20, 2021)
10 E l M A b d AT&TI M ll I d
10-rrEmployee Matters Agreement by and among AT&T Inc., Magallanes, Inc., and
Discovery, Inc. dated as of May 17, 2021 (Exhibit 10.3 to Form 8-K Filed on May
20, 2021)
129
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
10-ssTax Matters Agreement between among AT&T Inc., Magallanes, Inc., and
Discovery, Inc. dated as of May 17, 2021 (Exhibit 10.4 to Form 8-K Filed on May
20, 2021)
10-ttCredit Agreement dated as of June 4, 2021 among Magallanes, Inc., as Borrower,
the Lenders named therein, JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as Administrative Agent
and Goldman Sachs Bank USA as Syndication Agent (Exhibit 10.1 to Form 8-K
filed June 10, 2021)
10-uuAmended and Restated Limited Liability Company Agreement of DIRECTV
Entertainment Holdings LLC, dated as of July 31, 2021 (Exhibit 10.1 to Form 8-K
filed August 2, 2021)
10-vvRelocation Program Plan (Exhibit 10.2 to Form 10-Q for the period ending
September 30, 2021)**
10-wwAmendment Regarding Continuation of Active Employee Participant Benefits in
Certain AT&T Benefit Plans in Connection with DIRECTV Transaction (Exhibit
10.3 to Form 10-Q for the period ending September 30, 2021)**
21 Subsidiaries of AT&T Inc.
23 Consent of Ernst & Young LLP
24 Powers of Attorney
31 Rule 13a-14(a)/15d-14(a) Certifications
31.1Certification of Principal Executive Officer
31.2Certification of Principal Financial Officer
32 Section 1350 Certification
99 Supplemental Interim Financial Information
101The consolidated financial statements from the Company’s Form 10-K for the year
ended December 31, 2021, as filed with the SEC on February 16, 2022, formatted in
Inline XBRL: (i) Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows, (ii) Consolidated
Statements of Operations, (iii) Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income,
(iv) Consolidated Balance Sheets, and (v) Notes to Consolidated Financial
Statements, tagged as blocks of text and including detailed tags.
104Cover Page Interactive Data File (formatted as Inline XBRL and contained in
Exhibit 101)
* Certain schedules (or similar attachments) have been omitted pursuant to Item 601(a)(5) or Item 601(b)(2) of Regulation S-K. The registrant
agrees to furnish copies of such schedules (or similar attachments) to the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission upon request.
**Management contracts and compensatory plans and arrangements required to be filed as exhibits pursuant to Item 15(b) of this report.
We will furnish to stockholders upon request, and without charge, a copy of the Annual Report to Stockholders and the Proxy
Statement, portions of which are incorporated by reference in the Form 10-K. We will furnish any other exhibit at cost.
ITEM 16. FORM 10-K SUMMARY
None.
130
AT&T  Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
SCHEDULE II - VALUA TION AND QUALIFYING ACCOUNTS
Allowance for  Credit Losses
COL. A COL. B COL. C COL. D COL. E
Additions
(1) (2) (3)
Balance at
Beginning of
PeriodCharged to
Costs and
Expenses (a)Charged to Other
Accounts (b) Acquisitions Deductions (c)Balance at End
of Period (d)
Year 2021 $ 1,589 $ 1,240 $ — $ — $ 1,693 $ 1,136 
Year 2020 $ 1,235 $ 1,972 $ 405 $ — $ 2,023 $ 1,589 
Year 2019 $ 907 $ 2,575 $ — $ — $ 2,247 $ 1,235 
(a) Includes amounts previously written of f which were credited directly to this account when recovered.
Excludes direct char ges and credits to expense for nontrade receivables in the consolidated statements of income.
Includes the impact to operating expenses, for the year ended December 31, 2020, after adoption of ASC 326.
(b) Opening adjustments upon adoption of ASC 326, with modified retrospective application, as of January 1, 2020 (see Note 1).
(c) Amounts written of f as uncollectible, or related to divested entities.
(d) Includes balances applicable to trade receivables, loans, contract assets and other assets subject to credit loss measurement (see Note 1).
SCHEDULE II - VALUATION AND QUALIFYING ACCOUNTS
Allowance for Deferred Tax Assets
COL. A COL. B COL. C COL. D COL. E
Additions
(1) (2) (3)
Balance at
Beginning of
PeriodCharged to
Costs and
ExpensesCharged to Other
Accounts (a) Acquisitions DeductionsBalance at End
of Period
Year 2021 $ 4,773 (135) — — — $ 4,638 
Year 2020 $ 4,941 (168) — — — $ 4,773 
Year 2019 $ 4,588 (18) 371 — — $ 4,941 
(a) Includes current year reclassifications from other balance sheet accounts.
131
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this
report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized, on the 16th day of February, 2022.
AT&T INC.
/s/ Pascal Desroches
Pascal Desroches
Senior Executive Vice President
   and Chief Financial Officer
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following
persons on behalf of the registrant and in the capacities and on the date indicated.
Principal Executive Officer:
John T. Stankey*
Chief Executive Officer
and President
Principal Financial and Accounting Officer:
Pascal Desroches
Senior Executive Vice President
and Chief Financial Officer
/s/ Pascal Desroches
Pascal Desroches, as attorney-in-fact
and on his own behalf as Principal
Financial Officer and Principal
Accounting Officer
February 16, 2022
Directors:
John T. Stankey* Michael B. McCallister*
Samuel A. Di Piazza, Jr.* Beth E. Mooney*
Scott T. Ford* Matthew K. Rose*
Glenn H. Hutchins* Cynthia B. Taylor*
William E. Kennard* Luis A. Ubiñas*
Debra L. Lee* Geoffrey Y. Yang*
Stephen J. Luczo*
* by power of attorney
132
